1000
518,he requested was a thousand and seven hundred shekels of gold; beside ornaments, and collars, and purple raiment that was on the kings of Midian, and beside the chains that were about their camels' necks. 
And Gideon made an ephod thereof, and put it in his city, even in Ophrah: and all Israel went thither a whoring after it: which thing became a snare unto Gideon, and to his house. 
Thus was Midian subdued before the children of Israel, so that they lifted up their heads no more. And the country was in quietness
582,nd their place is not known where they are. 
Thy shepherds slumber, O king of Assyria: thy nobles shall dwell in the dust: thy people is scattered upon the mountains, and no man gathereth them. 
There is no healing of thy bruise; thy wound is grievous: all that hear the bruit of thee shall clap the hands over thee: for upon whom hath not thy wickedness passed continually? 
The burden which Habakkuk the prophet did see. 
O LORD, how long shall I cry, and thou wilt not hear! even cry out unto thee of violence, and thou wilt not save! 
Why dost thou shew me iniquity, and cause m
516,aid, Go not down into Egypt; dwell in the land which I shall tell thee of: 
Sojourn in this land, and I will be with thee, and will bless thee; for unto thee, and unto thy seed, I will give all these countries, and I will perform the oath which I sware unto Abraham thy father; 
And I will make thy seed to multiply as the stars of heaven, and will give unto thy seed all these countries; and in thy seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed; 
Because that Abraham obeyed my voice, and kept my charge, my co
607, turtledoves, or of the young pigeons, such as he can get; 
Even such as he is able to get, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, with the meat offering: and the priest shall make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed before the LORD. 
This is the law of him in whom is the plague of leprosy, whose hand is not able to get that which pertaineth to his cleansing. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When ye be come into the land of Canaan, which I give to you for a possession, and I put the plague of leprosy in a house of the land of your possession; 
A
700,pass after this, that Absalom the son of David had a fair sister, whose name was Tamar; and Amnon the son of David loved her. 
And Amnon was so vexed, that he fell sick for his sister Tamar; for she was a virgin; and Amnon thought it hard for him to do anything to her. 
But Amnon had a friend, whose name was Jonadab, the son of Shimeah David's brother: and Jonadab was a very subtil man. 
And he said unto him, Why art thou, being the king's son, lean from day to day? wilt thou not tell me? And Amnon said unto him, I love Tamar, my brother Absalom's sister. 
And Jonadab said unto him, Lay thee down on thy bed, and make thyself sick: and when thy father cometh to see thee, say unto him, I pray 
620, their books together, and burned them before all men: and they counted the price of them, and found it fifty thousand pieces of silver. 
So mightily grew the word of God and prevailed. 
After these things were ended, Paul purposed in the spirit, when he had passed through Macedonia and Achaia, to go to Jerusalem, saying, After I have been there, I must also see Rome. 
So he sent into Macedonia two of them that ministered unto him, Timotheus and Erastus; but he himself stayed in Asia for a season. 
And the same time there arose no small stir about that way. 
For a certain man named Demetrius, a silversmith, which
540, refused to hearken, and pulled away the shoulder, and stopped their ears, that they should not hear. 
Yea, they made their hearts as an adamant stone, lest they should hear the law, and the words which the LORD of hosts hath sent in his spirit by the former prophets: therefore came a great wrath from the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore it is come to pass, that as he cried, and they would not hear; so they cried, and I would not hear, saith the LORD of hosts: 
But I scattered them with a whirlwind among all the nations whom they knew not. T
635,s were created by him, and for him: 
And he is before all things, and by him all things consist. 
And he is the head of the body, the church: who is the beginning, the firstborn from the dead; that in all things he might have the preeminence. 
For it pleased the Father that in him should all fulness dwell; 
And, having made peace through the blood of his cross, by him to reconcile all things unto himself; by him, I say, whether they be things in earth, or things in heaven. 
And you, that were sometime alienated and enemies in your mind by wicked works, yet now hath he reconciled 
In the body of his flesh through death, to prese
674,and the children of Israel went up harnessed out of the land of Egypt. 
And Moses took the bones of Joseph with him: for he had straitly sworn the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you; and ye shall carry up my bones away hence with you. 
And they took their journey from Succoth, and encamped in Etham, in the edge of the wilderness. 
And the LORD went before them by day in a pillar of a cloud, to lead them the way; and by night in a pillar of fire, to give them light; to go by day and night: 
He took not away the pillar of the cloud by day, nor the pillar of fire by night, from before the people. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto th
708,x hot against thy people, which thou hast brought forth out of the land of Egypt with great power, and with a mighty hand? 
Wherefore should the Egyptians speak, and say, For mischief did he bring them out, to slay them in the mountains, and to consume them from the face of the earth? Turn from thy fierce wrath, and repent of this evil against thy people. 
Remember Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, thy servants, to whom thou swarest by thine own self, and saidst unto them, I will multiply your seed as the stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of will I give unto your seed, and they shall inherit it for ever. 
And the LORD repented of the evil which he thought to do unto his people. 
And Mo
485,ame. 
And in that day will I make a covenant for them with the beasts of the field and with the fowls of heaven, and with the creeping things of the ground: and I will break the bow and the sword and the battle out of the earth, and will make them to lie down safely. 
And I will betroth thee unto me for ever; yea, I will betroth thee unto me in righteousness, and in judgment, and in lovingkindness, and in mercies. 
I will even betroth thee unto me in faithfulness: and thou shalt k
533,and of pipers, and trumpeters, shall be heard no more at all in thee; and no craftsman, of whatsoever craft he be, shall be found any more in thee; and the sound of a millstone shall be heard no more at all in thee; 
And the light of a candle shall shine no more at all in thee; and the voice of the bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all in thee: for thy merchants were the great men of the earth; for by thy sorceries were all nations deceived. 
And in her was found the blood of prophets, and of saints, and of 
565,st without charge, that I abuse not my power in the gospel. 
For though I be free from all men, yet have I made myself servant unto all, that I might gain the more. 
And unto the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that are without law. 
To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am made all things to a
535,ce of a skull. 
And they gave him to drink wine mingled with myrrh: but he received it not. 
And when they had crucified him, they parted his garments, casting lots upon them, what every man should take. 
And it was the third hour, and they crucified him. 
And the superscription of his accusation was written over, THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
And with him they crucify two thieves; the one on his right hand, and the other on his left. 
And the scripture was fulfilled, which saith, And he was numbered with the transgressors. 
And they th
530,be made whole again: and they shall bury them in Tophet, till there be no place to bury. 
Thus will I do unto this place, saith the LORD, and to the inhabitants thereof, and even make this city as Tophet: 
And the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses of the kings of Judah, shall be defiled as the place of Tophet, because of all the houses upon whose roofs they have burned incense unto all the host of heaven, and have poured out drink offerings unto other gods. 
Then came Jeremiah from Tophet, whither the LORD had sent him to 
592, 
My soul thirsteth for God, for the living God: when shall I come and appear before God? 
My tears have been my meat day and night, while they continually say unto me, Where is thy God? 
When I remember these things, I pour out my soul in me: for I had gone with the multitude, I went with them to the house of God, with the voice of joy and praise, with a multitude that kept holyday. 
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted in me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise him for the help of his countenance. 
O my God, my soul is cast down within me: therefore wil
694,d the second is like, namely this, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. There is none other commandment greater than these. 
And the scribe said unto him, Well, Master, thou hast said the truth: for there is one God; and there is none other but he: 
And to love him with all the heart, and with all the understanding, and with all the soul, and with all the strength, and to love his neighbour as himself, is more than all whole burnt offerings and sacrifices. 
And when Jesus saw that he answered discreetly, he said unto him, Thou art not far from the kingdom of God. And no man after that durst ask him any question. 
And Jesus answered and said, while he taught in the temple, How say 
625,ans were sinners above all the Galilaeans, because they suffered such things? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
Or those eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and slew them, think ye that they were sinners above all men that dwelt in Jerusalem? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
He spake also this parable; A certain man had a fig tree planted in his vineyard; and he came and sought fruit thereon, and found none. 
Then said he unto the dresser of his vineyard, Behold, these three years I come seeking fruit on this fig tree, and find none
565, waters shall languish. 
Moreover they that work in fine flax, and they that weave networks, shall be confounded. 
And they shall be broken in the purposes thereof, all that make sluices and ponds for fish. 
Surely the princes of Zoan are fools, the counsel of the wise counsellors of Pharaoh is become brutish: how say ye unto Pharaoh, I am the son of the wise, the son of ancient kings? 
Where are they? where are thy wise men? and let them tell thee now, and let them know what the LORD of hosts hath purposed upon Egypt. 
The princes of Zoan are become fools, t
550,nto you, He that receiveth whomsoever I send receiveth me; and he that receiveth me receiveth him that sent me. 
When Jesus had thus said, he was troubled in spirit, and testified, and said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me. 
Then the disciples looked one on another, doubting of whom he spake. 
Now there was leaning on Jesus' bosom one of his disciples, whom Jesus loved. 
Simon Peter therefore beckoned to him, that he should ask who it should be of whom he spake. 
He then lying on Jesus' breast saith unto him, Lor
511, I was at Shushan in the palace, which is in the province of Elam; and I saw in a vision, and I was by the river of Ulai. 
Then I lifted up mine eyes, and saw, and, behold, there stood before the river a ram which had two horns: and the two horns were high; but one was higher than the other, and the higher came up last. 
I saw the ram pushing westward, and northward, and southward; so that no beasts might stand before him, neither was there any that could deliver out of his hand; but he did according to hi
569, of the LORD, and the judgment of their God: but these have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds. 
Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities: every one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces: because their transgressions are many, and their backslidings are increased. 
How shall I pardon thee for this? thy children have forsaken me, and sworn by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to the full, they then committed adultery, and assembled themselv
693,Israel: and my princes shall no more oppress my people; and the rest of the land shall they give to the house of Israel according to their tribes. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Let it suffice you, O princes of Israel: remove violence and spoil, and execute judgment and justice, take away your exactions from my people, saith the Lord GOD. 
Ye shall have just balances, and a just ephah, and a just bath. 
The ephah and the bath shall be of one measure, that the bath may contain the tenth part of an homer, and the ephah the tenth part of an homer: the measure thereof shall be after the homer. 
And the shekel shall be twenty gerahs: twenty shekels, five and twenty shekels, fifteen shekels, sha
618, to him, Behold, there is a woman that hath a familiar spirit at Endor. 
And Saul disguised himself, and put on other raiment, and he went, and two men with him, and they came to the woman by night: and he said, I pray thee, divine unto me by the familiar spirit, and bring me him up, whom I shall name unto thee. 
And the woman said unto him, Behold, thou knowest what Saul hath done, how he hath cut off those that have familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land: wherefore then layest thou a snare for my life, to cause me to die? 
And Saul sware to her by the LORD, saying, As the LORD liveth, there shall 
611,ll put it upon a bar. 
And upon the golden altar they shall spread a cloth of blue, and cover it with a covering of badgers' skins, and shall put to the staves thereof: 
And they shall take all the instruments of ministry, wherewith they minister in the sanctuary, and put them in a cloth of blue, and cover them with a covering of badgers' skins, and shall put them on a bar: 
And they shall take away the ashes from the altar, and spread a purple cloth thereon: 
And they shall put upon it all the vessels thereof, wherewith they minister about it, even the censers, the fleshhooks, and the shovels, and the b
490,as much as another. 
And this is the law of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he shall offer unto the LORD. 
If he offer it for a thanksgiving, then he shall offer with the sacrifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of fine flour, fried. 
Besides the cakes, he shall offer for his offering leavened bread with the sacrifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out
717,e LORD. 
He appointed also the king's portion of his substance for the burnt offerings, to wit, for the morning and evening burnt offerings, and the burnt offerings for the sabbaths, and for the new moons, and for the set feasts, as it is written in the law of the LORD. 
Moreover he commanded the people that dwelt in Jerusalem to give the portion of the priests and the Levites, that they might be encouraged in the law of the LORD. 
And as soon as the commandment came abroad, the children of Israel brought in abundance the firstfruits of corn, wine, and oil, and honey, and of all the increase of the field; and the tithe of all things brought they in abundantly. 
And concerning the children of Israel and Judah
525,turned with shame of face to his own land. And when he was come into the house of his god, they that came forth of his own bowels slew him there with the sword. 
Thus the LORD saved Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem from the hand of Sennacherib the king of Assyria, and from the hand of all other, and guided them on every side. 
And many brought gifts unto the LORD to Jerusalem, and presents to Hezekiah king of Judah: so that he was magnified in the sight of all nations from thenceforth. 
In those days Hezekiah w
609,or I am thy God: I will strengthen thee; yea, I will help thee; yea, I will uphold thee with the right hand of my righteousness. 
Behold, all they that were incensed against thee shall be ashamed and confounded: they shall be as nothing; and they that strive with thee shall perish. 
Thou shalt seek them, and shalt not find them, even them that contended with thee: they that war against thee shall be as nothing, and as a thing of nought. 
For I the LORD thy God will hold thy right hand, saying unto thee, Fear not; I will help thee. 
Fear not, thou worm Jacob, and ye men of Israel; I will help thee, sait
567, the sons of men, whose teeth are spears and arrows, and their tongue a sharp sword. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens; let thy glory be above all the earth. 
They have prepared a net for my steps; my soul is bowed down: they have digged a pit before me, into the midst whereof they are fallen themselves. Selah. 
My heart is fixed, O God, my heart is fixed: I will sing and give praise. 
Awake up, my glory; awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early. 
I will praise thee, O Lord, among the people: I will sing unto thee among the nations. 
For thy
719,d. 
And those that do pitch next unto him shall be the tribe of Issachar: and Nethaneel the son of Zuar shall be captain of the children of Issachar. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred. 
Then the tribe of Zebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be captain of the children of Zebulun. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and four hundred. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Judah were an hundred thousand and fourscore thousand and six thousand and four hundred, throughout their armies. These shall first set forth. 
On the south side shall be the standard of the camp of Reuben according to their armi
619,the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel. 
And their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold, and of precious things, with fenced cities in Judah: but the kingdom gave he to Jehoram; because he was the firstborn. 
Now when Jehoram was risen up to the kingdom of his father, he strengthened himself, and slew all his brethren with the sword, and divers also of the princes of Israel. 
Jehoram was thirty and two years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem. 
And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, like as did the house of Ahab: for he had the daughter of Ahab to wife: a
638,he city, and let him that is armed pass on before the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua had spoken unto the people, that the seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns passed on before the LORD, and blew with the trumpets: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD followed them. 
And the armed men went before the priests that blew with the trumpets, and the rereward came after the ark, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And Joshua had commanded the people, saying, Ye shall not shout, nor make any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the day I 
702,s, their pillars ten, and their sockets ten; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the east side eastward fifty cubits. 
The hangings of the one side of the gate were fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And for the other side of the court gate, on this hand and that hand, were hangings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
All the hangings of the court round about were of fine twined linen. 
And the sockets for the pillars were of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver; and the overlaying of their chapiters of silver; and all the pillars of the court were filleted with silver. 
And the hanging 
540,ess: for a man's life consisteth not in the abundance of the things which he possesseth. 
And he spake a parable unto them, saying, The ground of a certain rich man brought forth plentifully: 
And he thought within himself, saying, What shall I do, because I have no room where to bestow my fruits? 
And he said, This will I do: I will pull down my barns, and build greater; and there will I bestow all my fruits and my goods. 
And I will say to my soul, Soul, thou hast much goods laid up for many years; take thine ease, eat, drink, and b
661,th; and some to honour, and some to dishonour. 
If a man therefore purge himself from these, he shall be a vessel unto honour, sanctified, and meet for the master's use, and prepared unto every good work. 
Flee also youthful lusts: but follow righteousness, faith, charity, peace, with them that call on the Lord out of a pure heart. 
But foolish and unlearned questions avoid, knowing that they do gender strifes. 
And the servant of the Lord must not strive; but be gentle unto all men, apt to teach, patient, 
In meekness instructing those that oppose themselves; if God peradventure will give them repentance to the acknowledging of the truth; 
And that the
614,need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and Jerusalem: fear not, nor be dismayed; to morrow go out against them: for the LORD will be with you. 
And Jehoshaphat bowed his head with his face to the ground: and all Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem fell before the LORD, worshipping the LORD. 
And the Levites, of the children of the Kohathites, and of the children of the Korhites, stood up to praise the LORD God of Israel with a loud voice on high. 
And they rose early in the morning, and went forth into the wilderness of Tekoa: and
534,to give thee skill and understanding. 
At the beginning of thy supplications the commandment came forth, and I am come to shew thee; for thou art greatly beloved: therefore understand the matter, and consider the vision. 
Seventy weeks are determined upon thy people and upon thy holy city, to finish the transgression, and to make an end of sins, and to make reconciliation for iniquity, and to bring in everlasting righteousness, and to seal up the vision and prophecy, and to anoint the most Holy. 
Know therefore and understand, t
497,are not his days also like the days of an hireling? 
As a servant earnestly desireth the shadow, and as an hireling looketh for the reward of his work: 
So am I made to possess months of vanity, and wearisome nights are appointed to me. 
When I lie down, I say, When shall I arise, and the night be gone? and I am full of tossings to and fro unto the dawning of the day. 
My flesh is clothed with worms and clods of dust; my skin is broken, and become loathsome. 
My days are swifter than a weaver
498, smoke. 
Cast forth lightning, and scatter them: shoot out thine arrows, and destroy them. 
Send thine hand from above; rid me, and deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvation unto kings: who delivereth David his servant from the hurtful sw
669,ay a goat for a sin offering: they shall also prepare a young bullock, and a ram out of the flock, without blemish. 
Seven days shall they purge the altar and purify it; and they shall consecrate themselves. 
And when these days are expired, it shall be, that upon the eighth day, and so forward, the priests shall make your burnt offerings upon the altar, and your peace offerings; and I will accept you, saith the Lord GOD. 
Then he brought me back the way of the gate of the outward sanctuary which looketh toward the east; and it was shut. 
Then said the LORD unto me; This gate shall be shut, it shall not be opened, and no man shall enter in by it; because the LO
510,how much. 
Whatsoever is commanded by the God of heaven, let it be diligently done for the house of the God of heaven: for why should there be wrath against the realm of the king and his sons? 
Also we certify you, that touching any of the priests and Levites, singers, porters, Nethinims, or ministers of this house of God, it shall not be lawful to impose toll, tribute, or custom, upon them. 
And thou, Ezra, after the wisdom of thy God, that is in thine hand, set magistrates and judges, which may judge al
669,n anger, nor in battle. 
And in his estate shall stand up a vile person, to whom they shall not give the honour of the kingdom: but he shall come in peaceably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries. 
And with the arms of a flood shall they be overflown from before him, and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant. 
And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches
620, the morning, and according to the drink offering thereof, for a sweet savour, an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
This shall be a continual burnt offering throughout your generations at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD: where I will meet you, to speak there unto thee. 
And there I will meet with the children of Israel, and the tabernacle shall be sanctified by my glory. 
And I will sanctify the tabernacle of the congregation, and the altar: I will sanctify also both Aaron and his sons, to minister to me in the priest's office. 
And I will dwell among the children of Israel, and
528,n the altar of the LORD, which he had built before the porch, 
Even after a certain rate every day, offering according to the commandment of Moses, on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the solemn feasts, three times in the year, even in the feast of unleavened bread, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles. 
And he appointed, according to the order of David his father, the courses of the priests to their service, and the Levites to their charges, to praise and minister before the priests, as the
608,own name. 
These are the journeys of the children of Israel, which went forth out of the land of Egypt with their armies under the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to their goings out. 
And they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with an high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians. 
For the Egyptians buried all their firstborn, which the LORD had smitten among them: u
651, 
I applied mine heart to know, and to search, and to seek out wisdom, and the reason of things, and to know the wickedness of folly, even of foolishness and madness: 
And I find more bitter than death the woman, whose heart is snares and nets, and her hands as bands: whoso pleaseth God shall escape from her; but the sinner shall be taken by her. 
Behold, this have I found, saith the preacher, counting one by one, to find out the account: 
Which yet my soul seeketh, but I find not: one man among a thousand have I found; but a woman among all those have I not found. 
Lo, this only have I found, that God hath made man upright; but they have soug
611,raven, as signets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel. 
And he put them on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should be stones for a memorial to the children of Israel; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the breastplate of cunning work, like the work of the ephod; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
It was foursquare; they made the breastplate double: a span was the length thereof, and a span the breadth thereof, being doubled. 
And they set in it four rows of stones: the first row was a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle: this was the first row. 
And
535,rn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitation. 
His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, neither is there any to deliver them. 
Whose harvest the hungry eateth up, and taketh it even out of the thorns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance. 
Although affliction cometh not forth of the dust, neither doth trouble spring out of the ground; 
Yet man is born unto trouble, as the sparks fly upward. 
I w
572,ts and our rulers delivered him to be condemned to death, and have crucified him. 
But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed Israel: and beside all this, to day is the third day since these things were done. 
Yea, and certain women also of our company made us astonished, which were early at the sepulchre; 
And when they found not his body, they came, saying, that they had also seen a vision of angels, which said that he was alive. 
And certain of them which were with us went to the sepulchre, and found it even so as the women had said: but him th
630,t in thee: for thou, LORD, hast not forsaken them that seek thee. 
Sing praises to the LORD, which dwelleth in Zion: declare among the people his doings. 
When he maketh inquisition for blood, he remembereth them: he forgetteth not the cry of the humble. 
Have mercy upon me, O LORD; consider my trouble which I suffer of them that hate me, thou that liftest me up from the gates of death: 
That I may shew forth all thy praise in the gates of the daughter of Zion: I will rejoice in thy salvation. 
The heathen are sunk down in the pit that they made: in the net which they hid is their own foot taken. 
The LORD is known by the 
672,which goeth over before thee; as a consuming fire he shall destroy them, and he shall bring them down before thy face: so shalt thou drive them out, and destroy them quickly, as the LORD hath said unto thee. 
Speak not thou in thine heart, after that the LORD thy God hath cast them out from before thee, saying, For my righteousness the LORD hath brought me in to possess this land: but for the wickedness of these nations the LORD doth drive them out from before thee. 
Not for thy righteousness, or for the uprightness of thine heart, dost thou go to possess their land: but for the wickedness of these nations the LORD thy God doth drive them out from before thee, and
654,it was called Allonbachuth. 
And God appeared unto Jacob again, when he came out of Padanaram, and blessed him. 
And God said unto him, Thy name is Jacob: thy name shall not be called any more Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his name Israel. 
And God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply; a nation and a company of nations shall be of thee, and kings shall come out of thy loins; 
And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee will I give the land. 
And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him. 
And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he 
615,the beasts of the earth. 
For thus saith the LORD, Enter not into the house of mourning, neither go to lament nor bemoan them: for I have taken away my peace from this people, saith the LORD, even lovingkindness and mercies. 
Both the great and the small shall die in this land: they shall not be buried, neither shall men lament for them, nor cut themselves, nor make themselves bald for them: 
Neither shall men tear themselves for them in mourning, to comfort them for the dead; neither shall men give them the cup of consolation to drink for their father or for their mother. 
Thou shalt not also go into the ho
663,iding in the chamber. And he brake them from off his arms like a thread. 
And Delilah said unto Samson, Hitherto thou hast mocked me, and told me lies: tell me wherewith thou mightest be bound. And he said unto her, If thou weavest the seven locks of my head with the web. 
And she fastened it with the pin, and said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awaked out of his sleep, and went away with the pin of the beam, and with the web. 
And she said unto him, How canst thou say, I love thee, when thine heart is not with me? thou hast mocked me these three times, and hast not told me wherein thy great strength lieth. 
And it came to pass, wh
692,, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, unto a land flowing with milk and honey. 
And they shall hearken to thy voice: and thou shalt come, thou and the elders of Israel, unto the king of Egypt, and ye shall say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath met with us: and now let us go, we beseech thee, three days' journey into the wilderness, that we may sacrifice to the LORD our God. 
And I am sure that the king of Egypt will not let you go, no, not by a mighty hand. 
And I will stretch out my hand, and smite Egypt with all my wonders which I will do in the midst thereof: and after that he will let you go. 
And I will give this p
646,r the cedar work. 
This is the rejoicing city that dwelt carelessly, that said in her heart, I am, and there is none beside me: how is she become a desolation, a place for beasts to lie down in! every one that passeth by her shall hiss, and wag his hand. 
Woe to her that is filthy and polluted, to the oppressing city! 
She obeyed not the voice; she received not correction; she trusted not in the LORD; she drew not near to her God. 
Her princes within her are roaring lions; her judges are evening wolves; they gnaw not the bones till the morrow. 
Her prophets are light and treacherous persons: her priests have polluted the sanctuary, they h
670,n silver, in brass, in iron, in stone, and in timber, in purple, in blue, and in fine linen, and in crimson; also to grave any manner of graving, and to find out every device which shall be put to him, with thy cunning men, and with the cunning men of my lord David thy father. 
Now therefore the wheat, and the barley, the oil, and the wine, which my lord hath spoken of, let him send unto his servants: 
And we will cut wood out of Lebanon, as much as thou shalt need: and we will bring it to thee in floats by sea to Joppa; and thou shalt carry it up to Jerusalem. 
And Solomon numbered all the strangers that were in the land of Israel, after the numbering wherewith
670,surrection of Jesus Christ from the dead, 
To an inheritance incorruptible, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away, reserved in heaven for you, 
Who are kept by the power of God through faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time. 
Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeak
543, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the spirit of grace and of supplications: and they shall look upon me whom they have pierced, and they shall mourn for him, as one mourneth for his only son, and shall be in bitterness for him, as one that is in bitterness for his firstborn. 
In that day shall there be a great mourning in Jerusalem, as the mourning of Hadadrimmon in the valley of Megiddon. 
And the land shall mourn, every family apart; the family of the house of David apart, and their wives apart; the family of the house of Nathan 
540, unto me; and if not, I will know. 
And the men turned their faces from thence, and went toward Sodom: but Abraham stood yet before the LORD. 
And Abraham drew near, and said, Wilt thou also destroy the righteous with the wicked? 
Peradventure there be fifty righteous within the city: wilt thou also destroy and not spare the place for the fifty righteous that are therein? 
That be far from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far from thee: Shall n
508,ot: but the house of the righteous shall stand. 
A man shall be commended according to his wisdom: but he that is of a perverse heart shall be despised. 
He that is despised, and hath a servant, is better than he that honoureth himself, and lacketh bread. 
A righteous man regardeth the life of his beast: but the tender mercies of the wicked are cruel. 
He that tilleth his land shall be satisfied with bread: but he that followeth vain persons is void of understanding. 
The wicked desireth the net of evil
555,whereby they murmur against you. 
And Moses spake unto the children of Israel, and every one of their princes gave him a rod apiece, for each prince one, according to their fathers' houses, even twelve rods: and the rod of Aaron was among their rods. 
And Moses laid up the rods before the LORD in the tabernacle of witness. 
And it came to pass, that on the morrow Moses went into the tabernacle of witness; and, behold, the rod of Aaron for the house of Levi was budded, and brought forth buds, and bloomed blossoms, and yielded almonds. 
And Moses brou
673,hey were appointed. 
But ye are a chosen generation, a royal priesthood, an holy nation, a peculiar people; that ye should shew forth the praises of him who hath called you out of darkness into his marvellous light; 
Which in time past were not a people, but are now the people of God: which had not obtained mercy, but now have obtained mercy. 
Dearly beloved, I beseech you as strangers and pilgrims, abstain from fleshly lusts, which war against the soul; 
Having your conversation honest among the Gentiles: that, whereas they speak against you as evildoers, they may by your good works, which they shall behold, glorify God in the day of visitation. 
Submit yourselves
497,retched forth his hand toward his disciples, and said, Behold my mother and my brethren! 
For whosoever shall do the will of my Father which is in heaven, the same is my brother, and sister, and mother. 
The same day went Jesus out of the house, and sat by the sea side. 
And great multitudes were gathered together unto him, so that he went into a ship, and sat; and the whole multitude stood on the shore. 
And he spake many things unto them in parables, saying, Behold, a sower went forth to so
711,and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain by Medeba; 
Heshbon, and all her cities that are in the plain; Dibon, and Bamothbaal, and Bethbaalmeon, 
And Jahaza, and Kedemoth, and Mephaath, 
And Kirjathaim, and Sibmah, and Zarethshahar in the mount of the valley, 
And Bethpeor, and Ashdothpisgah, and Bethjeshimoth, 
And all the cities of the plain, and all the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, which reigned in Heshbon, whom Moses smote with the princes of Midian, Evi, and Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, which were dukes of Sihon, dwelling in the country. 
Balaam also the son of Beor, the soothsayer, did the children of Israel slay with the sword among them that were slain b
669,ther tempteth he any man: 
But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed. 
Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finished, bringeth forth death. 
Do not err, my beloved brethren. 
Every good gift and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh down from the Father of lights, with whom is no variableness, neither shadow of turning. 
Of his own will begat he us with the word of truth, that we should be a kind of firstfruits of his creatures. 
Wherefore, my beloved brethren, let every man be swift to hear, slow to speak, slow to wrath: 
For the wrath of man worketh not the righteousness of God. 
W
562, the blood with his finger seven times. 
Then shall he kill the goat of the sin offering, that is for the people, and bring his blood within the vail, and do with that blood as he did with the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst of their uncleanness. 
A
541,arred in the hand of the potter: so he made it again another vessel, as seemed good to the potter to make it. 
Then the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
O house of Israel, cannot I do with you as this potter? saith the LORD. Behold, as the clay is in the potter's hand, so are ye in mine hand, O house of Israel. 
At what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to pluck up, and to pull down, and to destroy it; 
If that nation, against whom I have pronounced, turn from their evil, I will repent of the evi
537,t so shall it not be among you: but whosoever will be great among you, shall be your minister: 
And whosoever of you will be the chiefest, shall be servant of all. 
For even the Son of man came not to be ministered unto, but to minister, and to give his life a ransom for many. 
And they came to Jericho: and as he went out of Jericho with his disciples and a great number of people, blind Bartimaeus, the son of Timaeus, sat by the highway side begging. 
And when he heard that it was Jesus of Nazareth, he began to cry out, and say, Je
595,eturn unto his house, lest his brethren's heart faint as well as his heart. 
And it shall be, when the officers have made an end of speaking unto the people that they shall make captains of the armies to lead the people. 
When thou comest nigh unto a city to fight against it, then proclaim peace unto it. 
And it shall be, if it make thee answer of peace, and open unto thee, then it shall be, that all the people that is found therein shall be tributaries unto thee, and they shall serve thee. 
And if it will make no peace with thee, but will make war against thee, then thou shalt besiege it
487,see it: 
But my servant Caleb, because he had another spirit with him, and hath followed me fully, him will I bring into the land whereinto he went; and his seed shall possess it. 
(Now the Amalekites and the Canaanites dwelt in the valley.) Tomorrow turn you, and get you into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, which murmur against me? I have heard the murmurings of the 
623,
And they that escape of you shall remember me among the nations whither they shall be carried captives, because I am broken with their whorish heart, which hath departed from me, and with their eyes, which go a whoring after their idols: and they shall lothe themselves for the evils which they have committed in all their abominations. 
And they shall know that I am the LORD, and that I have not said in vain that I would do this evil unto them. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Smite with thine hand, and stamp with thy foot, and say, Alas for all the evil abominations of the house of Israel! for they shall fall by the sword
507,ey sought after the gods of Edom. 
So Joash the king of Israel went up; and they saw one another in the face, both he and Amaziah king of Judah, at Bethshemesh, which belongeth to Judah. 
And Judah was put to the worse before Israel, and they fled every man to his tent. 
And Joash the king of Israel took Amaziah king of Judah, the son of Joash, the son of Jehoahaz, at Bethshemesh, and brought him to Jerusalem, and brake down the wall of Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim to the corner gate, four hundre
510,no more: for every man's word shall be his burden; for ye have perverted the words of the living God, of the LORD of hosts our God. 
Thus shalt thou say to the prophet, What hath the LORD answered thee? and, What hath the LORD spoken? 
But since ye say, The burden of the LORD; therefore thus saith the LORD; Because ye say this word, The burden of the LORD, and I have sent unto you, saying, Ye shall not say, The burden of the LORD; 
Therefore, behold, I, even I, will utterly forget you, and I will forsake 
667, became as it was before. 
And the king said unto the man of God, Come home with me, and refresh thyself, and I will give thee a reward. 
And the man of God said unto the king, If thou wilt give me half thine house, I will not go in with thee, neither will I eat bread nor drink water in this place: 
For so was it charged me by the word of the LORD, saying, Eat no bread, nor drink water, nor turn again by the same way that thou camest. 
So he went another way, and returned not by the way that he came to Bethel. 
Now there dwelt an old prophet in Bethel; and his sons came and told him all the works that the man of God had done that day in Bethel: the words whic
619, I say unto you, That whosoever is angry with his brother without a cause shall be in danger of the judgment: and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council: but whosoever shall say, Thou fool, shall be in danger of hell fire. 
Therefore if thou bring thy gift to the altar, and there rememberest that thy brother hath ought against thee; 
Leave there thy gift before the altar, and go thy way; first be reconciled to thy brother, and then come and offer thy gift. 
Agree with thine adversary quickly, whiles thou art in the way with him; lest at any time the adversary deliver thee to 
675,ich heard the word believed; and the number of the men was about five thousand. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that their rulers, and elders, and scribes, 
And Annas the high priest, and Caiaphas, and John, and Alexander, and as many as were of the kindred of the high priest, were gathered together at Jerusalem. 
And when they had set them in the midst, they asked, By what power, or by what name, have ye done this? 
Then Peter, filled with the Holy Ghost, said unto them, Ye rulers of the people, and elders of Israel, 
If we this day be examined of the good deed done to the impotent man, by what means he is made whole; 
Be it known unto you all, and to all the pe
487,ide, where the word is sown; but when they have heard, Satan cometh immediately, and taketh away the word that was sown in their hearts. 
And these are they likewise which are sown on stony ground; who, when they have heard the word, immediately receive it with gladness; 
And have no root in themselves, and so endure but for a time: afterward, when affliction or persecution ariseth for the word's sake, immediately they are offended. 
And these are they which are sown among thorns; s
697,h he hath lost, and thou hast found, shalt thou do likewise: thou mayest not hide thyself. 
Thou shalt not see thy brother's ass or his ox fall down by the way, and hide thyself from them: thou shalt surely help him to lift them up again. 
The woman shall not wear that which pertaineth unto a man, neither shall a man put on a woman's garment: for all that do so are abomination unto the LORD thy God. 
If a bird's nest chance to be before thee in the way in any tree, or on the ground, whether they be young ones, or eggs, and the dam sitting upon the young, or upon the eggs, thou shalt not take the dam with the young: 
But thou shalt in any wise let the dam go, and take the young to thee; th
656,oms in Egypt; they committed whoredoms in their youth: there were their breasts pressed, and there they bruised the teats of their virginity. 
And the names of them were Aholah the elder, and Aholibah her sister: and they were mine, and they bare sons and daughters. Thus were their names; Samaria is Aholah, and Jerusalem Aholibah. 
And Aholah played the harlot when she was mine; and she doted on her lovers, on the Assyrians her neighbours, 
Which were clothed with blue, captains and rulers, all of them desirable young men, horsemen riding upon horses. 
Thus she committed her whoredoms with them, with all them that were the chosen men of Assyria, an
671, them up alive as the grave; and whole, as those that go down into the pit: 
We shall find all precious substance, we shall fill our houses with spoil: 
Cast in thy lot among us; let us all have one purse: 
My son, walk not thou in the way with them; refrain thy foot from their path: 
For their feet run to evil, and make haste to shed blood. 
Surely in vain the net is spread in the sight of any bird. 
And they lay wait for their own blood; they lurk privily for their own lives. 
So are the ways of every one that is greedy of gain; which taketh away the life of the owners thereof. 
Wisdom crieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets: 
She crieth in the ch
501,is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have eaten it in the holy place, as I commanded. 
And Aaron said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered their sin offering and their burnt offering before the LORD; and such things have befallen me: and if I had eaten the sin offering to day, should it have been accepted in the sigh
711,ng's presence, and stood before the king. 
And the king sware, and said, As the LORD liveth, that hath redeemed my soul out of all distress, 
Even as I sware unto thee by the LORD God of Israel, saying, Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne in my stead; even so will I certainly do this day. 
Then Bathsheba bowed with her face to the earth, and did reverence to the king, and said, Let my lord king David live for ever. 
And king David said, Call me Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada. And they came before the king. 
The king also said unto them, Take with you the servants of your lord, and cause Solomon my son to ride upon mi
587,to me, and to the land wherein thou hast sojourned. 
And Abraham said, I will swear. 
And Abraham reproved Abimelech because of a well of water, which Abimelech's servants had violently taken away. 
And Abimelech said, I wot not who hath done this thing; neither didst thou tell me, neither yet heard I of it, but to day. 
And Abraham took sheep and oxen, and gave them unto Abimelech; and both of them made a covenant. 
And Abraham set seven ewe lambs of the flock by themselves. 
And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What mean these seven ewe lambs which thou hast set by themselves? 
And 
551,e have sown unto you spiritual things, is it a great thing if we shall reap your carnal things? 
If others be partakers of this power over you, are not we rather? Nevertheless we have not used this power; but suffer all things, lest we should hinder the gospel of Christ. 
Do ye not know that they which minister about holy things live of the things of the temple? and they which wait at the altar are partakers with the altar? 
Even so hath the Lord ordained that they which preach the gospel should live of the gospel. 
But I have used none of these
556,s wise, according to the wisdom of an angel of God, to know all things that are in the earth. 
And the king said unto Joab, Behold now, I have done this thing: go therefore, bring the young man Absalom again. 
And Joab fell to the ground on his face, and bowed himself, and thanked the king: and Joab said, To day thy servant knoweth that I have found grace in thy sight, my lord, O king, in that the king hath fulfilled the request of his servant. 
So Joab arose and went to Geshur, and brought Absalom to Jerusalem. 
And the king said, Let him turn to hi
616,aids of the high priest: 
And when she saw Peter warming himself, she looked upon him, and said, And thou also wast with Jesus of Nazareth. 
But he denied, saying, I know not, neither understand I what thou sayest. And he went out into the porch; and the cock crew. 
And a maid saw him again, and began to say to them that stood by, This is one of them. 
And he denied it again. And a little after, they that stood by said again to Peter, Surely thou art one of them: for thou art a Galilaean, and thy speech agreeth thereto. 
But he began to curse and to swear, saying, I know not this man of whom ye speak. 
And th
500,circumcision? Not in circumcision, but in uncircumcision. 
And he received the sign of circumcision, a seal of the righteousness of the faith which he had yet being uncircumcised: that he might be the father of all them that believe, though they be not circumcised; that righteousness might be imputed unto them also: 
And the father of circumcision to them who are not of the circumcision only, but who also walk in the steps of that faith of our father Abraham, which he had being yet uncircumcised
649,rer made, was about twenty men, within as it were an half acre of land, which a yoke of oxen might plow. 
And there was trembling in the host, in the field, and among all the people: the garrison, and the spoilers, they also trembled, and the earth quaked: so it was a very great trembling. 
And the watchmen of Saul in Gibeah of Benjamin looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one another. 
Then said Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us. And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armourbearer were not there. 
And Saul said unto Ahiah, Bring hither the 
591,re ye can find it: yet not ought of your work shall be diminished. 
So the people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of Egypt to gather stubble instead of straw. 
And the taskmasters hasted them, saying, Fulfil your works, your daily tasks, as when there was straw. 
And the officers of the children of Israel, which Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore have ye not fulfilled your task in making brick both yesterday and to day, as heretofore? 
Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried unto Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dea
493,ver man spake like this man. 
Then answered them the Pharisees, Are ye also deceived? 
Have any of the rulers or of the Pharisees believed on him? 
But this people who knoweth not the law are cursed. 
Nicodemus saith unto them, (he that came to Jesus by night, being one of them,) 
Doth our law judge any man, before it hear him, and know what he doeth? 
They answered and said unto him, Art thou also of Galilee? Search, and look: for out of Galilee ariseth no prophet. 
And every man went un
684,ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed among the children of Israel: I am the LORD which hallow you, 
That brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, Concerning the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, even these are my feasts. 
Six days shall work be done: but the seventh day is the sabbath of rest, an holy convocation; ye shall do no work therein: it is the sabbath of the L
704,ncreased over our head, and our trespass is grown up unto the heavens. 
Since the days of our fathers have we been in a great trespass unto this day; and for our iniquities have we, our kings, and our priests, been delivered into the hand of the kings of the lands, to the sword, to captivity, and to a spoil, and to confusion of face, as it is this day. 
And now for a little space grace hath been shewed from the LORD our God, to leave us a remnant to escape, and to give us a nail in his holy place, that our God may lighten our eyes, and give us a little reviving in our bondage. 
For we were bondmen; yet our God hath not forsaken us in our bondage, but hath extended mercy unto us in the sight of t
579, the LORD hath redeemed Jacob, and glorified himself in Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy redeemer, and he that formed thee from the womb, I am the LORD that maketh all things; that stretcheth forth the heavens alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by myself; 
That frustrateth the tokens of the liars, and maketh diviners mad; that turneth wise men backward, and maketh their knowledge foolish; 
That confirmeth the word of his servant, and performeth the counsel of his messengers; that saith to Jerusalem, Thou shalt be inhabited; and to the cities of Judah, Ye shall be buil
587,d, that they could not tell whence it was. 
And Jesus said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things. 
Then began he to speak to the people this parable; A certain man planted a vineyard, and let it forth to husbandmen, and went into a far country for a long time. 
And at the season he sent a servant to the husbandmen, that they should give him of the fruit of the vineyard: but the husbandmen beat him, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent another servant: and they beat him also, and entreated him shamefully, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sen
519,and the spoons, and the cups; that which was of gold in gold, and that which was of silver in silver, took the captain of the guard away. 
The two pillars, one sea, and twelve brasen bulls that were under the bases, which king Solomon had made in the house of the LORD: the brass of all these vessels was without weight. 
And concerning the pillars, the height of one pillar was eighteen cubits; and a fillet of twelve cubits did compass it; and the thickness thereof was four fingers: it was hollow. 
And a chapiter of
510,all be as flames. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, cruel both with wrath and fierce anger, to lay the land desolate: and he shall destroy the sinners thereof out of it. 
For the stars of heaven and the constellations thereof shall not give their light: the sun shall be darkened in his going forth, and the moon shall not cause her light to shine. 
And I will punish the world for their evil, and the wicked for their iniquity; and I will cause the arrogancy of the proud to cease, and will lay low the hau
554, neighbour cities thereof, saith the LORD, no man shall abide there, neither shall a son of man dwell in it. 
Behold, he shall come up like a lion from the swelling of Jordan against the habitation of the strong: but I will suddenly make him run away from her: and who is a chosen man, that I may appoint over her? for who is like me? and who will appoint me the time? and who is that shepherd that will stand before me? 
Therefore hear the counsel of the LORD, that he hath taken against Edom; and his purposes, that he hath purposed against the inhabit
608, seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you. 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened. 
If a son shall ask bread of any of you that is a father, will he give him a stone? or if he ask a fish, will he for a fish give him a serpent? 
Or if he shall ask an egg, will he offer him a scorpion? 
If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him? 
And he was casting out a devil, and it was dumb. And it came to pass, 
548,n my mouth as honey for sweetness. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, go, get thee unto the house of Israel, and speak with my words unto them. 
For thou art not sent to a people of a strange speech and of an hard language, but to the house of Israel; 
Not to many people of a strange speech and of an hard language, whose words thou canst not understand. Surely, had I sent thee to them, they would have hearkened unto thee. 
But the house of Israel will not hearken unto thee; for they will not hearken unto me: for all the house of Israel are imp
516, he said, Dan is a lion's whelp: he shall leap from Bashan. 
And of Naphtali he said, O Naphtali, satisfied with favour, and full with the blessing of the LORD: possess thou the west and the south. 
And of Asher he said, Let Asher be blessed with children; let him be acceptable to his brethren, and let him dip his foot in oil. 
Thy shoes shall be iron and brass; and as thy days, so shall thy strength be. 
There is none like unto the God of Jeshurun, who rideth upon the heaven in thy help, and in his excellency 
501,d the boughs thereof were like the goodly cedars. 
She sent out her boughs unto the sea, and her branches unto the river. 
Why hast thou then broken down her hedges, so that all they which pass by the way do pluck her? 
The boar out of the wood doth waste it, and the wild beast of the field doth devour it. 
Return, we beseech thee, O God of hosts: look down from heaven, and behold, and visit this vine; 
And the vineyard which thy right hand hath planted, and the branch that thou madest strong for
701, unto me, and have made a king over you. 
And now, behold, the king walketh before you: and I am old and grayheaded; and, behold, my sons are with you: and I have walked before you from my childhood unto this day. 
Behold, here I am: witness against me before the LORD, and before his anointed: whose ox have I taken? or whose ass have I taken? or whom have I defrauded? whom have I oppressed? or of whose hand have I received any bribe to blind mine eyes therewith? and I will restore it you. 
And they said, Thou hast not defrauded us, nor oppressed us, neither hast thou taken ought of any man's hand. 
And he said unto them, The LORD is witness against you, and his anointed is witness this day, t
559,ow, that there shall be a resurrection of the dead, both of the just and unjust. 
And herein do I exercise myself, to have always a conscience void to offence toward God, and toward men. 
Now after many years I came to bring alms to my nation, and offerings. 
Whereupon certain Jews from Asia found me purified in the temple, neither with multitude, nor with tumult. 
Who ought to have been here before thee, and object, if they had ought against me. 
Or else let these same here say, if they have found any evil doing in me, while I stood before the council,
572, remnant of Israel. 
Behold, I will bring them from the north country, and gather them from the coasts of the earth, and with them the blind and the lame, the woman with child and her that travaileth with child together: a great company shall return thither. 
They shall come with weeping, and with supplications will I lead them: I will cause them to walk by the rivers of waters in a straight way, wherein they shall not stumble: for I am a father to Israel, and Ephraim is my firstborn. 
Hear the word of the LORD, O ye nations, and declare it in the isles afar off, an
618,ainst Job was his wrath kindled, because he justified himself rather than God. 
Also against his three friends was his wrath kindled, because they had found no answer, and yet had condemned Job. 
Now Elihu had waited till Job had spoken, because they were elder than he. 
When Elihu saw that there was no answer in the mouth of these three men, then his wrath was kindled. 
And Elihu the son of Barachel the Buzite answered and said, I am young, and ye are very old; wherefore I was afraid, and durst not shew you mine opinion. 
I said, Days should speak, and multitude of years should teach wisdom. 
But there is a sp
553,ade me and fashioned me together round about; yet thou dost destroy me. 
Remember, I beseech thee, that thou hast made me as the clay; and wilt thou bring me into dust again? 
Hast thou not poured me out as milk, and curdled me like cheese? 
Thou hast clothed me with skin and flesh, and hast fenced me with bones and sinews. 
Thou hast granted me life and favour, and thy visitation hath preserved my spirit. 
And these things hast thou hid in thine heart: I know that this is with thee. 
If I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt not acquit me fro
666, their brethren on this side Jordan westward. And when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, and with gold, and with brass, and with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your enemies with your brethren. 
And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel out of Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan, to go unto the country of Gilead, to the land of their possession, whereof they were possessed, according to the word of t
664,son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much people of the city was with her. 
And when the Lord saw her, he had compassion on her, and said unto her, Weep not. 
And he came and touched the bier: and they that bare him stood still. And he said, Young man, I say unto thee, Arise. 
And he that was dead sat up, and began to speak. And he delivered him to his mother. 
And there came a fear on all: and they glorified God, saying, That a great prophet is risen up among us; and, That God hath visited his people. 
And this rumour of him went forth throughout all Judaea, and throughout all the region round about. 
And the disciples of John shewed him of all the
496,arvest. 
And thou shalt not glean thy vineyard, neither shalt thou gather every grape of thy vineyard; thou shalt leave them for the poor and stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall not steal, neither deal falsely, neither lie one to another. 
And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
672,el and Judah. 
Then the people of the land took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and made him king in his father's stead in Jerusalem. 
Jehoahaz was twenty and three years old when he began to reign, and he reigned three months in Jerusalem. 
And the king of Egypt put him down at Jerusalem, and condemned the land in an hundred talents of silver and a talent of gold. 
And the king of Egypt made Eliakim his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem, and turned his name to Jehoiakim. And Necho took Jehoahaz his brother, and carried him to Egypt. 
Jehoiakim was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and he did that which was
700, to Abijah, 
The ninth to Jeshuah, the tenth to Shecaniah, 
The eleventh to Eliashib, the twelfth to Jakim, 
The thirteenth to Huppah, the fourteenth to Jeshebeab, 
The fifteenth to Bilgah, the sixteenth to Immer, 
The seventeenth to Hezir, the eighteenth to Aphses, 
The nineteenth to Pethahiah, the twentieth to Jehezekel, 
The one and twentieth to Jachin, the two and twentieth to Gamul, 
The three and twentieth to Delaiah, the four and twentieth to Maaziah. 
These were the orderings of them in their service to come into the house of the LORD, according to their manner, under Aaron their father, as the LORD God of Israel had commanded him. 
And the rest of the sons of Levi were these: Of the
708, did unto us, who believed on the Lord Jesus Christ; what was I, that I could withstand God? 
When they heard these things, they held their peace, and glorified God, saying, Then hath God also to the Gentiles granted repentance unto life. 
Now they which were scattered abroad upon the persecution that arose about Stephen travelled as far as Phenice, and Cyprus, and Antioch, preaching the word to none but unto the Jews only. 
And some of them were men of Cyprus and Cyrene, which, when they were come to Antioch, spake unto the Grecians, preaching the LORD Jesus. 
And the hand of the Lord was with them: and a great number believed, and turned unto the Lord. 
Then tidings of these things came unto the e
595,Jesus went up to Jerusalem. 
And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of money sitting: 
And when he had made a scourge of small cords, he drove them all out of the temple, and the sheep, and the oxen; and poured out the changers' money, and overthrew the tables; 
And said unto them that sold doves, Take these things hence; make not my Father's house an house of merchandise. 
And his disciples remembered that it was written, The zeal of thine house hath eaten me up. 
Then answered the Jews and said unto him, What sign shewest thou unto us, seeing 
700,he sat over against him, and lift up her voice, and wept. 
And God heard the voice of the lad; and the angel of God called to Hagar out of heaven, and said unto her, What aileth thee, Hagar? fear not; for God hath heard the voice of the lad where he is. 
Arise, lift up the lad, and hold him in thine hand; for I will make him a great nation. 
And God opened her eyes, and she saw a well of water; and she went, and filled the bottle with water, and gave the lad drink. 
And God was with the lad; and he grew, and dwelt in the wilderness, and became an archer. 
And he dwelt in the wilderness of Paran: and his mother took him a wife out of the land of Egypt. 
And it came to pass at that time, that 
538,vant warned: and in keeping of them there is great reward. 
Who can understand his errors? cleanse thou me from secret faults. 
Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins; let them not have dominion over me: then shall I be upright, and I shall be innocent from the great transgression. 
Let the words of my mouth, and the meditation of my heart, be acceptable in thy sight, O LORD, my strength, and my redeemer. 
The LORD hear thee in the day of trouble; the name of the God of Jacob defend thee; 
Send thee help from the sanctuar
551, them that they were not able to rise: they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength unto the battle: thou hast subdued under me those that rose up against me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies; that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They cried, but there was none to save them: even unto the LORD, but he answered them not. 
Then did I beat them small as the dust before the wind: I did cast them out as the dirt in the streets. 
Thou hast delivered me from the strivings of the people; and thou hast made m
652,d bitterness: 
Their feet are swift to shed blood: 
Destruction and misery are in their ways: 
And the way of peace have they not known: 
There is no fear of God before their eyes. 
Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world may become guilty before God. 
Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justified in his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin. 
But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets; 
Even the righteousness of God which is by faith of Jesus Christ 
601, and a man's heart was given to it. 
And behold another beast, a second, like to a bear, and it raised up itself on one side, and it had three ribs in the mouth of it between the teeth of it: and they said thus unto it, Arise, devour much flesh. 
After this I beheld, and lo another, like a leopard, which had upon the back of it four wings of a fowl; the beast had also four heads; and dominion was given to it. 
After this I saw in the night visions, and behold a fourth beast, dreadful and terrible, and strong exceedingly; and it had great iron teeth: it devoured and brake in pieces, and stamped 
554,them drunk in my fury, and I will bring down their strength to the earth. 
I will mention the lovingkindnesses of the LORD, and the praises of the LORD, according to all that the LORD hath bestowed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his
667,ut? or as one man mocketh another, do ye so mock him? 
He will surely reprove you, if ye do secretly accept persons. 
Shall not his excellency make you afraid? and his dread fall upon you? 
Your remembrances are like unto ashes, your bodies to bodies of clay. 
Hold your peace, let me alone, that I may speak, and let come on me what will. 
Wherefore do I take my flesh in my teeth, and put my life in mine hand? 
Though he slay me, yet will I trust in him: but I will maintain mine own ways before him. 
He also shall be my salvation: for an hypocrite shall not come before him. 
Hear diligently my speech, and my declaration with your ears. 
Behold now, I have orde
543,. 
And Jesus answering said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you, and suffer you? Bring thy son hither. 
And as he was yet a coming, the devil threw him down, and tare him. And Jesus rebuked the unclean spirit, and healed the child, and delivered him again to his father. 
And they were all amazed at the mighty power of God. But while they wondered every one at all things which Jesus did, he said unto his disciples, 
Let these sayings sink down into your ears: for the Son of man shall be delivered into the ha
665,e Holiest of all; 
Which had the golden censer, and the ark of the covenant overlaid round about with gold, wherein was the golden pot that had manna, and Aaron's rod that budded, and the tables of the covenant; 
And over it the cherubims of glory shadowing the mercyseat; of which we cannot now speak particularly. 
Now when these things were thus ordained, the priests went always into the first tabernacle, accomplishing the service of God. 
But into the second went the high priest alone once every year, not without blood, which he offered for himself, and for the errors of the people: 
The Holy Ghost this signifying, that the way into the holiest of all was
555,What be these two olive branches which through the two golden pipes empty the golden oil out of themselves? 
And he answered me and said, Knowest thou not what these be? And I said, No, my lord. 
Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the LORD of the whole earth. 
Then I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a flying roll. 
And he said unto me, What seest thou? And I answered, I see a flying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof ten cubits. 
Then said he unto me, This is the curse 
517,ificedst the first day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there thou shalt sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the season that thou camest forth out of Egypt. 
And thou shalt roast and eat it in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose: and thou shalt turn in the morning, and go unto thy tents. 
530, thou shalt be justified, and by thy words thou shalt be condemned. 
Then certain of the scribes and of the Pharisees answered, saying, Master, we would see a sign from thee. 
But he answered and said unto them, An evil and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given to it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas: 
For as Jonas was three days and three nights in the whale's belly; so shall the Son of man be three days and three nights in the heart of the earth. 
The men of Nineveh shall rise in jud
611,he sea became blood; 
And the third part of the creatures which were in the sea, and had life, died; and the third part of the ships were destroyed. 
And the third angel sounded, and there fell a great star from heaven, burning as it were a lamp, and it fell upon the third part of the rivers, and upon the fountains of waters; 
And the name of the star is called Wormwood: and the third part of the waters became wormwood; and many men died of the waters, because they were made bitter. 
And the fourth angel sounded, and the third part of the sun was smitten, and the third part of the moon, and the third par
563,y servant Isaiah hath walked naked and barefoot three years for a sign and wonder upon Egypt and upon Ethiopia; 
So shall the king of Assyria lead away the Egyptians prisoners, and the Ethiopians captives, young and old, naked and barefoot, even with their buttocks uncovered, to the shame of Egypt. 
And they shall be afraid and ashamed of Ethiopia their expectation, and of Egypt their glory. 
And the inhabitant of this isle shall say in that day, Behold, such is our expectation, whither we flee for help to be delivered from the king of Assyria: and how shal
660,her to the right hand or to the left. 
And when the ass saw the angel of the LORD, she fell down under Balaam: and Balaam's anger was kindled, and he smote the ass with a staff. 
And the LORD opened the mouth of the ass, and she said unto Balaam, What have I done unto thee, that thou hast smitten me these three times? 
And Balaam said unto the ass, Because thou hast mocked me: I would there were a sword in mine hand, for now would I kill thee. 
And the ass said unto Balaam, Am not I thine ass, upon which thou hast ridden ever since I was thine unto this day? was I ever wont to do so unto thee? and he said, Nay. 
Then the LORD opened the eyes of Balaam,
699,nd he said unto the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, selleth a parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it before the inhabitants, and before the elders of my people. If thou wilt redeem it, redeem it: but if thou wilt not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know: for there is none to redeem it beside thee; and I am after thee. And he said, I will redeem it. 
Then said Boaz, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of Naomi, thou must buy it also of Ruth the Moabitess, the wife of the dead, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance. 
And the kinsman said, I cannot redeem it for myself, lest I
492,ed for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 
And the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fenced cities, and of country villages, even unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the LORD: which stone remaineth unto this day in the field of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
And he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had look
640,ey fell before him on the ground. 
And Joseph said unto them, What deed is this that ye have done? wot ye not that such a man as I can certainly divine? 
And Judah said, What shall we say unto my lord? what shall we speak? or how shall we clear ourselves? God hath found out the iniquity of thy servants: behold, we are my lord's servants, both we, and he also with whom the cup is found. 
And he said, God forbid that I should do so: but the man in whose hand the cup is found, he shall be my servant; and as for you, get you up in peace unto your father. 
Then Judah came near unto him, and said, Oh my lord, let thy servant, I pray thee,
710,ndrakes. And he lay with her that night. 
And God hearkened unto Leah, and she conceived, and bare Jacob the fifth son. 
And Leah said, God hath given me my hire, because I have given my maiden to my husband: and she called his name Issachar. 
And Leah conceived again, and bare Jacob the sixth son. 
And Leah said, God hath endued me with a good dowry; now will my husband dwell with me, because I have born him six sons: and she called his name Zebulun. 
And afterwards she bare a daughter, and called her name Dinah. 
And God remembered Rachel, and God hearkened to her, and opened her womb. 
And she conceived, and bare a son; and said, God hath taken away my reproach: 
And she called his name Joseph; and
487,ing unto him, If thou wilt, thou canst make me clean. 
And Jesus, moved with compassion, put forth his hand, and touched him, and saith unto him, I will; be thou clean. 
And as soon as he had spoken, immediately the leprosy departed from him, and he was cleansed. 
And he straitly charged him, and forthwith sent him away; 
And saith unto him, See thou say nothing to any man: but go thy way, shew thyself to the priest, and offer for thy cleansing those things which Moses commanded, fo
696,eping thing that goeth upon all four, which have legs above their feet, to leap withal upon the earth; 
Even these of them ye may eat; the locust after his kind, and the bald locust after his kind, and the beetle after his kind, and the grasshopper after his kind. 
But all other flying creeping things, which have four feet, shall be an abomination unto you. 
And for these ye shall be unclean: whosoever toucheth the carcase of them shall be unclean until the even. 
And whosoever beareth ought of the carcase of them shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even. 
The carcases of every beast which divideth the hoof, and is not clovenfooted, nor cheweth the cud, are unclean unto you:
661, Bethhaccerem; he built it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
But the gate of the fountain repaired Shallun the son of Colhozeh, the ruler of part of Mizpah; he built it, and covered it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof, and the wall of the pool of Siloah by the king's garden, and unto the stairs that go down from the city of David. 
After him repaired Nehemiah the son of Azbuk, the ruler of the half part of Bethzur, unto the place over against the sepulchres of David, and to the pool that was made, and unto the house of the mighty. 
After him repaired the Levites, Rehum the son 
645,D by the hand of Moses. 
All those that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron and the chief of Israel numbered, after their families, and after the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old, every one that came to do the service of the ministry, and the service of the burden in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Even those that were numbered of them, were eight thousand and five hundred and fourscore, 
According to the commandment of the LORD they were numbered by the hand of Moses, every one according to his service, and according to his burden: thus were they numbered of him, as 
533,and I rebuked the nobles, and the rulers, and said unto them, Ye exact usury, every one of his brother. And I set a great assembly against them. 
And I said unto them, We after our ability have redeemed our brethren the Jews, which were sold unto the heathen; and will ye even sell your brethren? or shall they be sold unto us? Then held they their peace, and found nothing to answer. 
Also I said, It is not good that ye do: ought ye not to walk in the fear of our God because of the reproach of the heathen our enemies? 
I likewise
604,m in your vessels, and dwell in your cities that ye have taken. 
Likewise when all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the Ammonites, and in Edom, and that were in all the countries, heard that the king of Babylon had left a remnant of Judah, and that he had set over them Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan; 
Even all the Jews returned out of all places whither they were driven, and came to the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, unto Mizpah, and gathered wine and summer fruits very much. 
Moreover Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were in the fields, came to G
702,, there is power: and who may say unto him, What doest thou? 
Whoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no evil thing: and a wise man's heart discerneth both time and judgment. 
Because to every purpose there is time and judgment, therefore the misery of man is great upon him. 
For he knoweth not that which shall be: for who can tell him when it shall be? 
There is no man that hath power over the spirit to retain the spirit; neither hath he power in the day of death: and there is no discharge in that war; neither shall wickedness deliver those that are given to it. 
All this have I seen, and applied my heart unto every work that is done under the sun: there is a time wherein one man ruleth over
557,lem, to bring in to the LORD the collection that Moses the servant of God laid upon Israel in the wilderness. 
And all the princes and all the people rejoiced, and brought in, and cast into the chest, until they had made an end. 
Now it came to pass, that at what time the chest was brought unto the king's office by the hand of the Levites, and when they saw that there was much money, the king's scribe and the high priest's officer came and emptied the chest, and took it, and carried it to his place again. Thus they did day by day, and gathered money i
630,he king and the princes, Vashti the queen hath not done wrong to the king only, but also to all the princes, and to all the people that are in all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus. 
For this deed of the queen shall come abroad unto all women, so that they shall despise their husbands in their eyes, when it shall be reported, The king Ahasuerus commanded Vashti the queen to be brought in before him, but she came not. 
Likewise shall the ladies of Persia and Media say this day unto all the king's princes, which have heard of the deed of the queen. Thus shall there arise too much contempt and wrath. 
If it please the king,
638,t even there was upon the tabernacle as it were the appearance of fire, until the morning. 
So it was alway: the cloud covered it by day, and the appearance of fire by night. 
And when the cloud was taken up from the tabernacle, then after that the children of Israel journeyed: and in the place where the cloud abode, there the children of Israel pitched their tents. 
At the commandment of the LORD the children of Israel journeyed, and at the commandment of the LORD they pitched: as long as the cloud abode upon the tabernacle they rested in their tents. 
And when the cloud tarried long upon the tabernacle many days, then the childr
664,em, and rose again. 
Wherefore henceforth know we no man after the flesh: yea, though we have known Christ after the flesh, yet now henceforth know we him no more. 
Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old things are passed away; behold, all things are become new. 
And all things are of God, who hath reconciled us to himself by Jesus Christ, and hath given to us the ministry of reconciliation; 
To wit, that God was in Christ, reconciling the world unto himself, not imputing their trespasses unto them; and hath committed unto us the word of reconciliation. 
Now then we are ambassadors for Christ, as though God did beseech you by us: we p
655,s upon the right side of the candlestick and upon the left side thereof? 
And I answered again, and said unto him, What be these two olive branches which through the two golden pipes empty the golden oil out of themselves? 
And he answered me and said, Knowest thou not what these be? And I said, No, my lord. 
Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the LORD of the whole earth. 
Then I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a flying roll. 
And he said unto me, What seest thou? And I answered, I see a flying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof ten cubits. 
Then said he unto me, Thi
610,o speak with thee. 
But he answered and said unto him that told him, Who is my mother? and who are my brethren? 
And he stretched forth his hand toward his disciples, and said, Behold my mother and my brethren! 
For whosoever shall do the will of my Father which is in heaven, the same is my brother, and sister, and mother. 
The same day went Jesus out of the house, and sat by the sea side. 
And great multitudes were gathered together unto him, so that he went into a ship, and sat; and the whole multitude stood on the shore. 
And he spake many things unto them in parables, saying, Behold, a sower went fo
552,? As it were the company of two armies. 
How beautiful are thy feet with shoes, O prince's daughter! the joints of thy thighs are like jewels, the work of the hands of a cunning workman. 
Thy navel is like a round goblet, which wanteth not liquor: thy belly is like an heap of wheat set about with lilies. 
Thy two breasts are like two young roes that are twins. 
Thy neck is as a tower of ivory; thine eyes like the fishpools in Heshbon, by the gate of Bathrabbim: thy nose is as the tower of Lebanon which looketh toward Damascus. 
Thine head upon th
494,sockets under one board for his two tenons, and two sockets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side there shall be twenty boards: 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six boards. 
And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they shall be coupled together beneath
493,e first day of the month, that the tabernacle was reared up. 
And Moses reared up the tabernacle, and fastened his sockets, and set up the boards thereof, and put in the bars thereof, and reared up his pillars. 
And he spread abroad the tent over the tabernacle, and put the covering of the tent above upon it; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he took and put the testimony into the ark, and set the staves on the ark, and put the mercy seat above upon the ark: 
And he brought the ark into t
508,or as a thief, or as an evildoer, or as a busybody in other men's matters. 
Yet if any man suffer as a Christian, let him not be ashamed; but let him glorify God on this behalf. 
For the time is come that judgment must begin at the house of God: and if it first begin at us, what shall the end be of them that obey not the gospel of God? 
And if the righteous scarcely be saved, where shall the ungodly and the sinner appear? 
Wherefore let them that suffer according to the will of God commit the keeping of
568,ful saying, and these things I will that thou affirm constantly, that they which have believed in God might be careful to maintain good works. These things are good and profitable unto men. 
But avoid foolish questions, and genealogies, and contentions, and strivings about the law; for they are unprofitable and vain. 
A man that is an heretick after the first and second admonition reject; 
Knowing that he that is such is subverted, and sinneth, being condemned of himself. 
When I shall send Artemas unto thee, or Tychicus, be diligent to come unto me to Nicopolis
615,nd they shall hear the earth; 
And the earth shall hear the corn, and the wine, and the oil; and they shall hear Jezreel. 
And I will sow her unto me in the earth; and I will have mercy upon her that had not obtained mercy; and I will say to them which were not my people, Thou art my people; and they shall say, Thou art my God. 
Then said the LORD unto me, Go yet, love a woman beloved of her friend, yet an adulteress, according to the love of the LORD toward the children of Israel, who look to other gods, and love flagons of wine. 
So I bought her to me for fifteen pieces of silver, and for an homer of barle
692,ers to turn them to blood, and to smite the earth with all plagues, as often as they will. 
And when they shall have finished their testimony, the beast that ascendeth out of the bottomless pit shall make war against them, and shall overcome them, and kill them. 
And their dead bodies shall lie in the street of the great city, which spiritually is called Sodom and Egypt, where also our Lord was crucified. 
And they of the people and kindreds and tongues and nations shall see their dead bodies three days and an half, and shall not suffer their dead bodies to be put in graves. 
And they that dwell upon the earth shall rejoice over them, and make merry, and shall send gifts one to anoth
587, wrath was kindled against us: 
Then the waters had overwhelmed us, the stream had gone over our soul: 
Then the proud waters had gone over our soul. 
Blessed be the LORD, who hath not given us as a prey to their teeth. 
Our soul is escaped as a bird out of the snare of the fowlers: the snare is broken, and we are escaped. 
Our help is in the name of the LORD, who made heaven and earth. 
They that trust in the LORD shall be as mount Zion, which cannot be removed, but abideth for ever. 
As the mountains are round about Jerusalem, so the LORD is round about his people from hencefort
654,de thee a reproach unto the heathen, and a mocking to all countries. 
Those that be near, and those that be far from thee, shall mock thee, which art infamous and much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have the
496,thout blemish, of the beeves, of the sheep, or of the goats. 
But whatsoever hath a blemish, that shall ye not offer: for it shall not be acceptable for you. 
And whosoever offereth a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD to accomplish his vow, or a freewill offering in beeves or sheep, it shall be perfect to be accepted; there shall be no blemish therein. 
Blind, or broken, or maimed, or having a wen, or scurvy, or scabbed, ye shall not offer these unto the LORD, nor make an offering b
698, do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time. 
And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast devices against him. 
Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain. 
And both of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but 
683,: sweeter also than honey and the honeycomb. 
Moreover by them is thy servant warned: and in keeping of them there is great reward. 
Who can understand his errors? cleanse thou me from secret faults. 
Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins; let them not have dominion over me: then shall I be upright, and I shall be innocent from the great transgression. 
Let the words of my mouth, and the meditation of my heart, be acceptable in thy sight, O LORD, my strength, and my redeemer. 
The LORD hear thee in the day of trouble; the name of the God of Jacob defend thee; 
Send thee help from the sanctuary, and strengthen thee out of Zion; 
Remember all thy offerings, and acc
495,e a city of refuge for the slayer; and Mahanaim with her suburbs, 
Heshbon with her suburbs, Jazer with her suburbs; four cities in all. 
So all the cities for the children of Merari by their families, which were remaining of the families of the Levites, were by their lot twelve cities. 
All the cities of the Levites within the possession of the children of Israel were forty and eight cities with their suburbs. 
These cities were every one with their suburbs round about them: thus were all 
699,hall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me. 
And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming. 
And he asked his father, How long is it ago since this came unto him? And he said, Of a child. 
And ofttimes it hath cast him into the fire, and into the waters, to destroy him: but if thou canst do any thing, have compassion on us, and help us. 
Jesus said unto him, If thou canst believe, all things are possible to him that believeth. 
And straightway the father of the child cried out, and said with tears, Lord, I believe; help thou mine unbelief. 
When Jesus saw that the people came runni
662,t I deliver you from the Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines? 
The Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I delivered you out of their hand. 
Yet ye have forsaken me, and served other gods: wherefore I will deliver you no more. 
Go and cry unto the gods which ye have chosen; let them deliver you in the time of your tribulation. 
And the children of Israel said unto the LORD, We have sinned: do thou unto us whatsoever seemeth good unto thee; deliver us only, we pray thee, this day. 
And they put away the strange gods from among them, and served the L
714, under the cherub, and fill thine hand with coals of fire from between the cherubims, and scatter them over the city. And he went in in my sight. 
Now the cherubims stood on the right side of the house, when the man went in; and the cloud filled the inner court. 
Then the glory of the LORD went up from the cherub, and stood over the threshold of the house; and the house was filled with the cloud, and the court was full of the brightness of the LORD's glory. 
And the sound of the cherubims' wings was heard even to the outer court, as the voice of the Almighty God when he speaketh. 
And it came to pass, that when he had commanded the man clothed with linen, saying, Take fire from between the wheels, from be
509,sellors, and the captains, have consulted together to establish a royal statute, and to make a firm decree, that whosoever shall ask a petition of any God or man for thirty days, save of thee, O king, he shall be cast into the den of lions. 
Now, O king, establish the decree, and sign the writing, that it be not changed, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which altereth not. 
Wherefore king Darius signed the writing and the decree. 
Now when Daniel knew that the writing was signed, he went i
539, under the hands of their father Jeduthun, who prophesied with a harp, to give thanks and to praise the LORD. 
Of Heman: the sons of Heman: Bukkiah, Mattaniah, Uzziel, Shebuel, and Jerimoth, Hananiah, Hanani, Eliathah, Giddalti, and Romamtiezer, Joshbekashah, Mallothi, Hothir, and Mahazioth: 
All these were the sons of Heman the king's seer in the words of God, to lift up the horn. And God gave to Heman fourteen sons and three daughters. 
All these were under the hands of their father for song in the house of the LORD, with cymbals, 
494,ts: for that is good and acceptable before God. 
Now she that is a widow indeed, and desolate, trusteth in God, and continueth in supplications and prayers night and day. 
But she that liveth in pleasure is dead while she liveth. 
And these things give in charge, that they may be blameless. 
But if any provide not for his own, and specially for those of his own house, he hath denied the faith, and is worse than an infidel. 
Let not a widow be taken into the number under threescore years ol
496,
And I will spread my net upon him, and he shall be taken in my snare, and I will bring him to Babylon, and will plead with him there for his trespass that he hath trespassed against me. 
And all his fugitives with all his bands shall fall by the sword, and they that remain shall be scattered toward all winds: and ye shall know that I the LORD have spoken it. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also take of the highest branch of the high cedar, and will set it; I will crop off from the top of h
649,on the hem of the robe, round about between the pomegranates; 
A bell and a pomegranate, a bell and a pomegranate, round about the hem of the robe to minister in; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they made coats of fine linen of woven work for Aaron, and for his sons, 
And a mitre of fine linen, and goodly bonnets of fine linen, and linen breeches of fine twined linen, 
And a girdle of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, of needlework; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they made the plate of the holy crown of pure gold, and wrote upon it a writing, like to the engravings of a signet, HOLINESS TO THE LORD. 
And they tied un
581,three, he was more honourable than the two; for he was their captain: howbeit he attained not to the first three. 
Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man of Kabzeel, who had done many acts; he slew two lionlike men of Moab: also he went down and slew a lion in a pit in a snowy day. 
And he slew an Egyptian, a man of great stature, five cubits high; and in the Egyptian's hand was a spear like a weaver's beam; and he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son
564,hee are too many for me to give the Midianites into their hands, lest Israel vaunt themselves against me, saying, Mine own hand hath saved me. 
Now therefore go to, proclaim in the ears of the people, saying, Whosoever is fearful and afraid, let him return and depart early from mount Gilead. And there returned of the people twenty and two thousand; and there remained ten thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people are yet too many; bring them down unto the water, and I will try them for thee there: and it shall be, that of whom I say unto thee, This
588, Kemuel: of the Aaronites, Zadok: 
Of Judah, Elihu, one of the brethren of David: of Issachar, Omri the son of Michael: 
Of Zebulun, Ishmaiah the son of Obadiah: of Naphtali, Jerimoth the son of Azriel: 
Of the children of Ephraim, Hoshea the son of Azaziah: of the half tribe of Manasseh, Joel the son of Pedaiah: 
Of the half tribe of Manasseh in Gilead, Iddo the son of Zechariah: of Benjamin, Jaasiel the son of Abner: 
Of Dan, Azareel the son of Jeroham. These were the princes of the tribes of Israel. 
But David took not the number of them from twenty years old and under: because 
634,thousand horsemen, and people as the sand which is on the sea shore in multitude: and they came up, and pitched in Michmash, eastward from Bethaven. 
When the men of Israel saw that they were in a strait, (for the people were distressed,) then the people did hide themselves in caves, and in thickets, and in rocks, and in high places, and in pits. 
And some of the Hebrews went over Jordan to the land of Gad and Gilead. As for Saul, he was yet in Gilgal, and all the people followed him trembling. 
And he tarried seven days, according to the set time that Samuel had appointed: but Samuel came not to Gilgal; and the people were sc
492,rings unto her, we have wanted all things, and have been consumed by the sword and by the famine. 
And when we burned incense to the queen of heaven, and poured out drink offerings unto her, did we make her cakes to worship her, and pour out drink offerings unto her, without our men? 
Then Jeremiah said unto all the people, to the men, and to the women, and to all the people which had given him that answer, saying, 
The incense that ye burned in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of
514, their sacrifices. 
Hear ye this, O priests; and hearken, ye house of Israel; and give ye ear, O house of the king; for judgment is toward you, because ye have been a snare on Mizpah, and a net spread upon Tabor. 
And the revolters are profound to make slaughter, though I have been a rebuker of them all. 
I know Ephraim, and Israel is not hid from me: for now, O Ephraim, thou committest whoredom, and Israel is defiled. 
They will not frame their doings to turn unto their God: for the spirit of whoredoms is in
620,or the Holy Ghost shall teach you in the same hour what ye ought to say. 
And one of the company said unto him, Master, speak to my brother, that he divide the inheritance with me. 
And he said unto him, Man, who made me a judge or a divider over you? 
And he said unto them, Take heed, and beware of covetousness: for a man's life consisteth not in the abundance of the things which he possesseth. 
And he spake a parable unto them, saying, The ground of a certain rich man brought forth plentifully: 
And he thought within himself, saying, What shall I do, because I have no room where to bestow my fruits? 
And he sai
602,y: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem. 
And ye are witnesses of these things. 
And, behold, I send the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry ye in the city of Jerusalem, until ye be endued with power from on high. 
And he led them out as far as to Bethany, and he lifted up his hands, and blessed them. 
And it came to pass, while he blessed them, he was parted from them, and carried up into heaven. 
And they worshipped him, and returned to Jerusalem with great joy: 
And were continually in the temple, praising and
704,ore thus saith the LORD, If thou return, then will I bring thee again, and thou shalt stand before me: and if thou take forth the precious from the vile, thou shalt be as my mouth: let them return unto thee; but return not thou unto them. 
And I will make thee unto this people a fenced brasen wall: and they shall fight against thee, but they shall not prevail against thee: for I am with thee to save thee and to deliver thee, saith the LORD. 
And I will deliver thee out of the hand of the wicked, and I will redeem thee out of the hand of the terrible. 
The word of the LORD came also unto me, saying, 
Thou shalt not take thee a wife, neither shalt thou have sons or daughters in this place. 
For th
578, man: neither may he contend with him that is mightier than he. 
Seeing there be many things that increase vanity, what is man the better? 
For who knoweth what is good for man in this life, all the days of his vain life which he spendeth as a shadow? for who can tell a man what shall be after him under the sun? 
A good name is better than precious ointment; and the day of death than the day of one's birth. 
It is better to go to the house of mourning, than to go to the house of feasting: for that is the end of all men; and the living will lay it to his heart. 
Sorrow is 
541,our tongues the wonderful works of God. 
And they were all amazed, and were in doubt, saying one to another, What meaneth this? 
Others mocking said, These men are full of new wine. 
But Peter, standing up with the eleven, lifted up his voice, and said unto them, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you, and hearken to my words: 
For these are not drunken, as ye suppose, seeing it is but the third hour of the day. 
But this is that which was spoken by the prophet Joel; 
And it shall come to pass in t
576,ron the silver, which he had named in the audience of the sons of Heth, four hundred shekels of silver, current money with the merchant. 
And the field of Ephron which was in Machpelah, which was before Mamre, the field, and the cave which was therein, and all the trees that were in the field, that were in all the borders round about, were made sure 
Unto Abraham for a possession in the presence of the children of Heth, before all that went in at the gate of his city. 
And after this, Abraham buried Sarah his wife in the cave of the field of Machpelah before Mamre: the 
635,the dead are raised up, and the poor have the gospel preached to them. 
And blessed is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me. 
And as they departed, Jesus began to say unto the multitudes concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness to see? A reed shaken with the wind? 
But what went ye out for to see? A man clothed in soft raiment? behold, they that wear soft clothing are in kings' houses. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? yea, I say unto you, and more than a prophet. 
For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
Verily I s
559,have sent with him the brother, whose praise is in the gospel throughout all the churches; 
And not that only, but who was also chosen of the churches to travel with us with this grace, which is administered by us to the glory of the same Lord, and declaration of your ready mind: 
Avoiding this, that no man should blame us in this abundance which is administered by us: 
Providing for honest things, not only in the sight of the Lord, but also in the sight of men. 
And we have sent with them our brother, whom we have oftentimes proved diligent in many thi
566,hall be accepted upon mine altar; for mine house shall be called an house of prayer for all people. 
The Lord GOD, which gathereth the outcasts of Israel saith, Yet will I gather others to him, beside those that are gathered unto him. 
All ye beasts of the field, come to devour, yea, all ye beasts in the forest. 
His watchmen are blind: they are all ignorant, they are all dumb dogs, they cannot bark; sleeping, lying down, loving to slumber. 
Yea, they are greedy dogs which can never have enough, and they are shepherds that cannot understand: they all look to t
548,old, he will not depart from it. 
The rich ruleth over the poor, and the borrower is servant to the lender. 
He that soweth iniquity shall reap vanity: and the rod of his anger shall fail. 
He that hath a bountiful eye shall be blessed; for he giveth of his bread to the poor. 
Cast out the scorner, and contention shall go out; yea, strife and reproach shall cease. 
He that loveth pureness of heart, for the grace of his lips the king shall be his friend. 
The eyes of the LORD preserve knowledge, and he overthroweth the words of the transgresso
500,dred twenty and eight. 
And Joel the son of Zichri was their overseer: and Judah the son of Senuah was second over the city. 
Of the priests: Jedaiah the son of Joiarib, Jachin. 
Seraiah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, was the ruler of the house of God. 
And their brethren that did the work of the house were eight hundred twenty and two: and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pelaliah, the son of Amzi, the son of Zechariah, t
619, in the house of the LORD shall flourish in the courts of our God. 
They shall still bring forth fruit in old age; they shall be fat and flourishing; 
To shew that the LORD is upright: he is my rock, and there is no unrighteousness in him. 
The LORD reigneth, he is clothed with majesty; the LORD is clothed with strength, wherewith he hath girded himself: the world also is stablished, that it cannot be moved. 
Thy throne is established of old: thou art from everlasting. 
The floods have lifted up, O LORD, the floods have lifted up their voice; the floods lift up their waves. 
The LORD on high is mightier than the
635,are thy bone and thy flesh. 
And moreover in time past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD thy God said unto thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my people Israel. 
Therefore came all the elders of Israel to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD by Samuel. 
And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where the Jebusites were, the inhabitants of the land. 
And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, Thou 
604,ad made for fear of Baasha king of Israel: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah filled it with them that were slain. 
Then Ishmael carried away captive all the residue of the people that were in Mizpah, even the king's daughters, and all the people that remained in Mizpah, whom Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had committed to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah carried them away captive, and departed to go over to the Ammonites. 
But when Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethani
665,s shall pursue his enemies. 
What do ye imagine against the LORD? he will make an utter end: affliction shall not rise up the second time. 
For while they be folden together as thorns, and while they are drunken as drunkards, they shall be devoured as stubble fully dry. 
There is one come out of thee, that imagineth evil against the LORD, a wicked counsellor. 
Thus saith the LORD; Though they be quiet, and likewise many, yet thus shall they be cut down, when he shall pass through. Though I have afflicted thee, I will afflict thee no more. 
For now will I break his yoke from off thee, and will burst thy bonds in sunder. 
And the LORD hath given a commandment
622,of the people compass thee about: for their sakes therefore return thou on high. 
The LORD shall judge the people: judge me, O LORD, according to my righteousness, and according to mine integrity that is in me. 
Oh let the wickedness of the wicked come to an end; but establish the just: for the righteous God trieth the hearts and reins. 
My defence is of God, which saveth the upright in heart. 
God judgeth the righteous, and God is angry with the wicked every day. 
If he turn not, he will whet his sword; he hath bent his bow, and made it ready. 
He hath also prepared for him the instruments of death; he ordaineth h
672,RD have brought down the high tree, have exalted the low tree, have dried up the green tree, and have made the dry tree to flourish: I the LORD have spoken and have done it. 
The word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 
What mean ye, that ye use this proverb concerning the land of Israel, saying, The fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the children's teeth are set on edge? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, ye shall not have occasion any more to use this proverb in Israel. 
Behold, all souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also the soul of the son is mine: the soul that sinneth, it shall die. 
But if a man be just, and do that which is lawful and right, 
667,multitude, with horses and chariots very many. 
And when all these kings were met together, they came and pitched together at the waters of Merom, to fight against Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Be not afraid because of them: for to morrow about this time will I deliver them up all slain before Israel: thou shalt hough their horses, and burn their chariots with fire. 
So Joshua came, and all the people of war with him, against them by the waters of Merom suddenly; and they fell upon them. 
And the LORD delivered them into the hand of Israel, who smote them, and chased them unto great Zidon, and unto Misrephothmaim, and unto the valley of Mizpeh eastw
551, killed the rams, they sprinkled the blood upon the altar: they killed also the lambs, and they sprinkled the blood upon the altar. 
And they brought forth the he goats for the sin offering before the king and the congregation; and they laid their hands upon them: 
And the priests killed them, and they made reconciliation with their blood upon the altar, to make an atonement for all Israel: for the king commanded that the burnt offering and the sin offering should be made for all Israel. 
And he set the Levites in the house of the LORD with cymb
631,th and my song; he also is become my salvation. 
Therefore with joy shall ye draw water out of the wells of salvation. 
And in that day shall ye say, Praise the LORD, call upon his name, declare his doings among the people, make mention that his name is exalted. 
Sing unto the LORD; for he hath done excellent things: this is known in all the earth. 
Cry out and shout, thou inhabitant of Zion: for great is the Holy One of Israel in the midst of thee. 
The burden of Babylon, which Isaiah the son of Amoz did see. 
Lift ye up a banner upon the high mountain, exalt the voice unto them, shake the hand, that they may go into the g
636,es thereof were before them: and it had palm trees, one on this side, and another on that side, upon the posts thereof. 
And there was a gate in the inner court toward the south: and he measured from gate to gate toward the south an hundred cubits. 
And he brought me to the inner court by the south gate: and he measured the south gate according to these measures; 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches round about were
604,These things understood not his disciples at the first: but when Jesus was glorified, then remembered they that these things were written of him, and that they had done these things unto him. 
The people therefore that was with him when he called Lazarus out of his grave, and raised him from the dead, bare record. 
For this cause the people also met him, for that they heard that he had done this miracle. 
The Pharisees therefore said among themselves, Perceive ye how ye prevail nothing? behold, the world is gone after him. 
And there were certain Greeks among them that came up to worship at the fe
710,h faileth: he drinketh no water, and is faint. 
The carpenter stretcheth out his rule; he marketh it out with a line; he fitteth it with planes, and he marketh it out with the compass, and maketh it after the figure of a man, according to the beauty of a man; that it may remain in the house. 
He heweth him down cedars, and taketh the cypress and the oak, which he strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest: he planteth an ash, and the rain doth nourish it. 
Then shall it be for a man to burn: for he will take thereof, and warm himself; yea, he kindleth it, and baketh bread; yea, he maketh a god, and worshippeth it; he maketh it a graven image, and falleth down thereto. 
He burneth part the
708,efore I am full of the fury of the LORD; I am weary with holding in: I will pour it out upon the children abroad, and upon the assembly of young men together: for even the husband with the wife shall be taken, the aged with him that is full of days. 
And their houses shall be turned unto others, with their fields and wives together: for I will stretch out my hand upon the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD. 
For from the least of them even unto the greatest of them every one is given to covetousness; and from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth falsely. 
They have healed also the hurt of the daughter of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace. 
Were they 
676,ith you armed, they shall have possessions among you in the land of Canaan. 
And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben answered, saying, As the LORD hath said unto thy servants, so will we do. 
We will pass over armed before the LORD into the land of Canaan, that the possession of our inheritance on this side Jordan may be our's. 
And Moses gave unto them, even to the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, and unto half the tribe of Manasseh the son of Joseph, the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, and the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, the land, with the cities thereof in the coasts, even the cities of the country round about. 
And the children o
486,, They will reverence my son. 
But when the husbandmen saw the son, they said among themselves, This is the heir; come, let us kill him, and let us seize on his inheritance. 
And they caught him, and cast him out of the vineyard, and slew him. 
When the lord therefore of the vineyard cometh, what will he do unto those husbandmen? 
They say unto him, He will miserably destroy those wicked men, and will let out his vineyard unto other husbandmen, which shall render him the fruits in 
672,r iniquities have ye sold yourselves, and for your transgressions is your mother put away. 
Wherefore, when I came, was there no man? when I called, was there none to answer? Is my hand shortened at all, that it cannot redeem? or have I no power to deliver? behold, at my rebuke I dry up the sea, I make the rivers a wilderness: their fish stinketh, because there is no water, and dieth for thirst. 
I clothe the heavens with blackness, and I make sackcloth their covering. 
The Lord GOD hath given me the tongue of the learned, that I should know how to speak a word in season to him that is weary: he wakeneth morning by morning, he wakeneth mine ear to hear as the lear
696,nd their king shall go into captivity, he and his princes together, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Moab, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he burned the bones of the king of Edom into lime: 
But I will send a fire upon Moab, and it shall devour the palaces of Kirioth: and Moab shall die with tumult, with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet: 
And I will cut off the judge from the midst thereof, and will slay all the princes thereof with him, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Judah, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have despised the law of the L
679,y say among the people, Where is their God? 
Then will the LORD be jealous for his land, and pity his people. 
Yea, the LORD will answer and say unto his people, Behold, I will send you corn, and wine, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied therewith: and I will no more make you a reproach among the heathen: 
But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things. 
Fear not, O land; be glad and rejoice: for the LORD will do great things. 
Be not afraid,
626, the wilderness of Ziph. 
And Saul pitched in the hill of Hachilah, which is before Jeshimon, by the way. But David abode in the wilderness, and he saw that Saul came after him into the wilderness. 
David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come in very deed. 
And David arose, and came to the place where Saul had pitched: and David beheld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay in the trench, and the people pitched round about him. 
Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who w
609,nister in the holy place. 
And thou shalt take the ram of the consecration, and seethe his flesh in the holy place. 
And Aaron and his sons shall eat the flesh of the ram, and the bread that is in the basket by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was made, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, because they are holy. 
And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread, remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy. 
And t
692,o that the land was darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the fruit of the trees which the hail had left: and there remained not any green thing in the trees, or in the herbs of the field, through all the land of Egypt. 
Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron in haste; and he said, I have sinned against the LORD your God, and against you. 
Now therefore forgive, I pray thee, my sin only this once, and intreat the LORD your God, that he may take away from me this death only. 
And he went out from Pharaoh, and intreated the LORD. 
And the LORD turned a mighty strong west wind, which took away the locusts, and cast them into the Red sea; there remained not one locu
649,the corn is wasted: the new wine is dried up, the oil languisheth. 
Be ye ashamed, O ye husbandmen; howl, O ye vinedressers, for the wheat and for the barley; because the harvest of the field is perished. 
The vine is dried up, and the fig tree languisheth; the pomegranate tree, the palm tree also, and the apple tree, even all the trees of the field, are withered: because joy is withered away from the sons of men. 
Gird yourselves, and lament, ye priests: howl, ye ministers of the altar: come, lie all night in sackcloth, ye ministers of my God: for the meat offering and the drink offering is withholden from the house of your God. 
Sanctify y
607,r over my people Israel: 
And I have been with thee whithersoever thou hast walked, and have cut off all thine enemies from before thee, and have made thee a name like the name of the great men that are in the earth. 
Also I will ordain a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, and they shall dwell in their place, and shall be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness waste them any more, as at the beginning, 
And since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel. Moreover I will subdue all thine enemies. Furthermore I tell thee that the LORD will build thee an
667,h all their might, and with singing, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets. 
And when they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put his hand to the ark: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of D
484,hall perish, and the great houses shall have an end, saith the LORD. 
Hear this word, ye kine of Bashan, that are in the mountain of Samaria, which oppress the poor, which crush the needy, which say to their masters, Bring, and let us drink. 
The Lord GOD hath sworn by his holiness, that, lo, the days shall come upon you, that he will take you away with hooks, and your posterity with fishhooks. 
And ye shall go out at the breaches, every cow at that which is before her; and ye sh
509,yes shalt thou behold and see the reward of the wicked. 
Because thou hast made the LORD, which is my refuge, even the most High, thy habitation; 
There shall no evil befall thee, neither shall any plague come nigh thy dwelling. 
For he shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee in all thy ways. 
They shall bear thee up in their hands, lest thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
Thou shalt tread upon the lion and adder: the young lion and the dragon shalt thou trample under feet. 
Because he hath
510,dducees, which deny that there is any resurrection; and they asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses wrote unto us, If any man's brother die, having a wife, and he die without children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
There were therefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died without children. 
And the second took her to wife, and he died childless. 
And the third took her; and in like manner the seven also: and they left no children, and died. 
Last of 
556,the horse deliver himself. 
And he that is courageous among the mighty shall flee away naked in that day, saith the LORD. 
Hear this word that the LORD hath spoken against you, O children of Israel, against the whole family which I brought up from the land of Egypt, saying, 
You only have I known of all the families of the earth: therefore I will punish you for all your iniquities. 
Can two walk together, except they be agreed? 
Will a lion roar in the forest, when he hath no prey? will a young lion cry out of his den, if he have taken nothing? 
Can 
559,of themselves with mankind, 
Nor thieves, nor covetous, nor drunkards, nor revilers, nor extortioners, shall inherit the kingdom of God. 
And such were some of you: but ye are washed, but ye are sanctified, but ye are justified in the name of the Lord Jesus, and by the Spirit of our God. 
All things are lawful unto me, but all things are not expedient: all things are lawful for me, but I will not be brought under the power of any. 
Meats for the belly, and the belly for meats: but God shall destroy both it and them. Now the body is not for fornication, 
537,ill do to Gibeah; we will go up by lot against it; 
And we will take ten men of an hundred throughout all the tribes of Israel, and an hundred of a thousand, and a thousand out of ten thousand, to fetch victual for the people, that they may do, when they come to Gibeah of Benjamin, according to all the folly that they have wrought in Israel. 
So all the men of Israel were gathered against the city, knit together as one man. 
And the tribes of Israel sent men through all the tribe of Benjamin, saying, What wickedness is this that is
600,e Baalzephon: and they pitched before Migdol. 
And they departed from before Pihahiroth, and passed through the midst of the sea into the wilderness, and went three days'journey in the wilderness of Etham, and pitched in Marah. 
And they removed from Marah, and came unto Elim: and in Elim were twelve fountains of water, and threescore and ten palm trees; and they pitched there. 
And they removed from Elim, and encamped by the Red sea. 
And they removed from the Red sea, and encamped in the wilderness of Sin. 
And they took their journey out of the wilderness of Sin, and encamped in Dophkah. 
A
583,aying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast thou killed, and also taken possession? And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, In the place where dogs licked the blood of Naboth shall dogs lick thy blood, even thine. 
And Ahab said to Elijah, Hast thou found me, O mine enemy? And he answered, I have found thee: because thou hast sold thyself to work evil in the sight of the LORD. 
Behold, I will bring evil upon thee, and will take away thy posterity, and will cut off from Ahab him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Israel, 
And will make t
580,inhabitants. 
Ye shall therefore keep my statutes and my judgments, and shall not commit any of these abominations; neither any of your own nation, nor any stranger that sojourneth among you: 
(For all these abominations have the men of the land done, which were before you, and the land is defiled;) 
That the land spue not you out also, when ye defile it, as it spued out the nations that were before you. 
For whosoever shall commit any of these abominations, even the souls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep mine ordinance, th
547,us against me, saith the LORD. 
Thy way and thy doings have procured these things unto thee; this is thy wickedness, because it is bitter, because it reacheth unto thine heart. 
My bowels, my bowels! I am pained at my very heart; my heart maketh a noise in me; I cannot hold my peace, because thou hast heard, O my soul, the sound of the trumpet, the alarm of war. 
Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is spoiled: suddenly are my tents spoiled, and my curtains in a moment. 
How long shall I see the standard, and hear the so
669,amilies. 
But Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are the names of his daughters, Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren. Therefore according to the commandment of the LORD he gave them an inheritance among the brethren of their father. 
And there fell ten portions to Manasseh, beside the land of Gilead and Bashan, which were on the other side Jordan; 
Because the daughters of Manasse
518,agreed not together. 
And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying, 
We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with hands, and within three days I will build another made without hands. 
But neither so did their witness agree together. 
And the high priest stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus, saying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee? 
But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him, and said unto him, Art tho
629,s. 
Now the birth of Jesus Christ was on this wise: When as his mother Mary was espoused to Joseph, before they came together, she was found with child of the Holy Ghost. 
Then Joseph her husband, being a just man, and not willing to make her a publick example, was minded to put her away privily. 
But while he thought on these things, behold, the angel of the LORD appeared unto him in a dream, saying, Joseph, thou son of David, fear not to take unto thee Mary thy wife: for that which is conceived in her is of the Holy Ghost. 
And she shall bring forth a son, and thou shalt call his name JESUS: for he shall save his people
542,rrupt yourselves, and turn aside from the way which I have commanded you; and evil will befall you in the latter days; because ye will do evil in the sight of the LORD, to provoke him to anger through the work of your hands. 
And Moses spake in the ears of all the congregation of Israel the words of this song, until they were ended. 
Give ear, O ye heavens, and I will speak; and hear, O earth, the words of my mouth. 
My doctrine shall drop as the rain, my speech shall distil as the dew, as the small rain upon the tender herb, and as the
558,e and harvest, and cold and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease. 
And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth. 
And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of the earth, and upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth upon the earth, and upon all the fishes of the sea; into your hand are they delivered. 
Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you; even as the green herb have I given you all things. 
But flesh with the life ther
538,ve the blessings of my progenitors unto the utmost bound of the everlasting hills: they shall be on the head of Joseph, and on the crown of the head of him that was separate from his brethren. 
Benjamin shall ravin as a wolf: in the morning he shall devour the prey, and at night he shall divide the spoil. 
All these are the twelve tribes of Israel: and this is it that their father spake unto them, and blessed them; every one according to his blessing he blessed them. 
And he charged them, and said unto them, I am to be gathered unto
576,, and take their pledge. 
Now Saul, and they, and all the men of Israel, were in the valley of Elah, fighting with the Philistines. 
And David rose up early in the morning, and left the sheep with a keeper, and took, and went, as Jesse had commanded him; and he came to the trench, as the host was going forth to the fight, and shouted for the battle. 
For Israel and the Philistines had put the battle in array, army against army. 
And David left his carriage in the hand of the keeper of the carriage, and ran into the army, and came and saluted his brethren. 
And as he tal
676,hen he came out of Padanaram, and blessed him. 
And God said unto him, Thy name is Jacob: thy name shall not be called any more Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his name Israel. 
And God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply; a nation and a company of nations shall be of thee, and kings shall come out of thy loins; 
And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee will I give the land. 
And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him. 
And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he talked with him, even a pillar of stone: and he poured a drink offering thereon, and he
699,red for himself, and for the errors of the people: 
The Holy Ghost this signifying, that the way into the holiest of all was not yet made manifest, while as the first tabernacle was yet standing: 
Which was a figure for the time then present, in which were offered both gifts and sacrifices, that could not make him that did the service perfect, as pertaining to the conscience; 
Which stood only in meats and drinks, and divers washings, and carnal ordinances, imposed on them until the time of reformation. 
But Christ being come an high priest of good things to come, by a greater and more perfect tabernacle, not made with hands, that is to say, not of this building; 
Neither by the blood of go
609,is day: consider of it, take advice, and speak your minds. 
Then all the children of Israel went out, and the congregation was gathered together as one man, from Dan even to Beersheba, with the land of Gilead, unto the LORD in Mizpeh. 
And the chief of all the people, even of all the tribes of Israel, presented themselves in the assembly of the people of God, four hundred thousand footmen that drew sword. 
(Now the children of Benjamin heard that the children of Israel were gone up to Mizpeh.) Then said the children of Israel, Tell us, how was this wickedness? 
And the Levite, the husband of the woman 
528, and brake in pieces the rocks before the LORD; but the LORD was not in the wind: and after the wind an earthquake; but the LORD was not in the earthquake: 
And after the earthquake a fire; but the LORD was not in the fire: and after the fire a still small voice. 
And it was so, when Elijah heard it, that he wrapped his face in his mantle, and went out, and stood in the entering in of the cave. And, behold, there came a voice unto him, and said, What doest thou here, Elijah? 
And he said, I have been very jealous for the L
494,at day that I am he that doth speak: behold, it is I. 
How beautiful upon the mountains are the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace; that bringeth good tidings of good, that publisheth salvation; that saith unto Zion, Thy God reigneth! 
Thy watchmen shall lift up the voice; with the voice together shall they sing: for they shall see eye to eye, when the LORD shall bring again Zion. 
Break forth into joy, sing together, ye waste places of Jerusalem: for the LORD ha
547,u, and thy seed after thee in their generations. 
This is my covenant, which ye shall keep, between me and you and thy seed after thee; Every man child among you shall be circumcised. 
And ye shall circumcise the flesh of your foreskin; and it shall be a token of the covenant betwixt me and you. 
And he that is eight days old shall be circumcised among you, every man child in your generations, he that is born in the house, or bought with money of any stranger, which is not of thy seed. 
He that is born in thy house, and he that is bought wit
617,any more: 
And the high places of Isaac shall be desolate, and the sanctuaries of Israel shall be laid waste; and I will rise against the house of Jeroboam with the sword. 
Then Amaziah the priest of Bethel sent to Jeroboam king of Israel, saying, Amos hath conspired against thee in the midst of the house of Israel: the land is not able to bear all his words. 
For thus Amos saith, Jeroboam shall die by the sword, and Israel shall surely be led away captive out of their own land. 
Also Amaziah said unto Amos, O thou seer, go, flee thee away into the land of Judah, and there eat bread, and prophesy there: 
But p
531,sing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am thy son, thy firstborn Esau. 
And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he that hath taken venison, and brought it me, and I have eaten o
638,D, she shall be praised. 
Give her of the fruit of her hands; and let her own works praise her in the gates. 
The words of the Preacher, the son of David, king in Jerusalem. 
Vanity of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is vanity. 
What profit hath a man of all his labour which he taketh under the sun? 
One generation passeth away, and another generation cometh: but the earth abideth for ever. 
The sun also ariseth, and the sun goeth down, and hasteth to his place where he arose. 
The wind goeth toward the south, and turneth about unto the north; it whirleth about continually, and the wind returneth again accord
625, she bare them. 
And the boys grew: and Esau was a cunning hunter, a man of the field; and Jacob was a plain man, dwelling in tents. 
And Isaac loved Esau, because he did eat of his venison: but Rebekah loved Jacob. 
And Jacob sod pottage: and Esau came from the field, and he was faint: 
And Esau said to Jacob, Feed me, I pray thee, with that same red pottage; for I am faint: therefore was his name called Edom. 
And Jacob said, Sell me this day thy birthright. 
And Esau said, Behold, I am at the point to die: and what profit shall this birthright do to me? 
And Jacob said, Swear to me this day; and he sware unto him: 
625,that Jacob gave to his son Joseph. 
Now Jacob's well was there. Jesus therefore, being wearied with his journey, sat thus on the well: and it was about the sixth hour. 
There cometh a woman of Samaria to draw water: Jesus saith unto her, Give me to drink. 
(For his disciples were gone away unto the city to buy meat.) 
Then saith the woman of Samaria unto him, How is it that thou, being a Jew, askest drink of me, which am a woman of Samaria? for the Jews have no dealings with the Samaritans. 
Jesus answered and said unto her, If thou knewest the gift of God, and who it is that saith to thee, Give me to drink; thou woul
514,h I perceive that God is no respecter of persons: 
But in every nation he that feareth him, and worketh righteousness, is accepted with him. 
The word which God sent unto the children of Israel, preaching peace by Jesus Christ: (he is Lord of all:) 
That word, I say, ye know, which was published throughout all Judaea, and began from Galilee, after the baptism which John preached; 
How God anointed Jesus of Nazareth with the Holy Ghost and with power: who went about doing good, and healing all that were oppres
555,n also in the time of trouble. 
At the noise of the tumult the people fled; at the lifting up of thyself the nations were scattered. 
And your spoil shall be gathered like the gathering of the caterpiller: as the running to and fro of locusts shall he run upon them. 
The LORD is exalted; for he dwelleth on high: he hath filled Zion with judgment and righteousness. 
And wisdom and knowledge shall be the stability of thy times, and strength of salvation: the fear of the LORD is his treasure. 
Behold, their valiant ones shall cry without: the ambassado
681,fore, and testify in the Lord, that ye henceforth walk not as other Gentiles walk, in the vanity of their mind, 
Having the understanding darkened, being alienated from the life of God through the ignorance that is in them, because of the blindness of their heart: 
Who being past feeling have given themselves over unto lasciviousness, to work all uncleanness with greediness. 
But ye have not so learned Christ; 
If so be that ye have heard him, and have been taught by him, as the truth is in Jesus: 
That ye put off concerning the former conversation the old man, which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts; 
And be renewed in the spirit of your mind; 
And that ye put o
547, and for Israel his people. 
And it came to pass, when Solomon had finished the building of the house of the LORD, and the king's house, and all Solomon's desire which he was pleased to do, 
That the LORD appeared to Solomon the second time, as he had appeared unto him at Gibeon. 
And the LORD said unto him, I have heard thy prayer and thy supplication, that thou hast made before me: I have hallowed this house, which thou hast built, to put my name there for ever; and mine eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. 
And if thou wilt wal
701,u wilt slay the wicked, O God: depart from me therefore, ye bloody men. 
For they speak against thee wickedly, and thine enemies take thy name in vain. 
Do not I hate them, O LORD, that hate thee? and am not I grieved with those that rise up against thee? 
I hate them with perfect hatred: I count them mine enemies. 
Search me, O God, and know my heart: try me, and know my thoughts: 
And see if there be any wicked way in me, and lead me in the way everlasting. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from the evil man: preserve me from the violent man; 
Which imagine mischiefs in their heart; continually are they gathered together for war. 
They have sharpened their tongues like a serpent; adders' poison is under
648,ave kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his sheath, and will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked. 
Seeing then that I will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked, therefore shall my sword go forth out of his sheath against all flesh from the south to the north: 
Th
519,n from heaven upon the children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, and seek God. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed the counsel of the poor, because the LORD is his refuge. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come o
608,vid put garrisons in Syriadamascus; and the Syrians became David's servants, and brought gifts. Thus the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadarezer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
Likewise from Tibhath, and from Chun, cities of Hadarezer, brought David very much brass, wherewith Solomon made the brasen sea, and the pillars, and the vessels of brass. 
Now when Tou king of Hamath heard how David had smitten all the host of Hadarezer king of Zobah; 
He sent Hadoram his son to king David, to enquire of his welfare, and to congrat
481, and what she had done, and what was decreed against her. 
Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, Let there be fair young virgins sought for the king: 
And let the king appoint officers in all the provinces of his kingdom, that they may gather together all the fair young virgins unto Shushan the palace, to the house of the women, unto the custody of Hege the king's chamberlain, keeper of the women; and let their things for purification be given them: 
And let 
608,ave sodden their own children: they were their meat in the destruction of the daughter of my people. 
The LORD hath accomplished his fury; he hath poured out his fierce anger, and hath kindled a fire in Zion, and it hath devoured the foundations thereof. 
The kings of the earth, and all the inhabitants of the world, would not have believed that the adversary and the enemy should have entered into the gates of Jerusalem. 
For the sins of her prophets, and the iniquities of her priests, that have shed the blood of the just in the midst of her, 
They have wandered as blind men in the streets, they have p
484,ave reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(Accord
702, and their thoughts: it shall come, that I will gather all nations and tongues; and they shall come, and see my glory. 
And I will set a sign among them, and I will send those that escape of them unto the nations, to Tarshish, Pul, and Lud, that draw the bow, to Tubal, and Javan, to the isles afar off, that have not heard my fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my glory among the Gentiles. 
And they shall bring all your brethren for an offering unto the LORD out of all nations upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters, and upon mules, and upon swift beasts, to my holy mountain Jerusalem, saith the LORD, as the children of Israel bring an offering in a clean vessel into t
566, given you the former rain moderately, and he will cause to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month. 
And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with wine and oil. 
And I will restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten, the cankerworm, and the caterpiller, and the palmerworm, my great army which I sent among you. 
And ye shall eat in plenty, and be satisfied, and praise the name of the LORD your God, that hath dealt wondrously with you: and my people shall never be ashamed. 
And ye sh
521,, though thou givest many gifts. 
My son, keep my words, and lay up my commandments with thee. 
Keep my commandments, and live; and my law as the apple of thine eye. 
Bind them upon thy fingers, write them upon the table of thine heart. 
Say unto wisdom, Thou art my sister; and call understanding thy kinswoman: 
That they may keep thee from the strange woman, from the stranger which flattereth with her words. 
For at the window of my house I looked through my casement, 
And beheld among the simple ones, I discerned 
575,heir waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them corn, when thou hast so provided for it. 
Thou waterest the ridges thereof abundantly: thou settlest the furrows thereof: thou makest it soft with showers: thou blessest the springing thereof. 
Thou crownest the year with thy goodness; and thy paths drop fatnes
509,tes. 
Behold, the ark of the covenant of the LORD of all the earth passeth over before you into Jordan. 
Now therefore take you twelve men out of the tribes of Israel, out of every tribe a man. 
And it shall come to pass, as soon as the soles of the feet of the priests that bear the ark of the LORD, the LORD of all the earth, shall rest in the waters of Jordan, that the waters of Jordan shall be cut off from the waters that come down from above; and they shall stand upon an heap. 
And it came to pass, wh
505,t the camp. 
And he slew the burnt offering; and Aaron's sons presented unto him the blood, which he sprinkled round about upon the altar. 
And they presented the burnt offering unto him, with the pieces thereof, and the head: and he burnt them upon the altar. 
And he did wash the inwards and the legs, and burnt them upon the burnt offering on the altar. 
And he brought the people's offering, and took the goat, which was the sin offering for the people, and slew it, and offered it for sin, as the fir
594,so the good works of some are manifest beforehand; and they that are otherwise cannot be hid. 
Let as many servants as are under the yoke count their own masters worthy of all honour, that the name of God and his doctrine be not blasphemed. 
And they that have believing masters, let them not despise them, because they are brethren; but rather do them service, because they are faithful and beloved, partakers of the benefit. These things teach and exhort. 
If any man teach otherwise, and consent not to wholesome words, even the words of our Lord Jesus Christ, and to the doctrine which is a
590, of them is as a brier: the most upright is sharper than a thorn hedge: the day of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now shall be their perplexity. 
Trust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a guide: keep the doors of thy mouth from her that lieth in thy bosom. 
For the son dishonoureth the father, the daughter riseth up against her mother, the daughter in law against her mother in law; a man's enemies are the men of his own house. 
Therefore I will look unto the LORD; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me. 
Rejoice not against me, O mine enemy: 
635,; and hearken, ye people, from far; The LORD hath called me from the womb; from the bowels of my mother hath he made mention of my name. 
And he hath made my mouth like a sharp sword; in the shadow of his hand hath he hid me, and made me a polished shaft; in his quiver hath he hid me; 
And said unto me, Thou art my servant, O Israel, in whom I will be glorified. 
Then I said, I have laboured in vain, I have spent my strength for nought, and in vain: yet surely my judgment is with the LORD, and my work with my God. 
And now, saith the LORD that formed me from the womb to be his servant, to bring Jacob again to him, Though Israel
541,s of the devil; for the devil sinneth from the beginning. For this purpose the Son of God was manifested, that he might destroy the works of the devil. 
Whosoever is born of God doth not commit sin; for his seed remaineth in him: and he cannot sin, because he is born of God. 
In this the children of God are manifest, and the children of the devil: whosoever doeth not righteousness is not of God, neither he that loveth not his brother. 
For this is the message that ye heard from the beginning, that we should love one another. 
Not as Ca
513,o judge the people: and the people stood by Moses from the morning unto the evening. 
And when Moses' father in law saw all that he did to the people, he said, What is this thing that thou doest to the people? why sittest thou thyself alone, and all the people stand by thee from morning unto even? 
And Moses said unto his father in law, Because the people come unto me to enquire of God: 
When they have a matter, they come unto me; and I judge between one and another, and I do make them know the statutes of G
490,your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he hath said unto you. 
Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known. 
And it shall come to pass, wh
540,ah. 
As keepers of a field, are they against her round about; because she hath been rebellious against me, saith the LORD. 
Thy way and thy doings have procured these things unto thee; this is thy wickedness, because it is bitter, because it reacheth unto thine heart. 
My bowels, my bowels! I am pained at my very heart; my heart maketh a noise in me; I cannot hold my peace, because thou hast heard, O my soul, the sound of the trumpet, the alarm of war. 
Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is spoiled: suddenly are
527,unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, Come near before the LORD: for he hath heard your murmurings. 
And it came to pass, as Aaron spake unto the whole congregation of the children of Israel, that they looked toward the wilderness, and, behold, the glory of the LORD appeared in the cloud. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel: speak unto them, saying, At even ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall be filled with bread; and ye shall know that 
546,f the LORD, 
And said unto the Levites that taught all Israel, which were holy unto the LORD, Put the holy ark in the house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did build; it shall not be a burden upon your shoulders: serve now the LORD your God, and his people Israel, 
And prepare yourselves by the houses of your fathers, after your courses, according to the writing of David king of Israel, and according to the writing of Solomon his son. 
And stand in the holy place according to the divisions of the families of the fathers of you
678,ecute judgments in thee, and the whole remnant of thee will I scatter into all the winds. 
Wherefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD; Surely, because thou hast defiled my sanctuary with all thy detestable things, and with all thine abominations, therefore will I also diminish thee; neither shall mine eye spare, neither will I have any pity. 
A third part of thee shall die with the pestilence, and with famine shall they be consumed in the midst of thee: and a third part shall fall by the sword round about thee; and I will scatter a third part into all the winds, and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thus shall mine anger be accomplished, and I will cause my fury to res
701,he valley of the son of Hinnom, which is by the entry of the east gate, and proclaim there the words that I shall tell thee, 
And say, Hear ye the word of the LORD, O kings of Judah, and inhabitants of Jerusalem; Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, the which whosoever heareth, his ears shall tingle. 
Because they have forsaken me, and have estranged this place, and have burned incense in it unto other gods, whom neither they nor their fathers have known, nor the kings of Judah, and have filled this place with the blood of innocents; 
They have built also the high places of Baal, to burn their sons with fire for burnt offerings unto Baal,
538, the LORD they abode in their tents, and according to the commandment of the LORD they journeyed. 
And so it was, when the cloud abode from even unto the morning, and that the cloud was taken up in the morning, then they journeyed: whether it was by day or by night that the cloud was taken up, they journeyed. 
Or whether it were two days, or a month, or a year, that the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle, remaining thereon, the children of Israel abode in their tents, and journeyed not: but when it was taken up, they journeyed. 
At t
513,royer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear unto me, and hear my speech. 
Shew thy marvellous lovingkindness, O thou that savest by thy right hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up against them. 
Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings, 
From the wicked that oppress me, from my deadly enemies, who compass me about. 
They are inclosed in their own fat: with 
559,it of thy ground, in the land which the LORD sware unto thy fathers to give thee. 
The LORD shall open unto thee his good treasure, the heaven to give the rain unto thy land in his season, and to bless all the work of thine hand: and thou shalt lend unto many nations, and thou shalt not borrow. 
And the LORD shall make thee the head, and not the tail; and thou shalt be above only, and thou shalt not be beneath; if that thou hearken unto the commandments of the LORD thy God, which I command thee this day, to observe and to do them: 
And thou shalt not go
507,hat it should not be polluted before the heathen, among whom they were, in whose sight I made myself known unto them, in bringing them forth out of the land of Egypt. 
Wherefore I caused them to go forth out of the land of Egypt, and brought them into the wilderness. 
And I gave them my statutes, and shewed them my judgments, which if a man do, he shall even live in them. 
Moreover also I gave them my sabbaths, to be a sign between me and them, that they might know that I am the LORD that sanctify them
632,children of Israel: and they looked, and took every man his rod. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Bring Aaron's rod again before the testimony, to be kept for a token against the rebels; and thou shalt quite take away their murmurings from me, that they die not. 
And Moses did so: as the LORD commanded him, so did he. 
And the children of Israel spake unto Moses, saying, Behold, we die, we perish, we all perish. 
Whosoever cometh any thing near unto the tabernacle of the LORD shall die: shall we be consumed with dying? 
And the LORD said unto Aaron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall bear the iniquity of 
684,urn from his ways, and live? 
But when the righteous turneth away from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, and doeth according to all the abominations that the wicked man doeth, shall he live? All his righteousness that he hath done shall not be mentioned: in his trespass that he hath trespassed, and in his sin that he hath sinned, in them shall he die. 
Yet ye say, The way of the LORD is not equal. Hear now, O house of Israel; Is not my way equal? are not your ways unequal? 
When a righteous man turneth away from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, and dieth in them; for his iniquity that he hath done shall he die. 
Again, when the wicked man turneth away fro
660,ve their wives unto others, and their fields to them that shall inherit them: for every one from the least even unto the greatest is given to covetousness, from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth falsely. 
For they have healed the hurt of the daughter of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace. 
Were they ashamed when they had committed abomination? nay, they were not at all ashamed, neither could they blush: therefore shall they fall among them that fall: in the time of their visitation they shall be cast down, saith the LORD. 
I will surely consume them, saith the LORD: there shall be no grapes on the vine, no
576,
And Judas the brother of James, and Judas Iscariot, which also was the traitor. 
And he came down with them, and stood in the plain, and the company of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all Judaea and Jerusalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which came to hear him, and to be healed of their diseases; 
And they that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed. 
And the whole multitude sought to touch him: for there went virtue out of him, and healed them all. 
And he lifted up his eyes on his disciples, and said, Blessed be ye p
666,d, or to the left: to the end that he may prolong his days in his kingdom, he, and his children, in the midst of Israel. 
The priests the Levites, and all the tribe of Levi, shall have no part nor inheritance with Israel: they shall eat the offerings of the LORD made by fire, and his inheritance. 
Therefore shall they have no inheritance among their brethren: the LORD is their inheritance, as he hath said unto them. 
And this shall be the priest's due from the people, from them that offer a sacrifice, whether it be ox or sheep; and they shall give unto the priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw. 
The firstfruit also of thy corn, of thy wine, an
581, he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, which he placed in the chariot cities, and with the king at Jerusalem. 
And the king made silver and gold at Jerusalem as plenteous as stones, and cedar trees made he as the sycomore trees that are in the vale for abundance. 
And Solomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the king's merchants received the linen yarn at a price. 
And they fetched up, and brought forth out of Egypt a chariot for six hundred shekels of silver, and an horse for an hundred and fifty: and so brought they out 
514,rt, depart, touch not: when they fled away and wandered, they said among the heathen, They shall no more sojourn there. 
The anger of the LORD hath divided them; he will no more regard them: they respected not the persons of the priests, they favoured not the elders. 
As for us, our eyes as yet failed for our vain help: in our watching we have watched for a nation that could not save us. 
They hunt our steps, that we cannot go in our streets: our end is near, our days are fulfilled; for our end is come. 
Our 
673, when Hiram heard the words of Solomon, that he rejoiced greatly, and said, Blessed be the LORD this day, which hath given unto David a wise son over this great people. 
And Hiram sent to Solomon, saying, I have considered the things which thou sentest to me for: and I will do all thy desire concerning timber of cedar, and concerning timber of fir. 
My servants shall bring them down from Lebanon unto the sea: and I will convey them by sea in floats unto the place that thou shalt appoint me, and will cause them to be discharged there, and thou shalt receive them: and thou shalt accomplish my desire, in giving food for my household. 
So Hiram gave Solomon cedar trees
702,. 
And it was so, that all that saw it said, There was no such deed done nor seen from the day that the children of Israel came up out of the land of Egypt unto this day: consider of it, take advice, and speak your minds. 
Then all the children of Israel went out, and the congregation was gathered together as one man, from Dan even to Beersheba, with the land of Gilead, unto the LORD in Mizpeh. 
And the chief of all the people, even of all the tribes of Israel, presented themselves in the assembly of the people of God, four hundred thousand footmen that drew sword. 
(Now the children of Benjamin heard that the children of Israel were gone up to Mizpeh.) Then said the children of Israel, Tell u
486,went about in Judah, and gathered the Levites out of all the cities of Judah, and the chief of the fathers of Israel, and they came to Jerusalem. 
And all the congregation made a covenant with the king in the house of God. And he said unto them, Behold, the king's son shall reign, as the LORD hath said of the sons of David. 
This is the thing that ye shall do; A third part of you entering on the sabbath, of the priests and of the Levites, shall be porters of the doors; 
And a third
658,r the table. 
And thou shalt make the staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with gold, that the table may be borne with them. 
And thou shalt make the dishes thereof, and spoons thereof, and covers thereof, and bowls thereof, to cover withal: of pure gold shalt thou make them. 
And thou shalt set upon the table shewbread before me alway. 
And thou shalt make a candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work shall the candlestick be made: his shaft, and his branches, his bowls, his knops, and his flowers, shall be of the same. 
And six branches shall come out of the sides of it; three branches of the candlestick out of the one side, and three branches of 
702,rstbegotten into the world, he saith, And let all the angels of God worship him. 
And of the angels he saith, Who maketh his angels spirits, and his ministers a flame of fire. 
But unto the Son he saith, Thy throne, O God, is for ever and ever: a sceptre of righteousness is the sceptre of thy kingdom. 
Thou hast loved righteousness, and hated iniquity; therefore God, even thy God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above thy fellows. 
And, Thou, Lord, in the beginning hast laid the foundation of the earth; and the heavens are the works of thine hands: 
They shall perish; but thou remainest; and they all shall wax old as doth a garment; 
And as a vesture shalt thou fold them up, and th
713,e, O ye servants of the LORD, praise the name of the LORD. 
Blessed be the name of the LORD from this time forth and for evermore. 
From the rising of the sun unto the going down of the same the LORD's name is to be praised. 
The LORD is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens. 
Who is like unto the LORD our God, who dwelleth on high, 
Who humbleth himself to behold the things that are in heaven, and in the earth! 
He raiseth up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth the needy out of the dunghill; 
That he may set him with princes, even with the princes of his people. 
He maketh the barren woman to keep house, and to be a joyful mother of children. Praise ye the LORD. 
When Israel went out
501,pect unto thy ways. 
I will delight myself in thy statutes: I will not forget thy word. 
Deal bountifully with thy servant, that I may live, and keep thy word. 
Open thou mine eyes, that I may behold wondrous things out of thy law. 
I am a stranger in the earth: hide not thy commandments from me. 
My soul breaketh for the longing that it hath unto thy judgments at all times. 
Thou hast rebuked the proud that are cursed, which do err from thy commandments. 
Remove from me reproach and contempt; fo
655, measured to you: and unto you that hear shall more be given. 
For he that hath, to him shall be given: and he that hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he hath. 
And he said, So is the kingdom of God, as if a man should cast seed into the ground; 
And should sleep, and rise night and day, and the seed should spring and grow up, he knoweth not how. 
For the earth bringeth forth fruit of herself; first the blade, then the ear, after that the full corn in the ear. 
But when the fruit is brought forth, immediately he putteth in the sickle, because the harvest is come. 
And he said, Whereunto shall we liken the kingdom of God? or with wha
528,to the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the river, from Tiphsah even to Azzah, over all the kings on this side the river: and he had peace on all sides round about him. 
And Judah an
655,ine increase: 
So shall thy barns be filled with plenty, and thy presses shall burst out with new wine. 
My son, despise not the chastening of the LORD; neither be weary of his correction: 
For whom the LORD loveth he correcteth; even as a father the son in whom he delighteth. 
Happy is the man that findeth wisdom, and the man that getteth understanding. 
For the merchandise of it is better than the merchandise of silver, and the gain thereof than fine gold. 
She is more precious than rubies: and all the things thou canst desire are not to be compared unto her. 
Length of days is in her right hand; and in her left hand riches and honour. 
Her ways
701,ll continue, and their seed shall be established before thee. 
Bless the LORD, O my soul: and all that is within me, bless his holy name. 
Bless the LORD, O my soul, and forget not all his benefits: 
Who forgiveth all thine iniquities; who healeth all thy diseases; 
Who redeemeth thy life from destruction; who crowneth thee with lovingkindness and tender mercies; 
Who satisfieth thy mouth with good things; so that thy youth is renewed like the eagle's. 
The LORD executeth righteousness and judgment for all that are oppressed. 
He made known his ways unto Moses, his acts unto the children of Israel. 
The LORD is merciful and gracious, slow to anger, and plenteous in mercy. 
He will not always 
595, him: I have brought him, and he shall make his way prosperous. 
Come ye near unto me, hear ye this; I have not spoken in secret from the beginning; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the Lord GOD, and his Spirit, hath sent me. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel; I am the LORD thy God which teacheth thee to profit, which leadeth thee by the way that thou shouldest go. 
O that thou hadst hearkened to my commandments! then had thy peace been as a river, and thy righteousness as the waves of the sea: 
Thy seed also had been as the sand, and the offspring o
595,hereof; and a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about. 
And under it was the similitude of oxen, which did compass it round about: ten in a cubit, compassing the sea round about. Two rows of oxen were cast, when it was cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 
And the thickness of it was an handbreadth, and the brim of it like the work of the brim of a cup, with flowers of li
543,red thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace offerings. 
And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses, which he wrote in the presence of the children of Israel. 
And all Israel, and their elders, and officers, and their judges, stood on this side the ark and on that side before the priests the Levites, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, as well the stranger, as he that was born among them; half of them over against mount Gerizim, and half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the serva
480, the sepulchre be made sure until the third day, lest his disciples come by night, and steal him away, and say unto the people, He is risen from the dead: so the last error shall be worse than the first. 
Pilate said unto them, Ye have a watch: go your way, make it as sure as ye can. 
So they went, and made the sepulchre sure, sealing the stone, and setting a watch. 
In the end of the sabbath, as it began to dawn toward the first day of the week, came Mary Magdalene and the o
489,niel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree n
645,late, without man, and without inhabitant, and without beast, 
The voice of joy, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the voice of them that shall say, Praise the LORD of hosts: for the LORD is good; for his mercy endureth for ever: and of them that shall bring the sacrifice of praise into the house of the LORD. For I will cause to return the captivity of the land, as at the first, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Again in this place, which is desolate without man and without beast, and in all the cities thereof, shall be an habitation of shepherds causing their flocks to lie d
564,d yield not her fruit; and lest ye perish quickly from off the good land which the LORD giveth you. 
Therefore shall ye lay up these my words in your heart and in your soul, and bind them for a sign upon your hand, that they may be as frontlets between your eyes. 
And ye shall teach them your children, speaking of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt write them upon the door posts of thine house, and upon thy gates: 
That your days may be multiplied, and the da
521,may believe that I am he. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that receiveth whomsoever I send receiveth me; and he that receiveth me receiveth him that sent me. 
When Jesus had thus said, he was troubled in spirit, and testified, and said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me. 
Then the disciples looked one on another, doubting of whom he spake. 
Now there was leaning on Jesus' bosom one of his disciples, whom Jesus loved. 
Simon Peter therefore beckoned to him, that he should ask who it 
622,hine hand. 
For the eyes of the LORD run to and fro throughout the whole earth, to shew himself strong in the behalf of them whose heart is perfect toward him. Herein thou hast done foolishly: therefore from henceforth thou shalt have wars. 
Then Asa was wroth with the seer, and put him in a prison house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed some of the people the same time. 
And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Asa in the thirty and ninth year of his reign was diseased in his feet, until his disease w
611, it was as the taste of fresh oil. 
And when the dew fell upon the camp in the night, the manna fell upon it. 
Then Moses heard the people weep throughout their families, every man in the door of his tent: and the anger of the LORD was kindled greatly; Moses also was displeased. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, Wherefore hast thou afflicted thy servant? and wherefore have I not found favour in thy sight, that thou layest the burden of all this people upon me? 
Have I conceived all this people? have I begotten them, that thou shouldest say unto me, Carry them in thy bosom, as a nursing father beareth the su
615,people; and yet for all that will they not hear me, saith the Lord. 
Wherefore tongues are for a sign, not to them that believe, but to them that believe not: but prophesying serveth not for them that believe not, but for them which believe. 
If therefore the whole church be come together into one place, and all speak with tongues, and there come in those that are unlearned, or unbelievers, will they not say that ye are mad? 
But if all prophesy, and there come in one that believeth not, or one unlearned, he is convinced of all, he is judged of all: 
And thus are the secrets of his heart made manifest; and s
557, shall drive out from before us, them will we possess. 
And now art thou any thing better than Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab? did he ever strive against Israel, or did he ever fight against them, 
While Israel dwelt in Heshbon and her towns, and in Aroer and her towns, and in all the cities that be along by the coasts of Arnon, three hundred years? why therefore did ye not recover them within that time? 
Wherefore I have not sinned against thee, but thou doest me wrong to war against me: the LORD the Judge be judge this day between the childre
666, fruit. 
Thou shalt beget sons and daughters, but thou shalt not enjoy them; for they shall go into captivity. 
All thy trees and fruit of thy land shall the locust consume. 
The stranger that is within thee shall get up above thee very high; and thou shalt come down very low. 
He shall lend to thee, and thou shalt not lend to him: he shall be the head, and thou shalt be the tail. 
Moreover all these curses shall come upon thee, and shall pursue thee, and overtake thee, till thou be destroyed; because thou hearkenedst not unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which he commanded thee: 
And they shall be upon thee for a 
508,avid my father, saying, Thy son, whom I will set upon thy throne in thy room, he shall build an house unto my name. 
Now therefore command thou that they hew me cedar trees out of Lebanon; and my servants shall be with thy servants: and unto thee will I give hire for thy servants according to all that thou shalt appoint: for thou knowest that there is not among us any that can skill to hew timber like unto the Sidonians. 
And it came to pass, when Hiram heard the words of Solomon, that he rejoiced great
489, done unto him according to the deserving of his hands; 
(For my father fought for you, and adventured his life far, and delivered you out of the hand of Midian: 
And ye are risen up against my father's house this day, and have slain his sons, threescore and ten persons, upon one stone, and have made Abimelech, the son of his maidservant, king over the men of Shechem, because he is your brother;) 
If ye then have dealt truly and sincerely with Jerubbaal and with his house this day, th
714,not thou, O God, who hast cast us off? and wilt not thou, O God, go forth with our hosts? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hold not thy peace, O God of my praise; 
For the mouth of the wicked and the mouth of the deceitful are opened against me: they have spoken against me with a lying tongue. 
They compassed me about also with words of hatred; and fought against me without a cause. 
For my love they are my adversaries: but I give myself unto prayer. 
And they have rewarded me evil for good, and hatred for my love. 
Set thou a wicked man over him: and let Satan stand at his right hand. 
When he sha
551, from the congregation of Israel, to bring you near to himself to do the service of the tabernacle of the LORD, and to stand before the congregation to minister unto them? 
And he hath brought thee near to him, and all thy brethren the sons of Levi with thee: and seek ye the priesthood also? 
For which cause both thou and all thy company are gathered together against the LORD: and what is Aaron, that ye murmur against him? 
And Moses sent to call Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab: which said, We will not come up: 
Is it a small thing that tho
536,ere afraid, for they said, God is come into the camp. And they said, Woe unto us! for there hath not been such a thing heretofore. 
Woe unto us! who shall deliver us out of the hand of these mighty Gods? these are the Gods that smote the Egyptians with all the plagues in the wilderness. 
Be strong and quit yourselves like men, O ye Philistines, that ye be not servants unto the Hebrews, as they have been to you: quit yourselves like men, and fight. 
And the Philistines fought, and Israel was smitten, and they fled every man into hi
678,stitute of the truth, supposing that gain is godliness: from such withdraw thyself. 
But godliness with contentment is great gain. 
For we brought nothing into this world, and it is certain we can carry nothing out. 
And having food and raiment let us be therewith content. 
But they that will be rich fall into temptation and a snare, and into many foolish and hurtful lusts, which drown men in destruction and perdition. 
For the love of money is the root of all evil: which while some coveted after, they have erred from the faith, and pierced themselves through with many sorrows. 
But thou, O man of God, flee these things; and follow after righteousness, godliness, faith,
697,d were scattered, so that two of them were not left together. 
And the people said unto Samuel, Who is he that said, Shall Saul reign over us? bring the men, that we may put them to death. 
And Saul said, There shall not a man be put to death this day: for to day the LORD hath wrought salvation in Israel. 
Then said Samuel to the people, Come, and let us go to Gilgal, and renew the kingdom there. 
And all the people went to Gilgal; and there they made Saul king before the LORD in Gilgal; and there they sacrificed sacrifices of peace offerings before the LORD; and there Saul and all the men of Israel rejoiced greatly. 
And Samuel said unto all Israel, Behold, I have hearkened unto your voi
603,s, and all cedars: 
Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl: 
Kings of the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of the earth: 
Both young men, and maidens; old men, and children: 
Let them praise the name of the LORD: for his name alone is excellent; his glory is above the earth and heaven. 
He also exalteth the horn of his people, the praise of all his saints; even of the children of Israel, a people near unto him. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Sing unto the LORD a new song, and his praise in the congregation of saints. 
Let Israel rejoice in him that made h
663,n days, even fourteen days. 
On the eighth day he sent the people away: and they blessed the king, and went unto their tents joyful and glad of heart for all the goodness that the LORD had done for David his servant, and for Israel his people. 
And it came to pass, when Solomon had finished the building of the house of the LORD, and the king's house, and all Solomon's desire which he was pleased to do, 
That the LORD appeared to Solomon the second time, as he had appeared unto him at Gibeon. 
And the LORD said unto him, I have heard thy prayer and thy supplication, that thou hast made before me: I have hallowed this house, which thou hast built, to put my
649,iver out of the hands of the Philistines. And there was peace between Israel and the Amorites. 
And Samuel judged Israel all the days of his life. 
And he went from year to year in circuit to Bethel, and Gilgal, and Mizpeh, and judged Israel in all those places. 
And his return was to Ramah; for there was his house; and there he judged Israel; and there he built an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when Samuel was old, that he made his sons judges over Israel. 
Now the name of his firstborn was Joel; and the name of his second, Abiah: they were judges in Beersheba. 
And his sons walked not in his ways, but turned aside after lucre, 
694,D hath created a new thing in the earth, A woman shall compass a man. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; As yet they shall use this speech in the land of Judah and in the cities thereof, when I shall bring again their captivity; The LORD bless thee, O habitation of justice, and mountain of holiness. 
And there shall dwell in Judah itself, and in all the cities thereof together, husbandmen, and they that go forth with flocks. 
For I have satiated the weary soul, and I have replenished every sorrowful soul. 
Upon this I awaked, and beheld; and my sleep was sweet unto me. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will sow the house of Israel and the house of Judah with
584,to him, Micaiah, shall we go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall we forbear? And he answered him, Go, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the king said unto him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou tell me nothing but that which is true in the name of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophe
669,s thing ye shall prolong your days in the land, whither ye go over Jordan to possess it. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses that selfsame day, saying, 
Get thee up into this mountain Abarim, unto mount Nebo, which is in the land of Moab, that is over against Jericho; and behold the land of Canaan, which I give unto the children of Israel for a possession: 
And die in the mount whither thou goest up, and be gathered unto thy people; as Aaron thy brother died in mount Hor, and was gathered unto his people: 
Because ye trespassed against me among the children of Israel at the waters of MeribahKadesh, in the wilderness of Zin; because ye sanctified me not in the midst 
594,y: their cities are destroyed, so that there is no man, that there is none inhabitant. 
I said, Surely thou wilt fear me, thou wilt receive instruction; so their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them: but they rose early, and corrupted all their doings. 
Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I rise up to the prey: for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to 
660, will tear them from your arms, and will let the souls go, even the souls that ye hunt to make them fly. 
Your kerchiefs also will I tear, and deliver my people out of your hand, and they shall be no more in your hand to be hunted; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Because with lies ye have made the heart of the righteous sad, whom I have not made sad; and strengthened the hands of the wicked, that he should not return from his wicked way, by promising him life: 
Therefore ye shall see no more vanity, nor divine divinations: for I will deliver my people out of your hand: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Then came certain of the elders of Isr
504,ms with them, with all them that were the chosen men of Assyria, and with all on whom she doted: with all their idols she defiled herself. 
Neither left she her whoredoms brought from Egypt: for in her youth they lay with her, and they bruised the breasts of her virginity, and poured their whoredom upon her. 
Wherefore I have delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into the hand of the Assyrians, upon whom she doted. 
These discovered her nakedness: they took her sons and her daughters, and slew 
531, Philistines were gathered together into a troop, where was a piece of ground full of lentiles: and the people fled from the Philistines. 
But he stood in the midst of the ground, and defended it, and slew the Philistines: and the LORD wrought a great victory. 
And three of the thirty chief went down, and came to David in the harvest time unto the cave of Adullam: and the troop of the Philistines pitched in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in an hold, and the garrison of the Philistines was then in Bethlehem. 
And D
570,all bow before him; and his enemies shall lick the dust. 
The kings of Tarshish and of the isles shall bring presents: the kings of Sheba and Seba shall offer gifts. 
Yea, all kings shall fall down before him: all nations shall serve him. 
For he shall deliver the needy when he crieth; the poor also, and him that hath no helper. 
He shall spare the poor and needy, and shall save the souls of the needy. 
He shall redeem their soul from deceit and violence: and precious shall their blood be in his sight. 
And he shall live, and to him shall be given of the gold of S
623,
For I will cast out the nations before thee, and enlarge thy borders: neither shall any man desire thy land, when thou shalt go up to appear before the LORD thy God thrice in the year. 
Thou shalt not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leaven; neither shall the sacrifice of the feast of the passover be left unto the morning. 
The first of the firstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring unto the house of the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Write thou these words: for after the tenor of these words I have made a covenant with thee and with Israel. 
And he 
505,side Jordan by Jericho, on the east side of Jordan, were given them out of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer in the wilderness with her suburbs, and Jahzah with her suburbs, 
Kedemoth also with her suburbs, and Mephaath with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Gad; Ramoth in Gilead with her suburbs, and Mahanaim with her suburbs, 
And Heshbon with her suburbs, and Jazer with her suburbs. 
Now the sons of Issachar were, Tola, and Puah, Jashub, and Shimrom, four. 
And the sons of Tola; Uzzi, and Rephaiah, a
519,er; yea, I throughly washed away thy blood from thee, and I anointed thee with oil. 
I clothed thee also with broidered work, and shod thee with badgers' skin, and I girded thee about with fine linen, and I covered thee with silk. 
I decked thee also with ornaments, and I put bracelets upon thy hands, and a chain on thy neck. 
And I put a jewel on thy forehead, and earrings in thine ears, and a beautiful crown upon thine head. 
Thus wast thou decked with gold and silver; and thy raiment was of fine linen, and silk
480,ou away with hooks, and your posterity with fishhooks. 
And ye shall go out at the breaches, every cow at that which is before her; and ye shall cast them into the palace, saith the LORD. 
Come to Bethel, and transgress; at Gilgal multiply transgression; and bring your sacrifices every morning, and your tithes after three years: 
And offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving with leaven, and proclaim and publish the free offerings: for this liketh you, O ye children of Israel, saith 
527,eech thee, lady, not as though I wrote a new commandment unto thee, but that which we had from the beginning, that we love one another. 
And this is love, that we walk after his commandments. This is the commandment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antichrist. 
Look to yourselves, that we lose not those things which we have wrought, but that we receive a full re
494,regation. 
And when Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, saw it, he rose up from among the congregation, and took a javelin in his hand; 
And he went after the man of Israel into the tent, and thrust both of them through, the man of Israel, and the woman through her belly. So the plague was stayed from the children of Israel. 
And those that died in the plague were twenty and four thousand. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son
555, and came unto them. 
And they said unto him, Sit down now, and read it in our ears. So Baruch read it in their ears. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard all the words, they were afraid both one and other, and said unto Baruch, We will surely tell the king of all these words. 
And they asked Baruch, saying, Tell us now, How didst thou write all these words at his mouth? 
Then Baruch answered them, He pronounced all these words unto me with his mouth, and I wrote them with ink in the book. 
Then said the princes unto Baruch, Go, hide thee, thou
678,s serve them; 
Thou shalt not hearken unto the words of that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams: for the LORD your God proveth you, to know whether ye love the LORD your God with all your heart and with all your soul. 
Ye shall walk after the LORD your God, and fear him, and keep his commandments, and obey his voice, and ye shall serve him, and cleave unto him. 
And that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams, shall be put to death; because he hath spoken to turn you away from the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, to thrust thee out of the way which the LORD thy God commanded thee to walk in. So shalt th
606,and they of the plain the Philistines: and they shall possess the fields of Ephraim, and the fields of Samaria: and Benjamin shall possess Gilead. 
And the captivity of this host of the children of Israel shall possess that of the Canaanites, even unto Zarephath; and the captivity of Jerusalem, which is in Sepharad, shall possess the cities of the south. 
And saviours shall come up on mount Zion to judge the mount of Esau; and the kingdom shall be the LORD's. 
Now the word of the LORD came unto Jonah the son of Amittai, saying, 
Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it; for their wi
490,, cakes of figs, and bunches of raisins, and wine, and oil, and oxen, and sheep abundantly: for there was joy in Israel. 
And David consulted with the captains of thousands and hundreds, and with every leader. 
And David said unto all the congregation of Israel, If it seem good unto you, and that it be of the LORD our God, let us send abroad unto our brethren every where, that are left in all the land of Israel, and with them also to the priests and Levites which are in their cities an
539,hou hast ordained; 
What is man, that thou art mindful of him? and the son of man, that thou visitest him? 
For thou hast made him a little lower than the angels, and hast crowned him with glory and honour. 
Thou madest him to have dominion over the works of thy hands; thou hast put all things under his feet: 
All sheep and oxen, yea, and the beasts of the field; 
The fowl of the air, and the fish of the sea, and whatsoever passeth through the paths of the seas. 
O LORD our Lord, how excellent is thy name in all the earth! 
I will pr
566,el to Melzar, whom the prince of the eunuchs had set over Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah, 
Prove thy servants, I beseech thee, ten days; and let them give us pulse to eat, and water to drink. 
Then let our countenances be looked upon before thee, and the countenance of the children that eat of the portion of the king's meat: and as thou seest, deal with thy servants. 
So he consented to them in this matter, and proved them ten days. 
And at the end of ten days their countenances appeared fairer and fatter in flesh than all the children which did eat th
535,ay, Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and with water of affliction, until I return in peace. 
And Micaiah said, If thou certainly return in peace, then hath not the LORD spoken by me. And he said, Hearken, all ye people. 
So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramothgilead. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, I will disguise myself, and I will go to the battle; but put thou on thy robes. So the king of Israel disguised himself; and they
560,er two days is the feast of the passover, and the Son of man is betrayed to be crucified. 
Then assembled together the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders of the people, unto the palace of the high priest, who was called Caiaphas, 
And consulted that they might take Jesus by subtilty, and kill him. 
But they said, Not on the feast day, lest there be an uproar among the people. 
Now when Jesus was in Bethany, in the house of Simon the leper, 
There came unto him a woman having an alabaster box of very precious ointment, and poured it on his hea
608,ercies. 
For he doth not afflict willingly nor grieve the children of men. 
To crush under his feet all the prisoners of the earth. 
To turn aside the right of a man before the face of the most High, 
To subvert a man in his cause, the LORD approveth not. 
Who is he that saith, and it cometh to pass, when the Lord commandeth it not? 
Out of the mouth of the most High proceedeth not evil and good? 
Wherefore doth a living man complain, a man for the punishment of his sins? 
Let us search and try our ways, and turn again to the LORD. 
Let us lift up our heart with our hands unto God in the heavens. 
We 
502,t this poor widow hath cast in more than they all: 
For all these have of their abundance cast in unto the offerings of God: but she of her penury hath cast in all the living that she had. 
And as some spake of the temple, how it was adorned with goodly stones and gifts, he said, 
As for these things which ye behold, the days will come, in the which there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And they asked him, saying, Master, but when shall these things be? an
683,hem a king. And Samuel said unto the men of Israel, Go ye every man unto his city. 
Now there was a man of Benjamin, whose name was Kish, the son of Abiel, the son of Zeror, the son of Bechorath, the son of Aphiah, a Benjamite, a mighty man of power. 
And he had a son, whose name was Saul, a choice young man, and a goodly: and there was not among the children of Israel a goodlier person than he: from his shoulders and upward he was higher than any of the people. 
And the asses of Kish Saul's father were lost. And Kish said to Saul his son, Take now one of the servants with thee, and arise, go seek the asses. 
And he passed through mount Ephraim, and passed through the land o
582,e Gibeonite, and Jadon the Meronothite, the men of Gibeon, and of Mizpah, unto the throne of the governor on this side the river. 
Next unto him repaired Uzziel the son of Harhaiah, of the goldsmiths. Next unto him also repaired Hananiah the son of one of the apothecaries, and they fortified Jerusalem unto the broad wall. 
And next unto them repaired Rephaiah the son of Hur, the ruler of the half part of Jerusalem. 
And next unto them repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, even over against his house. And next unto him repaired Hattush the son of Hashabniah. 
Malchijah the son
608, thus shall the man be blessed that feareth the LORD. 
The LORD shall bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the good of Jerusalem all the days of thy life. 
Yea, thou shalt see thy children's children, and peace upon Israel. 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth, may Israel now say: 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth: yet they have not prevailed against me. 
The plowers plowed upon my back: they made long their furrows. 
The LORD is righteous: he hath cut asunder the cords of the wicked. 
Let them all be confounded and turned back that hate Zion. 
Let them be as the gra
595,e eyes: but know thou, that for all these things God will bring thee into judgment. 
Therefore remove sorrow from thy heart, and put away evil from thy flesh: for childhood and youth are vanity. 
Remember now thy Creator in the days of thy youth, while the evil days come not, nor the years draw nigh, when thou shalt say, I have no pleasure in them; 
While the sun, or the light, or the moon, or the stars, be not darkened, nor the clouds return after the rain: 
In the day when the keepers of the house shall tremble, and the strong men shall bow themselves, and the grinders cease because the
578,lesh also, in which, even in the skin thereof, was a boil, and is healed, 
And in the place of the boil there be a white rising, or a bright spot, white, and somewhat reddish, and it be shewed to the priest; 
And if, when the priest seeth it, behold, it be in sight lower than the skin, and the hair thereof be turned white; the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a plague of leprosy broken out of the boil. 
But if the priest look on it, and, behold, there be no white hairs therein, and if it be not lower than the skin, but be somewhat dark; then the priest shall shut
516,darenes round about besought him to depart from them; for they were taken with great fear: and he went up into the ship, and returned back again. 
Now the man out of whom the devils were departed besought him that he might be with him: but Jesus sent him away, saying, 
Return to thine own house, and shew how great things God hath done unto thee. And he went his way, and published throughout the whole city how great things Jesus had done unto him. 
And it came to pass, that, when Jesus was returned, the people g
666,oubled: for such things must needs be; but the end shall not be yet. 
For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows. 
But take heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to councils; and in the synagogues ye shall be beaten: and ye shall be brought before rulers and kings for my sake, for a testimony against them. 
And the gospel must first be published among all nations. 
But when they shall lead you, and deliver you up, take no thought beforehand what ye shall speak, neither do ye premeditate: but whatsoe
686,ense and mine oil. 
And a voice of a multitude being at ease was with her: and with the men of the common sort were brought Sabeans from the wilderness, which put bracelets upon their hands, and beautiful crowns upon their heads. 
Then said I unto her that was old in adulteries, Will they now commit whoredoms with her, and she with them? 
Yet they went in unto her, as they go in unto a woman that playeth the harlot: so went they in unto Aholah and unto Aholibah, the lewd women. 
And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of adulteresses, and after the manner of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands. 
For thus saith 
535,h came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and was troubled. 
And said, Where have ye laid him? They said unto him, Lord, come and see. 
Jesus wept. 
Then said the Jews, Behold how he loved him! 
And some of them said, Could not this man, which opened the eyes of the blind, have caused that even this man should not have died? 
Jesus therefore again groaning in himself cometh to the grave. It was a cave, and a stone lay upon it. 
Jesus said, Take ye away the stone. Martha, the sister of him that was dead, saith unto him, Lord, by 
611,gue were fastened on him. 
And he began to say unto them, This day is this scripture fulfilled in your ears. 
And all bare him witness, and wondered at the gracious words which proceeded out of his mouth. And they said, Is not this Joseph's son? 
And he said unto them, Ye will surely say unto me this proverb, Physician, heal thyself: whatsoever we have heard done in Capernaum, do also here in thy country. 
And he said, Verily I say unto you, No prophet is accepted in his own country. 
But I tell you of a truth, many widows were in Israel in the days of Elias, when the heaven was shut up three years and s
692,ithmah, and pitched at Rimmonparez. 
And they departed from Rimmonparez, and pitched in Libnah. 
And they removed from Libnah, and pitched at Rissah. 
And they journeyed from Rissah, and pitched in Kehelathah. 
And they went from Kehelathah, and pitched in mount Shapher. 
And they removed from mount Shapher, and encamped in Haradah. 
And they removed from Haradah, and pitched in Makheloth. 
And they removed from Makheloth, and encamped at Tahath. 
And they departed from Tahath, and pitched at Tarah. 
And they removed from Tarah, and pitched in Mithcah. 
And they went from Mithcah, and pitched in Hashmonah. 
And they departed from Hashmonah, and encamped at Moseroth. 
And they departe
579,e out ye three unto the tabernacle of the congregation. And they three came out. 
And the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in the door of the tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now my words: If there be a prophet among you, I the LORD will make myself known unto him in a vision, and will speak unto him in a dream. 
My servant Moses is not so, who is faithful in all mine house. 
With him will I speak mouth to mouth, even apparently, and not in dark speeches; and the similitude of the LORD shall he behold
679,e, and they are not: there is none to stretch forth my tent any more, and to set up my curtains. 
For the pastors are become brutish, and have not sought the LORD: therefore they shall not prosper, and all their flocks shall be scattered. 
Behold, the noise of the bruit is come, and a great commotion out of the north country, to make the cities of Judah desolate, and a den of dragons. 
O LORD, I know that the way of man is not in himself: it is not in man that walketh to direct his steps. 
O LORD, correct me, but with judgment; not in thine anger, lest thou bring me to nothing. 
Pour out thy fury upon the heathen that know thee not, and upon the families that call not on
612,ing by morning, he wakeneth mine ear to hear as the learned. 
The Lord GOD hath opened mine ear, and I was not rebellious, neither turned away back. 
I gave my back to the smiters, and my cheeks to them that plucked off the hair: I hid not my face from shame and spitting. 
For the Lord GOD will help me; therefore shall I not be confounded: therefore have I set my face like a flint, and I know that I shall not be ashamed. 
He is near that justifieth me; who will contend with me? let us stand together: who is mine adversary? let him come near to me. 
Behold, the Lord GOD will help me; who is he that shall c
701, broken the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the rod of his oppressor, as in the day of Midian. 
For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and garments rolled in blood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of fire. 
For unto us a child is born, unto us a son is given: and the government shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be called Wonderful, Counsellor, The mighty God, The everlasting Father, The Prince of Peace. 
Of the increase of his government and peace there shall be no end, upon the throne of David, and upon his kingdom, to order it, and to establish it with judgment and with justice from henceforth even for ever. The zeal of the LORD of ho
710,arim. 
Salma the father of Bethlehem, Hareph the father of Bethgader. 
And Shobal the father of Kirjathjearim had sons; Haroeh, and half of the Manahethites. 
And the families of Kirjathjearim; the Ithrites, and the Puhites, and the Shumathites, and the Mishraites; of them came the Zareathites, and the Eshtaulites, 
The sons of Salma; Bethlehem, and the Netophathites, Ataroth, the house of Joab, and half of the Manahethites, the Zorites. 
And the families of the scribes which dwelt at Jabez; the Tirathites, the Shimeathites, and Suchathites. These are the Kenites that came of Hemath, the father of the house of Rechab. 
Now these were the sons of David, which were born unto him in Hebron; the firstborn
668,the error of Balaam for reward, and perished in the gainsaying of Core. 
These are spots in your feasts of charity, when they feast with you, feeding themselves without fear: clouds they are without water, carried about of winds; trees whose fruit withereth, without fruit, twice dead, plucked up by the roots; 
Raging waves of the sea, foaming out their own shame; wandering stars, to whom is reserved the blackness of darkness for ever. 
And Enoch also, the seventh from Adam, prophesied of these, saying, Behold, the Lord cometh with ten thousands of his saints, 
To execute judgment upon all, and to convince all that are ungodly among them of all their ungodly de
649,lders, all his substance should be forfeited, and himself separated from the congregation of those that had been carried away. 
Then all the men of Judah and Benjamin gathered themselves together unto Jerusalem within three days. It was the ninth month, on the twentieth day of the month; and all the people sat in the street of the house of God, trembling because of this matter, and for the great rain. 
And Ezra the priest stood up, and said unto them, Ye have transgressed, and have taken strange wives, to increase the trespass of Israel. 
Now therefore make confession unto the LORD God of your fathers, and do his pleasure: and separate yours
659, pass, when ye shall say, Wherefore doeth the LORD our God all these things unto us? then shalt thou answer them, Like as ye have forsaken me, and served strange gods in your land, so shall ye serve strangers in a land that is not your's. 
Declare this in the house of Jacob, and publish it in Judah, saying, 
Hear now this, O foolish people, and without understanding; which have eyes, and see not; which have ears, and hear not: 
Fear ye not me? saith the LORD: will ye not tremble at my presence, which have placed the sand for the bound of the sea by a perpetual decree, that it cannot pass it: and though the waves thereof toss themselves, yet can they n
603,d had commanded him: and the LORD shut him in. 
And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters increased, and bare up the ark, and it was lift up above the earth. 
And the waters prevailed, and were increased greatly upon the earth; and the ark went upon the face of the waters. 
And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high hills, that were under the whole heaven, were covered. 
Fifteen cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered. 
And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of beast, and of every cre
526,LORD said unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain, vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold. And the LORD set a mark upon Cain, lest any finding him should kill him. 
And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden. 
And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his son, Enoch. 
And unto Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael begat Methusael: and Methusael begat
674,ron and Moses in the day that the LORD spake with Moses in mount Sinai. 
And these are the names of the sons of Aaron; Nadab the firstborn, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
These are the names of the sons of Aaron, the priests which were anointed, whom he consecrated to minister in the priest's office. 
And Nadab and Abihu died before the LORD, when they offered strange fire before the LORD, in the wilderness of Sinai, and they had no children: and Eleazar and Ithamar ministered in the priest's office in the sight of Aaron their father. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Bring the tribe of Levi near, and present them before Aaron the priest, that they may min
505,s commandments, which I command thee, thou, and thy son, and thy son's son, all the days of thy life; and that thy days may be prolonged. 
Hear therefore, O Israel, and observe to do it; that it may be well with thee, and that ye may increase mightily, as the LORD God of thy fathers hath promised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. 

655, the outward sanctuary which looketh toward the east; and it was shut. 
Then said the LORD unto me; This gate shall be shut, it shall not be opened, and no man shall enter in by it; because the LORD, the God of Israel, hath entered in by it, therefore it shall be shut. 
It is for the prince; the prince, he shall sit in it to eat bread before the LORD; he shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate, and shall go out by the way of the same. 
Then brought he me the way of the north gate before the house: and I looked, and, behold, the glory of the LORD filled the house of the LORD: and I fell upon my face. 
And the LORD said unto me, Son of man,
600,all, the children of the Anakims, whom thou knowest, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can stand before the children of Anak! 
Understand therefore this day, that the LORD thy God is he which goeth over before thee; as a consuming fire he shall destroy them, and he shall bring them down before thy face: so shalt thou drive them out, and destroy them quickly, as the LORD hath said unto thee. 
Speak not thou in thine heart, after that the LORD thy God hath cast them out from before thee, saying, For my righteousness the LORD hath brought me in to possess this land: but for the wickedness of t
548,e families of Reuben. 
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the families of Simeon. 
And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their generations; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the life of Levi were an hundred thirty and seven years. 
The sons of Gershon; Libni, and Shimi, according to their families. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel: and the years of the life of Kohath were an hundred t
635,r lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now. 
For she did not know that I gave her corn, and wine, and oil, and multiplied her silver and gold, which they prepared for Baal. 
Therefore will I return, and take away my corn in the time thereof, and my wine in the season thereof, and will recover my wool and my flax given to cover her nakedness. 
And now will I discover her lewdness in the sight of her lovers, and none shall deliver her out of mine hand. 
I will also cause all her m
598,RD your God hath delivered them into your hand. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua and the children of Israel had made an end of slaying them with a very great slaughter, till they were consumed, that the rest which remained of them entered into fenced cities. 
And all the people returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in peace: none moved his tongue against any of the children of Israel. 
Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring out those five kings unto me out of the cave. 
And they did so, and brought forth those five kings unto him out of the cave, the king of Jerusalem,
698,shall be of thee in the great congregation: I will pay my vows before them that fear him. 
The meek shall eat and be satisfied: they shall praise the LORD that seek him: your heart shall live for ever. 
All the ends of the world shall remember and turn unto the LORD: and all the kindreds of the nations shall worship before thee. 
For the kingdom is the LORD's: and he is the governor among the nations. 
All they that be fat upon earth shall eat and worship: all they that go down to the dust shall bow before him: and none can keep alive his own soul. 
A seed shall serve him; it shall be accounted to the Lord for a generation. 
They shall come, and shall declare his righteousness unto a peopl
666,hich is effectual in the enduring of the same sufferings which we also suffer: or whether we be comforted, it is for your consolation and salvation. 
And our hope of you is stedfast, knowing, that as ye are partakers of the sufferings, so shall ye be also of the consolation. 
For we would not, brethren, have you ignorant of our trouble which came to us in Asia, that we were pressed out of measure, above strength, insomuch that we despaired even of life: 
But we had the sentence of death in ourselves, that we should not trust in ourselves, but in God which raiseth the dead: 
Who delivered us from so great a death, and doth deliver: in whom we trust that he wi
629,: I shall behold man no more with the inhabitants of the world. 
Mine age is departed, and is removed from me as a shepherd's tent: I have cut off like a weaver my life: he will cut me off with pining sickness: from day even to night wilt thou make an end of me. 
I reckoned till morning, that, as a lion, so will he break all my bones: from day even to night wilt thou make an end of me. 
Like a crane or a swallow, so did I chatter: I did mourn as a dove: mine eyes fail with looking upward: O LORD, I am oppressed; undertake for me. 
What shall I say? he hath both spoken unto me, and himself hath done it: I shall go softly a
492,s, and, behold, thou hast blessed them altogether. 
And he answered and said, Must I not take heed to speak that which the LORD hath put in my mouth? 
And Balak said unto him, Come, I pray thee, with me unto another place, from whence thou mayest see them: thou shalt see but the utmost part of them, and shalt not see them all: and curse me them from thence. 
And he brought him into the field of Zophim, to the top of Pisgah, and built seven altars, and offered a bullock and a ram on every
604,he servant took Rebekah, and went his way. 
And Isaac came from the way of the well Lahairoi; for he dwelt in the south country. 
And Isaac went out to meditate in the field at the eventide: and he lifted up his eyes, and saw, and, behold, the camels were coming. 
And Rebekah lifted up her eyes, and when she saw Isaac, she lighted off the camel. 
For she had said unto the servant, What man is this that walketh in the field to meet us? And the servant had said, It is my master: therefore she took a vail, and covered herself. 
And the servant told Isaac all things that he had done. 
And Isaac brough
637,efuse to let him go, behold, I will slay thy son, even thy firstborn. 
And it came to pass by the way in the inn, that the LORD met him, and sought to kill him. 
Then Zipporah took a sharp stone, and cut off the foreskin of her son, and cast it at his feet, and said, Surely a bloody husband art thou to me. 
So he let him go: then she said, A bloody husband thou art, because of the circumcision. 
And the LORD said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses. And he went, and met him in the mount of God, and kissed him. 
And Moses told Aaron all the words of the LORD who had sent him, and all the signs which he had commanded him
690,he wisdom and the spirit by which he spake. 
Then they suborned men, which said, We have heard him speak blasphemous words against Moses, and against God. 
And they stirred up the people, and the elders, and the scribes, and came upon him, and caught him, and brought him to the council, 
And set up false witnesses, which said, This man ceaseth not to speak blasphemous words against this holy place, and the law: 
For we have heard him say, that this Jesus of Nazareth shall destroy this place, and shall change the customs which Moses delivered us. 
And all that sat in the council, looking stedfastly on him, saw his face as it had been the face of an angel. 
Then said the high priest,
563,at he maintain the cause of his servant, and the cause of his people Israel at all times, as the matter shall require: 
That all the people of the earth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else. 
Let your heart therefore be perfect with the LORD our God, to walk in his statutes, and to keep his commandments, as at this day. 
And the king, and all Israel with him, offered sacrifice before the LORD. 
And Solomon offered a sacrifice of peace offerings, which he offered unto the LORD, two and twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty tho
550, you, and scourges in your sides, and thorns in your eyes, until ye perish from off this good land which the LORD your God hath given you. 
And, behold, this day I am going the way of all the earth: and ye know in all your hearts and in all your souls, that not one thing hath failed of all the good things which the LORD your God spake concerning you; all are come to pass unto you, and not one thing hath failed thereof. 
Therefore it shall come to pass, that as all good things are come upon you, which the LORD your God promised you; so shall the
599,am. 
And there was there with us a young man, an Hebrew, servant to the captain of the guard; and we told him, and he interpreted to us our dreams; to each man according to his dream he did interpret. 
And it came to pass, as he interpreted to us, so it was; me he restored unto mine office, and him he hanged. 
Then Pharaoh sent and called Joseph, and they brought him hastily out of the dungeon: and he shaved himself, and changed his raiment, and came in unto Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, I have dreamed a dream, and there is none that can interpret it: and I have heard say of thee, t
660,rn them; they shall not deliver themselves from the power of the flame: there shall not be a coal to warm at, nor fire to sit before it. 
Thus shall they be unto thee with whom thou hast laboured, even thy merchants, from thy youth: they shall wander every one to his quarter; none shall save thee. 
Hear ye this, O house of Jacob, which are called by the name of Israel, and are come forth out of the waters of Judah, which swear by the name of the LORD, and make mention of the God of Israel, but not in truth, nor in righteousness. 
For they call themselves of the holy city, and stay themselves upon the God of Israel; The LORD of hosts is his name. 
I hav
529,, and the shovels, and the basons, all the vessels of the altar; and they shall spread upon it a covering of badgers' skins, and put to the staves of it. 
And when Aaron and his sons have made an end of covering the sanctuary, and all the vessels of the sanctuary, as the camp is to set forward; after that, the sons of Kohath shall come to bear it: but they shall not touch any holy thing, lest they die. These things are the burden of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And to the office of Eleazar the 
698, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told us your earnest desire, your mourning, your fervent mind toward me; so that I rejoiced the more. 
For though I made you sorry with a letter, I do not repent, though I did repent: for I perceive that the same epistle hath made you sorry, though it were but 
503,with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and trouble
508,could find none occasion nor fault; forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was there any error or fault found in him. 
Then said these men, We shall not find any occasion against this Daniel, except we find it against him concerning the law of his God. 
Then these presidents and princes assembled together to the king, and said thus unto him, King Darius, live for ever. 
All the presidents of the kingdom, the governors, and the princes, the counsellors, and the captains, have consulted together to establi
711,fifty cubits, and the height thereof thirty cubits, upon four rows of cedar pillars, with cedar beams upon the pillars. 
And it was covered with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on forty five pillars, fifteen in a row. 
And there were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with the windows: and light was against light in three ranks. 
And he made a porch of pillars; the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was before them: and the other pillars and the thick beam were before them. 
Then he made a porch for the throne where he might judge, even the porch of judgment: and it was cove
615,he blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst of their uncleanness. 
And there shall be no man in the tabernacle of the congregation when he goeth in to make an atonement in the holy place, until he come out, and have made an atonement for himself, and for his household, and for all the congregation of Israel. 

668,and doth the crown endure to every generation? 
The hay appeareth, and the tender grass sheweth itself, and herbs of the mountains are gathered. 
The lambs are for thy clothing, and the goats are the price of the field. 
And thou shalt have goats' milk enough for thy food, for the food of thy household, and for the maintenance for thy maidens. 
The wicked flee when no man pursueth: but the righteous are bold as a lion. 
For the transgression of a land many are the princes thereof: but by a man of understanding and knowledge the state thereof shall be prolonged. 
A poor man that oppresseth the poor is like a sweeping rain which leaveth no food. 
They that forsa
689, of the elders. 
He turneth rivers into a wilderness, and the watersprings into dry ground; 
A fruitful land into barrenness, for the wickedness of them that dwell therein. 
He turneth the wilderness into a standing water, and dry ground into watersprings. 
And there he maketh the hungry to dwell, that they may prepare a city for habitation; 
And sow the fields, and plant vineyards, which may yield fruits of increase. 
He blesseth them also, so that they are multiplied greatly; and suffereth not their cattle to decrease. 
Again, they are minished and brought low through oppression, affliction, and sorrow. 
He poureth contempt upon princes, and causeth them to wander in the wildern
605, was not with her. 
And the woman made haste, and ran, and shewed her husband, and said unto him, Behold, the man hath appeared unto me, that came unto me the other day. 
And Manoah arose, and went after his wife, and came to the man, and said unto him, Art thou the man that spakest unto the woman? And he said, I am. 
And Manoah said, Now let thy words come to pass. How shall we order the child, and how shall we do unto him? 
And the angel of the LORD said unto Manoah, Of all that I said unto the woman let her beware. 
She may not eat of any thing that cometh of the vine, neither let her drink wine
605, the LORD said unto me, Proclaim all these words in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, saying, Hear ye the words of this covenant, and do them. 
For I earnestly protested unto your fathers in the day that I brought them up out of the land of Egypt, even unto this day, rising early and protesting, saying, Obey my voice. 
Yet they obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one in the imagination of their evil heart: therefore I will bring upon them all the words of this covenant, which I commanded them to do: but they did them not. 
And the LORD said unto me, A conspiracy
619, weak. 
And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words. 
And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him. 
And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betrayeth me is at hand. 
And immediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and the scribes and the elders. 
And he that
545,ign; and he reigned twenty and five years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi. 
And he walked in all the ways of Asa his father; he turned not aside from it, doing that which was right in the eyes of the LORD: nevertheless the high places were not taken away; for the people offered and burnt incense yet in the high places. 
And Jehoshaphat made peace with the king of Israel. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he shewed, and how he warred, are they not written in the book of the ch
575,on the sabbath it shall be opened, and in the day of the new moon it shall be opened. 
And the prince shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate without, and shall stand by the post of the gate, and the priests shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, and he shall worship at the threshold of the gate: then he shall go forth; but the gate shall not be shut until the evening. 
Likewise the people of the land shall worship at the door of this gate before the LORD in the sabbaths and in the new moons. 
And the burnt offering that the prince shall off
482,hatsoever business she hath need of you: for she hath been a succourer of many, and of myself also. 
Greet Priscilla and Aquila my helpers in Christ Jesus: 
Who have for my life laid down their own necks: unto whom not only I give thanks, but also all the churches of the Gentiles. 
Likewise greet the church that is in their house. Salute my well-beloved Epaenetus, who is the firstfruits of Achaia unto Christ. 
Greet Mary, who bestowed much labour on us. 
Salute Andronicus and J
697,that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
In the third year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, twenty and four years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying, 
Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and made thee prince over my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger w
493,g that openeth the matrix in all flesh, which they bring unto the LORD, whether it be of men or beasts, shall be thine: nevertheless the firstborn of man shalt thou surely redeem, and the firstling of unclean beasts shalt thou redeem. 
And those that are to be redeemed from a month old shalt thou redeem, according to thine estimation, for the money of five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, which is twenty gerahs. 
But the firstling of a cow, or the firstling of a sheep, or the f
594, trust. 
Lift up your eyes to the heavens, and look upon the earth beneath: for the heavens shall vanish away like smoke, and the earth shall wax old like a garment, and they that dwell therein shall die in like manner: but my salvation shall be for ever, and my righteousness shall not be abolished. 
Hearken unto me, ye that know righteousness, the people in whose heart is my law; fear ye not the reproach of men, neither be ye afraid of their revilings. 
For the moth shall eat them up like a garment, and the worm shall eat them like wool: but my righteousness shall be for ever, and my sa
607,ed: behold, the judge standeth before the door. 
Take, my brethren, the prophets, who have spoken in the name of the Lord, for an example of suffering affliction, and of patience. 
Behold, we count them happy which endure. Ye have heard of the patience of Job, and have seen the end of the Lord; that the Lord is very pitiful, and of tender mercy. 
But above all things, my brethren, swear not, neither by heaven, neither by the earth, neither by any other oath: but let your yea be yea; and your nay, nay; lest ye fall into condemnation. 
Is any among you afflicted? let him pray. Is any merry? let him sin
715,roy their altars, break their images, and cut down their groves: 
For thou shalt worship no other god: for the LORD, whose name is Jealous, is a jealous God: 
Lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land, and they go a whoring after their gods, and do sacrifice unto their gods, and one call thee, and thou eat of his sacrifice; 
And thou take of their daughters unto thy sons, and their daughters go a whoring after their gods, and make thy sons go a whoring after their gods. 
Thou shalt make thee no molten gods. 
The feast of unleavened bread shalt thou keep. Seven days thou shalt eat unleavened bread, as I commanded thee, in the time of the month Abib: for in the month Abib thou camest out fro
502,ng the nations. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will raise up against Babylon, and against them that dwell in the midst of them that rise up against me, a destroying wind; 
And will send unto Babylon fanners, that shall fan her, and shall empty her land: for in the day of trouble they shall be against her round about. 
Against him that bendeth let the archer bend his bow, and against him that lifteth himself up in his brigandine: and spare ye not her young men; destroy ye utterly all her host. 
Th
625,y One and the Just, and desired a murderer to be granted unto you; 
And killed the Prince of life, whom God hath raised from the dead; whereof we are witnesses. 
And his name through faith in his name hath made this man strong, whom ye see and know: yea, the faith which is by him hath given him this perfect soundness in the presence of you all. 
And now, brethren, I wot that through ignorance ye did it, as did also your rulers. 
But those things, which God before had shewed by the mouth of all his prophets, that Christ should suffer, he hath so fulfilled. 
Repent ye therefore, and be converted, that your sins may be b
498,iece of a cake of figs, and two clusters of raisins: and when he had eaten, his spirit came again to him: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights. 
And David said unto him, To whom belongest thou? and whence art thou? And he said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite; and my master left me, because three days agone I fell sick. 
We made an invasion upon the south of the Cherethites, and upon the coast which belongeth to Judah, and upon the sout
666, both it and the change thereof shall be holy; it shall not be redeemed. 
These are the commandments, which the LORD commanded Moses for the children of Israel in mount Sinai. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the tabernacle of the congregation, on the first day of the second month, in the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying, 
Take ye the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, after their families, by the house of their fathers, with the number of their names, every male by their polls; 
From twenty years old and upward, all that are able to go forth to war in Israel: thou and Aaron sh
516, said, He casteth out devils through the prince of the devils. 
And Jesus went about all the cities and villages, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing every sickness and every disease among the people. 
But when he saw the multitudes, he was moved with compassion on them, because they fainted, and were scattered abroad, as sheep having no shepherd. 
Then saith he unto his disciples, The harvest truly is plenteous, but the labourers are few; 
Pray ye therefore the Lo
671,nser in his hand; and a thick cloud of incense went up. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen what the ancients of the house of Israel do in the dark, every man in the chambers of his imagery? for they say, the LORD seeth us not; the LORD hath forsaken the earth. 
He said also unto me, Turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations that they do. 
Then he brought me to the door of the gate of the LORD's house which was toward the north; and, behold, there sat women weeping for Tammuz. 
Then said he unto me, Hast thou seen this, O son of man? turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations than these. 
And he brought me into t
577,d in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; therefore she is removed: all that honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and turneth backward. 
Her filthiness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end; therefore she came down wonderfully: she had no comforter. O LORD, behold my affliction: for the enemy hath magnified himself. 
The adversary hath spread out his hand upon all her pleasa
480,e them: and shalt be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And thy carcase shall be meat unto all fowls of the air, and unto the beasts of the earth, and no man shall fray them away. 
The LORD will smite thee with the botch of Egypt, and with the emerods, and with the scab, and with the itch, whereof thou canst not be healed. 
The LORD shall smite thee with madness, and blindness, and astonishment of heart: 
And thou shalt grope at noonday, as the blind gropeth in dark
663,ptable unto the Lord. 
And have no fellowship with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather reprove them. 
For it is a shame even to speak of those things which are done of them in secret. 
But all things that are reproved are made manifest by the light: for whatsoever doth make manifest is light. 
Wherefore he saith, Awake thou that sleepest, and arise from the dead, and Christ shall give thee light. 
See then that ye walk circumspectly, not as fools, but as wise, 
Redeeming the time, because the days are evil. 
Wherefore be ye not unwise, but understanding what the will of the Lord is. 
And be not drunk with wine, wherein is excess; but be filled wi
636,because they had looked into the ark of the LORD, even he smote of the people fifty thousand and threescore and ten men: and the people lamented, because the LORD had smitten many of the people with a great slaughter. 
And the men of Bethshemesh said, Who is able to stand before this holy LORD God? and to whom shall he go up from us? 
And they sent messengers to the inhabitants of Kirjathjearim, saying, The Philistines have brought again the ark of the LORD; come ye down, and fetch it up to you. 
And the men of Kirjathjearim came, and fetched up the ark of the LORD, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanc
663, in mount Ephraim, and dwelt therein; and went out from thence, and built Penuel. 
And Jeroboam said in his heart, Now shall the kingdom return to the house of David: 
If this people go up to do sacrifice in the house of the LORD at Jerusalem, then shall the heart of this people turn again unto their lord, even unto Rehoboam king of Judah, and they shall kill me, and go again to Rehoboam king of Judah. 
Whereupon the king took counsel, and made two calves of gold, and said unto them, It is too much for you to go up to Jerusalem: behold thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And he set the one in Bethel, and the other put he i
720,he posts thereof, and the arches thereof, were according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the outward court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And he brought me to the north gate, and measured it according to these measures; 
The little chambers thereof, the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, and the windows to it round about: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits. 
And the posts thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the po
509,es with any thing that causeth sweat. 
And when they go forth into the utter court, even into the utter court to the people, they shall put off their garments wherein they ministered, and lay them in the holy chambers, and they shall put on other garments; and they shall not sanctify the people with their garments. 
Neither shall they shave their heads, nor suffer their locks to grow long; they shall only poll their heads. 
Neither shall any priest drink wine, when they enter into the inner court. 
Neith
651,; and his wife was barren, and bare not. 
And the angel of the LORD appeared unto the woman, and said unto her, Behold now, thou art barren, and bearest not: but thou shalt conceive, and bear a son. 
Now therefore beware, I pray thee, and drink not wine nor strong drink, and eat not any unclean thing: 
For, lo, thou shalt conceive, and bear a son; and no razor shall come on his head: for the child shall be a Nazarite unto God from the womb: and he shall begin to deliver Israel out of the hand of the Philistines. 
Then the woman came and told her husband, saying, A man of God came unto me, and his countenance was like the countenance of an ange
715, for himself a pillar, which is in the king's dale: for he said, I have no son to keep my name in remembrance: and he called the pillar after his own name: and it is called unto this day, Absalom's place. 
Then said Ahimaaz the son of Zadok, Let me now run, and bear the king tidings, how that the LORD hath avenged him of his enemies. 
And Joab said unto him, Thou shalt not bear tidings this day, but thou shalt bear tidings another day: but this day thou shalt bear no tidings, because the king's son is dead. 
Then said Joab to Cushi, Go tell the king what thou hast seen. And Cushi bowed himself unto Joab, and ran. 
Then said Ahimaaz the son of Zadok yet again to Joab, But howsoever, let me, I pray thee, als
550,e are his sides east and west; a portion for Dan. 
And by the border of Dan, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Asher. 
And by the border of Asher, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Naphtali. 
And by the border of Naphtali, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Manasseh. 
And by the border of Manasseh, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Ephraim. 
And by the border of Ephraim, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Reuben. 
And by the border of Reuben, 
615,Solomon the king. 
And the LORD magnified Solomon exceedingly in the sight of all Israel, and bestowed upon him such royal majesty as had not been on any king before him in Israel. 
Thus David the son of Jesse reigned over all Israel. 
And the time that he reigned over Israel was forty years; seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem. 
And he died in a good old age, full of days, riches, and honour: and Solomon his son reigned in his stead. 
Now the acts of David the king, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of Samuel the seer, and in the book of Na
638,h triumphed gloriously: the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea. 
The LORD is my strength and song, and he is become my salvation: he is my God, and I will prepare him an habitation; my father's God, and I will exalt him. 
The LORD is a man of war: the LORD is his name. 
Pharaoh's chariots and his host hath he cast into the sea: his chosen captains also are drowned in the Red sea. 
The depths have covered them: they sank into the bottom as a stone. 
Thy right hand, O LORD, is become glorious in power: thy right hand, O LORD, hath dashed in pieces the enemy. 
And in the greatness of thine excellency thou hast overthrown
659,ine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will recompense thee according to thy ways and thine abominations that are in the midst of thee; and ye shall know that I am the LORD that smiteth. 
Behold the day, behold, it is come: the morning is gone forth; the rod hath blossomed, pride hath budded. 
Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness: none of them shall remain, nor of their multitude, nor of any of their's: neither shall there be wailing for them. 
The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
For the seller shall not return to that which is sol
492,to us. 
But he answered and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not. 
Watch therefore, for ye know neither the day nor the hour wherein the Son of man cometh. 
For the kingdom of heaven is as a man travelling into a far country, who called his own servants, and delivered unto them his goods. 
And unto one he gave five talents, to another two, and to another one; to every man according to his several ability; and straightway took his journey. 
Then he that had received the five talent
527,nt seat in a place that is called the Pavement, but in the Hebrew, Gabbatha. 
And it was the preparation of the passover, and about the sixth hour: and he saith unto the Jews, Behold your King! 
But they cried out, Away with him, away with him, crucify him. Pilate saith unto them, Shall I crucify your King? The chief priests answered, We have no king but Caesar. 
Then delivered he him therefore unto them to be crucified. And they took Jesus, and led him away. 
And he bearing his cross went forth into a place called the pl
487,midst of the burning of the heifer. 
Then the priest shall wash his clothes, and he shall bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp, and the priest shall be unclean until the even. 
And he that burneth her shall wash his clothes in water, and bathe his flesh in water, and shall be unclean until the even. 
And a man that is clean shall gather up the ashes of the heifer, and lay them up without the camp in a clean place, and it shall be kept for the congregat
645,e: thou shalt also call unto them; but they will not answer thee. 
But thou shalt say unto them, This is a nation that obeyeth not the voice of the LORD their God, nor receiveth correction: truth is perished, and is cut off from their mouth. 
Cut off thine hair, O Jerusalem, and cast it away, and take up a lamentation on high places; for the LORD hath rejected and forsaken the generation of his wrath. 
For the children of Judah have done evil in my sight, saith the LORD: they have set their abominations in the house which is called by my name, to pollute it. 
And they have built the high places of Tophet, which is in the valley of the so
531,, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of Jordan, and take you up every man of you a stone upon his shoulder, according unto the number of the tribes of the children of Israel: 
That this may be a sign among you, that when your children ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean ye by these stones? 
Then ye shall answer them, That the waters of Jordan were cut off before the ark of the covenant of the LORD; when it passed over Jordan, the 
697,re ashamed, they covered their heads. 
Yea, the hind also calved in the field, and forsook it, because there was no grass. 
And the wild asses did stand in the high places, they snuffed up the wind like dragons; their eyes did fail, because there was no grass. 
O LORD, though our iniquities testify against us, do thou it for thy name's sake: for our backslidings are many; we have sinned against thee. 
O the hope of Israel, the saviour thereof in time of trouble, why shouldest thou be as a stranger in the land, and as a wayfaring man that turneth aside to tarry for a night? 
Why shouldest thou be as a man astonied, as a mighty man that cannot save? yet thou, O LORD, art in the midst of us,
645,ions thereof. 
And all the graven images thereof shall be beaten to pieces, and all the hires thereof shall be burned with the fire, and all the idols thereof will I lay desolate: for she gathered it of the hire of an harlot, and they shall return to the hire of an harlot. 
Therefore I will wail and howl, I will go stripped and naked: I will make a wailing like the dragons, and mourning as the owls. 
For her wound is incurable; for it is come unto Judah; he is come unto the gate of my people, even to Jerusalem. 
Declare ye it not at Gath, weep ye not at all: in the house of Aphrah roll thyself in the dust. 
Pass ye away, thou inhabitant 
691,voureth before them; and behind them a flame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them. 
The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run. 
Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devoureth the stubble, as a strong people set in battle array. 
Before their face the people shall be much pained: all faces shall gather blackness. 
They shall run like mighty men; they shall climb the wall like men of war; and they shall march every one on his ways, and they shall not break their ranks: 
Neithe
579,d two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward he made six boards. 
And two boards made he for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they were coupled beneath, and coupled together at the head thereof, to one ring: thus he did to both of them in both the corners. 
And there were eight boards; and their sockets were sixteen sockets of silver, under every board two sockets. 
And he made bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle, 
And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle
629, men of valour three hundred thousand. 
And next to him was Jehohanan the captain, and with him two hundred and fourscore thousand. 
And next him was Amasiah the son of Zichri, who willingly offered himself unto the LORD; and with him two hundred thousand mighty men of valour. 
And of Benjamin; Eliada a mighty man of valour, and with him armed men with bow and shield two hundred thousand. 
And next him was Jehozabad, and with him an hundred and fourscore thousand ready prepared for the war. 
These waited on the king, beside those whom the king put in the fenced cities throughout all Judah. 
Now Jehoshaphat had riches and 
635,aw my help in the gate: 
Then let mine arm fall from my shoulder blade, and mine arm be broken from the bone. 
For destruction from God was a terror to me, and by reason of his highness I could not endure. 
If I have made gold my hope, or have said to the fine gold, Thou art my confidence; 
If I rejoice because my wealth was great, and because mine hand had gotten much; 
If I beheld the sun when it shined, or the moon walking in brightness; 
And my heart hath been secretly enticed, or my mouth hath kissed my hand: 
This also were an iniquity to be punished by the judge: for I should have denied the God that is above. 
If I rejo
546,st you as evildoers, they may by your good works, which they shall behold, glorify God in the day of visitation. 
Submit yourselves to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake: whether it be to the king, as supreme; 
Or unto governors, as unto them that are sent by him for the punishment of evildoers, and for the praise of them that do well. 
For so is the will of God, that with well doing ye may put to silence the ignorance of foolish men: 
As free, and not using your liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God. 
Hon
624, come unto you, and speak face to face, that our joy may be full. 
The children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen. 
The elder unto the wellbeloved Gaius, whom I love in the truth. 
Beloved, I wish above all things that thou mayest prosper and be in health, even as thy soul prospereth. 
For I rejoiced greatly, when the brethren came and testified of the truth that is in thee, even as thou walkest in the truth. 
I have no greater joy than to hear that my children walk in truth. 
Beloved, thou doest faithfully whatsoever thou doest to the brethren, and to strangers; 
Which have borne witness of thy charity before the
664, before thee in our trespasses: for we cannot stand before thee because of this. 
Now when Ezra had prayed, and when he had confessed, weeping and casting himself down before the house of God, there assembled unto him out of Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children: for the people wept very sore. 
And Shechaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and have taken strange wives of the people of the land: yet now there is hope in Israel concerning this thing. 
Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, 
580,Elkanah, that dwelt in the villages of the Netophathites. 
And the porters were, Shallum, and Akkub, and Talmon, and Ahiman, and their brethren: Shallum was the chief; 
Who hitherto waited in the king's gate eastward: they were porters in the companies of the children of Levi. 
And Shallum the son of Kore, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, and his brethren, of the house of his father, the Korahites, were over the work of the service, keepers of the gates of the tabernacle: and their fathers, being over the host of the LORD, were keepers of the entry. 
And Phinehas the 
518,, even to us, who did eat and drink with him after he rose from the dead. 
And he commanded us to preach unto the people, and to testify that it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and dead. 
To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins. 
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word. 
And they of the circumcision which believed were astonished, as many as came with Peter, becau
561,d cut the bars of iron in sunder. 
Fools because of their transgression, and because of their iniquities, are afflicted. 
Their soul abhorreth all manner of meat; and they draw near unto the gates of death. 
Then they cry unto the LORD in their trouble, and he saveth them out of their distresses. 
He sent his word, and healed them, and delivered them from their destructions. 
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men! 
And let them sacrifice the sacrifices of thanksgiving, and declare his works 
668,t be day and night in their season; 
Then may also my covenant be broken with David my servant, that he should not have a son to reign upon his throne; and with the Levites the priests, my ministers. 
As the host of heaven cannot be numbered, neither the sand of the sea measured: so will I multiply the seed of David my servant, and the Levites that minister unto me. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah, saying, 
Considerest thou not what this people have spoken, saying, The two families which the LORD hath chosen, he hath even cast them off? thus they have despised my people, that they should be no more a nation before them. 
Thus saith the LORD; If
694,; and every one that loveth is born of God, and knoweth God. 
He that loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love. 
In this was manifested the love of God toward us, because that God sent his only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through him. 
Herein is love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for our sins. 
Beloved, if God so loved us, we ought also to love one another. 
No man hath seen God at any time. If we love one another, God dwelleth in us, and his love is perfected in us. 
Hereby know we that we dwell in him, and he in us, because he hath given us of his Spirit. 
And we have seen and do testify that the Father se
562,y wounded man. 
But I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and the arms of Pharaoh shall fall down; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt. 
And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them among the countries; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the third month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, speak u
573,ORD, and smote Job with sore boils from the sole of his foot unto his crown. 
And he took him a potsherd to scrape himself withal; and he sat down among the ashes. 
Then said his wife unto him, Dost thou still retain thine integrity? curse God, and die. 
But he said unto her, Thou speakest as one of the foolish women speaketh. What? shall we receive good at the hand of God, and shall we not receive evil? In all this did not Job sin with his lips. 
Now when Job's three friends heard of all this evil that was come upon him, they came every one from his own place; Eliph
584, the LORD was too little to receive the burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings. 
And at that time Solomon held a feast, and all Israel with him, a great congregation, from the entering in of Hamath unto the river of Egypt, before the LORD our God, seven days and seven days, even fourteen days. 
On the eighth day he sent the people away: and they blessed the king, and went unto their tents joyful and glad of heart for all the goodness that the LORD had done for David his servant, and for Israel his people. 
And it came to pass, when Solomon had f
569,quake, so that the foundations of the prison were shaken: and immediately all the doors were opened, and every one's bands were loosed. 
And the keeper of the prison awaking out of his sleep, and seeing the prison doors open, he drew out his sword, and would have killed himself, supposing that the prisoners had been fled. 
But Paul cried with a loud voice, saying, Do thyself no harm: for we are all here. 
Then he called for a light, and sprang in, and came trembling, and fell down before Paul and Silas, 
And brought them out, and said, Sirs, what must I do to be 
662,? And he answered, I am the son of a stranger, an Amalekite. 
And David said unto him, How wast thou not afraid to stretch forth thine hand to destroy the LORD's anointed? 
And David called one of the young men, and said, Go near, and fall upon him. And he smote him that he died. 
And David said unto him, Thy blood be upon thy head; for thy mouth hath testified against thee, saying, I have slain the LORD's anointed. 
And David lamented with this lamentation over Saul and over Jonathan his son: 
(Also he bade them teach the children of Judah the use of the bow: behold, it is written in the book of Jasher.) 
The beauty of Israel is slain upon thy high plac
667,e kingdom of God; and all these things shall be added unto you. 
Fear not, little flock; for it is your Father's good pleasure to give you the kingdom. 
Sell that ye have, and give alms; provide yourselves bags which wax not old, a treasure in the heavens that faileth not, where no thief approacheth, neither moth corrupteth. 
For where your treasure is, there will your heart be also. 
Let your loins be girded about, and your lights burning; 
And ye yourselves like unto men that wait for their lord, when he will return from the wedding; that when he cometh and knocketh, they may open unto him immediately. 
Blessed are those servants, whom the lord when he come
697, Solomon thy servant hath he not called. 
And thou, my lord, O king, the eyes of all Israel are upon thee, that thou shouldest tell them who shall sit on the throne of my lord the king after him. 
Otherwise it shall come to pass, when my lord the king shall sleep with his fathers, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders. 
And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, Nathan the prophet also came in. 
And they told the king, saying, Behold Nathan the prophet. And when he was come in before the king, he bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground. 
And Nathan said, My lord, O king, hast thou said, Adonijah shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? 
For
571,and all the Zidonians, which are gone down with the slain; with their terror they are ashamed of their might; and they lie uncircumcised with them that be slain by the sword, and bear their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
Pharaoh shall see them, and shall be comforted over all his multitude, even Pharaoh and all his army slain by the sword, saith the Lord GOD. 
For I have caused my terror in the land of the living: and he shall be laid in the midst of the uncircumcised with them that are slain with the sword, even Pharaoh and all his multitude, saith the 
551,were committed before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy. 
Ye shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my sabbaths: I am the LORD your God. 
Turn ye not unto idols, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am the LORD your God. 
And if ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye shall offer it at your own will. 
It 
581,ising the shame, and is set down at the right hand of the throne of God. 
For consider him that endured such contradiction of sinners against himself, lest ye be wearied and faint in your minds. 
Ye have not yet resisted unto blood, striving against sin. 
And ye have forgotten the exhortation which speaketh unto you as unto children, My son, despise not thou the chastening of the Lord, nor faint when thou art rebuked of him: 
For whom the Lord loveth he chasteneth, and scourgeth every son whom he receiveth. 
If ye endure chastening, God dealeth with you as with sons; for wha
521,his house, that my name may be there for ever: and mine eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. 
And as for thee, if thou wilt walk before me, as David thy father walked, and do according to all that I have commanded thee, and shalt observe my statutes and my judgments; 
Then will I stablish the throne of thy kingdom, according as I have covenanted with David thy father, saying, There shall not fail thee a man to be ruler in Israel. 
But if ye turn away, and forsake my statutes and my commandments, which I h
602, whom the mouth of the LORD hath spoken, that he may declare it, for what the land perisheth and is burned up like a wilderness, that none passeth through? 
And the LORD saith, Because they have forsaken my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither walked therein; 
But have walked after the imagination of their own heart, and after Baalim, which their fathers taught them: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will feed them, even this people, with wormwood, and give them water of gall to drink. 
I will scatter them also among the heathen, 
666,y without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he die, and was not his enemy, neither sought his harm: 
Then the congregation shall judge between the slayer and the revenger of blood according to these judgments: 
And the congregation shall deliver the slayer out of the hand of the revenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to the city of his refuge, whither he was fled: and he shall abide in it unto the death of the high priest, which was anointed with the holy oil. 
But if the slayer shall at any time come without the border of 
516,all the wise men of Babylon. 
And the decree went forth that the wise men should be slain; and they sought Daniel and his fellows to be slain. 
Then Daniel answered with counsel and wisdom to Arioch the captain of the king's guard, which was gone forth to slay the wise men of Babylon: 
He answered and said to Arioch the king's captain, Why is the decree so hasty from the king? Then Arioch made the thing known to Daniel. 
Then Daniel went in, and desired of the king that he would give him time, and that he would
517,heard of all this evil that was come upon him, they came every one from his own place; Eliphaz the Temanite, and Bildad the Shuhite, and Zophar the Naamathite: for they had made an appointment together to come to mourn with him and to comfort him. 
And when they lifted up their eyes afar off, and knew him not, they lifted up their voice, and wept; and they rent every one his mantle, and sprinkled dust upon their heads toward heaven. 
So they sat down with him upon the ground seven days and seven nights, and none
598,ircumcised, which are gone down to hell with their weapons of war: and they have laid their swords under their heads, but their iniquities shall be upon their bones, though they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living. 
Yea, thou shalt be broken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and shalt lie with them that are slain with the sword. 
There is Edom, her kings, and all her princes, which with their might are laid by them that were slain by the sword: they shall lie with the uncircumcised, and with them that go down to the pit. 
There be the princes of the north, all of them, a
628,thers nor we were able to bear? 
But we believe that through the grace of the LORD Jesus Christ we shall be saved, even as they. 
Then all the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to Barnabas and Paul, declaring what miracles and wonders God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men and brethren, hearken unto me: 
Simeon hath declared how God at the first did visit the Gentiles, to take out of them a people for his name. 
And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written, 
After this I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of Davi
657, other; or else he will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon. 
Therefore I say unto you, Take no thought for your life, what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink; nor yet for your body, what ye shall put on. Is not the life more than meat, and the body than raiment? 
Behold the fowls of the air: for they sow not, neither do they reap, nor gather into barns; yet your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are ye not much better than they? 
Which of you by taking thought can add one cubit unto his stature? 
And why take ye thought for raiment? Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow; they toil not, neither do they spin
581,faithful unto death, and I will give thee a crown of life. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; He that overcometh shall not be hurt of the second death. 
And to the angel of the church in Pergamos write; These things saith he which hath the sharp sword with two edges; 
I know thy works, and where thou dwellest, even where Satan's seat is: and thou holdest fast my name, and hast not denied my faith, even in those days wherein Antipas was my faithful martyr, who was slain among you, where Satan dwelleth. 
But I have a few things against 
551,not the cause, the cause of the fatherless, yet they prosper; and the right of the needy do they not judge. 
Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
A wonderful and horrible thing is committed in the land; 
The prophets prophesy falsely, and the priests bear rule by their means; and my people love to have it so: and what will ye do in the end thereof? 
O ye children of Benjamin, gather yourselves to flee out of the midst of Jerusalem, and blow the trumpet in Tekoa, and set up a 
565,ome is; but exhorting one another: and so much the more, as ye see the day approaching. 
For if we sin wilfully after that we have received the knowledge of the truth, there remaineth no more sacrifice for sins, 
But a certain fearful looking for of judgment and fiery indignation, which shall devour the adversaries. 
He that despised Moses' law died without mercy under two or three witnesses: 
Of how much sorer punishment, suppose ye, shall he be thought worthy, who hath trodden under foot the Son of God, and hath counted the blood of the covenant, wherewith 
710, himself unto his master? should it not be with the heads of these men? 
Is not this David, of whom they sang one to another in dances, saying, Saul slew his thousands, and David his ten thousands? 
Then Achish called David, and said unto him, Surely, as the LORD liveth, thou hast been upright, and thy going out and thy coming in with me in the host is good in my sight: for I have not found evil in thee since the day of thy coming unto me unto this day: nevertheless the lords favour thee not. 
Wherefore now return, and go in peace, that thou displease not the lords of the Philistines. 
And David said unto Achish, But what have I done? and what hast thou found in thy servant so long as I have been with
713,e years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Jerushah, the daughter of Zadok. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that his father Uzziah did: howbeit he entered not into the temple of the LORD. And the people did yet corruptly. 
He built the high gate of the house of the LORD, and on the wall of Ophel he built much. 
Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the forests he built castles and towers. 
He fought also with the king of the Ammonites, and prevailed against them. And the children of Ammon gave him the same year an hundred talents of silver, and ten thousand measures of wheat, an
681,d to the soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved. 
Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off. 
And while the day was coming on, Paul besought them all to take meat, saying, This day is the fourteenth day that ye have tarried and continued fasting, having taken nothing. 
Wherefore I pray you to take some meat: for this is for your health: for there shall not an hair fall from the head of any of you. 
And when he had thus spoken, he took bread, and gave thanks to God in presence of them all: and when he had broken it, he began to eat. 
Then were they all of good cheer, and they also took some meat. 
And we were in all in the s
540, forth also into a large place: he delivered me, because he delighted in me. 
The LORD rewarded me according to my righteousness: according to the cleanness of my hands hath he recompensed me. 
For I have kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me: and as for his statutes, I did not depart from them. 
I was also upright before him, and have kept myself from mine iniquity. 
Therefore the LORD hath recompensed me according to my righteousness; according to my cleanness in
671,oing up, ward against ward. 
Eastward were six Levites, northward four a day, southward four a day, and toward Asuppim two and two. 
At Parbar westward, four at the causeway, and two at Parbar. 
These are the divisions of the porters among the sons of Kore, and among the sons of Merari. 
And of the Levites, Ahijah was over the treasures of the house of God, and over the treasures of the dedicated things. 
As concerning the sons of Laadan; the sons of the Gershonite Laadan, chief fathers, even of Laadan the Gershonite, were Jehieli. 
The sons of Jehieli; Zetham, and Joel his brother, which were over the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Of the Amramites, and th
615,u hast sent me. 
And I have declared unto them thy name, and will declare it: that the love wherewith thou hast loved me may be in them, and I in them. 
When Jesus had spoken these words, he went forth with his disciples over the brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he entered, and his disciples. 
And Judas also, which betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus ofttimes resorted thither with his disciples. 
Judas then, having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons. 
Jesus therefore, knowing all things that should
533,of the wrath of her fornication. 
And the third angel followed them, saying with a loud voice, If any man worship the beast and his image, and receive his mark in his forehead, or in his hand, 
The same shall drink of the wine of the wrath of God, which is poured out without mixture into the cup of his indignation; and he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb: 
And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever: and they have no rest day nor nig
629,things, behold, the angel of the LORD appeared unto him in a dream, saying, Joseph, thou son of David, fear not to take unto thee Mary thy wife: for that which is conceived in her is of the Holy Ghost. 
And she shall bring forth a son, and thou shalt call his name JESUS: for he shall save his people from their sins. 
Now all this was done, that it might be fulfilled which was spoken of the Lord by the prophet, saying, 
Behold, a virgin shall be with child, and shall bring forth a son, and they shall call his name Emmanuel, which being interpreted is, God with us. 
Then Joseph being raised from sleep did as the angel of th
679,ded. 
Truly God is good to Israel, even to such as are of a clean heart. 
But as for me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well nigh slipped. 
For I was envious at the foolish, when I saw the prosperity of the wicked. 
For there are no bands in their death: but their strength is firm. 
They are not in trouble as other men; neither are they plagued like other men. 
Therefore pride compasseth them about as a chain; violence covereth them as a garment. 
Their eyes stand out with fatness: they have more than heart could wish. 
They are corrupt, and speak wickedly concerning oppression: they speak loftily. 
They set their mouth against the heavens, and their tongue walke
692,and the other for a burnt offering. 
And he shall bring them unto the priest, who shall offer that which is for the sin offering first, and wring off his head from his neck, but shall not divide it asunder: 
And he shall sprinkle of the blood of the sin offering upon the side of the altar; and the rest of the blood shall be wrung out at the bottom of the altar: it is a sin offering. 
And he shall offer the second for a burnt offering, according to the manner: and the priest shall make an atonement for him for his sin which he hath sinned, and it shall be forgiven him. 
But if he be not able to bring two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, then he that sinned shall bring for his offeri
544,made a covenant. 
And Abraham set seven ewe lambs of the flock by themselves. 
And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What mean these seven ewe lambs which thou hast set by themselves? 
And he said, For these seven ewe lambs shalt thou take of my hand, that they may be a witness unto me, that I have digged this well. 
Wherefore he called that place Beersheba; because there they sware both of them. 
Thus they made a covenant at Beersheba: then Abimelech rose up, and Phichol the chief captain of his host, and they returned into the land of the Ph
512,r kings; even Pharaoh, and all them that trust in him: 
And I will deliver them into the hand of those that seek their lives, and into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of his servants: and afterward it shall be inhabited, as in the days of old, saith the LORD. 
But fear not thou, O my servant Jacob, and be not dismayed, O Israel: for, behold, I will save thee from afar off, and thy seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and be in rest and at ease, and non
709,art be glad when he stumbleth: 
Lest the LORD see it, and it displease him, and he turn away his wrath from him. 
Fret not thyself because of evil men, neither be thou envious at the wicked: 
For there shall be no reward to the evil man; the candle of the wicked shall be put out. 
My son, fear thou the LORD and the king: and meddle not with them that are given to change: 
For their calamity shall rise suddenly; and who knoweth the ruin of them both? 
These things also belong to the wise. It is not good to have respect of persons in judgment. 
He that saith unto the wicked, Thou are righteous; him shall the people curse, nations shall abhor him: 
But to them that rebuke him shall be delight, and a goo
490, within the vail, and do with that blood as he did with the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst of their uncleanness. 
And there shall be no man in the tabernacle of the congregatio
640,ave opened my mouth unto the LORD, and I cannot go back. 
And she said unto him, My father, if thou hast opened thy mouth unto the LORD, do to me according to that which hath proceeded out of thy mouth; forasmuch as the LORD hath taken vengeance for thee of thine enemies, even of the children of Ammon. 
And she said unto her father, Let this thing be done for me: let me alone two months, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my fellows. 
And he said, Go. And he sent her away for two months: and she went with her companions, and bewailed her virginity upon the mountains. 
And it came to pass at 
542,r feet he bowed, he fell: where he bowed, there he fell down dead. 
The mother of Sisera looked out at a window, and cried through the lattice, Why is his chariot so long in coming? why tarry the wheels of his chariots? 
Her wise ladies answered her, yea, she returned answer to herself, 
Have they not sped? have they not divided the prey; to every man a damsel or two; to Sisera a prey of divers colours, a prey of divers colours of needlework, of divers colours of needlework on both sides, meet for the necks of them that take the spoil? 
621, their covetousness. 
And, lo, thou art unto them as a very lovely song of one that hath a pleasant voice, and can play well on an instrument: for they hear thy words, but they do them not. 
And when this cometh to pass, (lo, it will come,) then shall they know that a prophet hath been among them. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto the shepherds; Woe be to the shepherds of Israel that do feed themselves! should not the shepherds feed the flocks? 
Ye eat the fat, and ye clothe you with the w
582,ot the fire ye shall make go through the water. 
And ye shall wash your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall be clean, and afterward ye shall come into the camp. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the sum of the prey that was taken, both of man and of beast, thou, and Eleazar the priest, and the chief fathers of the congregation: 
And divide the prey into two parts; between them that took the war upon them, who went out to battle, and between all the congregation: 
And levy a tribute unto the LORD of the men of war which went out to battle: one soul of five hun
711,, and they had no leisure so much as to eat. 
And they departed into a desert place by ship privately. 
And the people saw them departing, and many knew him, and ran afoot thither out of all cities, and outwent them, and came together unto him. 
And Jesus, when he came out, saw much people, and was moved with compassion toward them, because they were as sheep not having a shepherd: and he began to teach them many things. 
And when the day was now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said, This is a desert place, and now the time is far passed: 
Send them away, that they may go into the country round about, and into the villages, and buy themselves bread: for they have nothing to eat. 
He answere
515,nd over all things that belong to it: they shall bear the tabernacle, and all the vessels thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle. 
And when the tabernacle setteth forward, the Levites shall take it down: and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall set it up: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own camp, and every man by his own standard, throughout their host
615, and to judge of you: but he that sent me is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have heard of him. 
They understood not that he spake to them of the Father. 
Then said Jesus unto them, When ye have lifted up the Son of man, then shall ye know that I am he, and that I do nothing of myself; but as my Father hath taught me, I speak these things. 
And he that sent me is with me: the Father hath not left me alone; for I do always those things that please him. 
As he spake these words, many believed on him. 
Then said Jesus to those Jews which believed on him, If ye continue in my word, then are y
606, the devil prayed him that he might be with him. 
Howbeit Jesus suffered him not, but saith unto him, Go home to thy friends, and tell them how great things the Lord hath done for thee, and hath had compassion on thee. 
And he departed, and began to publish in Decapolis how great things Jesus had done for him: and all men did marvel. 
And when Jesus was passed over again by ship unto the other side, much people gathered unto him: and he was nigh unto the sea. 
And, behold, there cometh one of the rulers of the synagogue, Jairus by name; and when he saw him, he fell at his feet, 
And besought him gre
716,f. 
For by the last words of David the Levites were numbered from twenty years old and above: 
Because their office was to wait on the sons of Aaron for the service of the house of the LORD, in the courts, and in the chambers, and in the purifying of all holy things, and the work of the service of the house of God; 
Both for the shewbread, and for the fine flour for meat offering, and for the unleavened cakes, and for that which is baked in the pan, and for that which is fried, and for all manner of measure and size; 
And to stand every morning to thank and praise the LORD, and likewise at even: 
And to offer all burnt sacrifices unto the LORD in the sabbaths, in the new moons, and on the set feasts, by num
630,he judgment was by one to condemnation, but the free gift is of many offences unto justification. 
For if by one man's offence death reigned by one; much more they which receive abundance of grace and of the gift of righteousness shall reign in life by one, Jesus Christ.) 
Therefore as by the offence of one judgment came upon all men to condemnation; even so by the righteousness of one the free gift came upon all men unto justification of life. 
For as by one man's disobedience many were made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But wher
700, a nation bringing forth the fruits thereof. 
And whosoever shall fall on this stone shall be broken: but on whomsoever it shall fall, it will grind him to powder. 
And when the chief priests and Pharisees had heard his parables, they perceived that he spake of them. 
But when they sought to lay hands on him, they feared the multitude, because they took him for a prophet. 
And Jesus answered and spake unto them again by parables, and said, 
The kingdom of heaven is like unto a certain king, which made a marriage for his son, 
And sent forth his servants to call them that were bidden to the wedding: and they would not come. 
Again, he sent forth other servants, saying, Tell them which are bid
623,he Levites: 
Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Merari; Asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the chief and his brethren an hundred and thirty: 
Of the sons of Elizaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 
Of the sons of Hebron; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Amminadab the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twelve. 
And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminad
578, name, and caused every man his servant, and every man his handmaid, whom he had set at liberty at their pleasure, to return, and brought them into subjection, to be unto you for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ye have not hearkened unto me, in proclaiming liberty, every one to his brother, and every man to his neighbour: behold, I proclaim a liberty for you, saith the LORD, to the sword, to the pestilence, and to the famine; and I will make you to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And I will give the men that have transgressed my
508,and me. 
When she saw that she was stedfastly minded to go with her, then she left speaking unto her. 
So they two went until they came to Bethlehem. And it came to pass, when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the city was moved about them, and they said, Is this Naomi? 
And she said unto them, Call me not Naomi, call me Mara: for the Almighty hath dealt very bitterly with me. 
I went out full and the LORD hath brought me home again empty: why then call ye me Naomi, seeing the LORD hath testified ag
660,he longsuffering of God waited in the days of Noah, while the ark was a preparing, wherein few, that is, eight souls were saved by water. 
The like figure whereunto even baptism doth also now save us (not the putting away of the filth of the flesh, but the answer of a good conscience toward God,) by the resurrection of Jesus Christ: 
Who is gone into heaven, and is on the right hand of God; angels and authorities and powers being made subject unto him. 
Forasmuch then as Christ hath suffered for us in the flesh, arm yourselves likewise with the same mind: for he that hath suffered in the flesh hath ceased from sin; 
That he no longer should live the re
497,rtheless I am not ashamed: for I know whom I have believed, and am persuaded that he is able to keep that which I have committed unto him against that day. 
Hold fast the form of sound words, which thou hast heard of me, in faith and love which is in Christ Jesus. 
That good thing which was committed unto thee keep by the Holy Ghost which dwelleth in us. 
This thou knowest, that all they which are in Asia be turned away from me; of whom are Phygellus and Hermogenes. 
The Lord give mercy unto 
598, of your oil; for our lamps are gone out. 
But the wise answered, saying, Not so; lest there be not enough for us and you: but go ye rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves. 
And while they went to buy, the bridegroom came; and they that were ready went in with him to the marriage: and the door was shut. 
Afterward came also the other virgins, saying, Lord, Lord, open to us. 
But he answered and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not. 
Watch therefore, for ye know neither the day nor the hour wherein the Son of man cometh. 
For the kingdom of heaven is as a man travelling into 
600,oung men for Nazarites. Is it not even thus, O ye children of Israel? saith the LORD. 
But ye gave the Nazarites wine to drink; and commanded the prophets, saying, Prophesy not. 
Behold, I am pressed under you, as a cart is pressed that is full of sheaves. 
Therefore the flight shall perish from the swift, and the strong shall not strengthen his force, neither shall the mighty deliver himself: 
Neither shall he stand that handleth the bow; and he that is swift of foot shall not deliver himself: neither shall he that rideth the horse deliver himself. 
And he that is courageous among the mighty 
599, from him, nor suffer my faithfulness to fail. 
My covenant will I not break, nor alter the thing that is gone out of my lips. 
Once have I sworn by my holiness that I will not lie unto David. 
His seed shall endure for ever, and his throne as the sun before me. 
It shall be established for ever as the moon, and as a faithful witness in heaven. Selah. 
But thou hast cast off and abhorred, thou hast been wroth with thine anointed. 
Thou hast made void the covenant of thy servant: thou hast profaned his crown by casting it to the ground. 
Thou hast broken down all his hedges; thou hast brought 
713,give an offering unto the LORD. 
The rich shall not give more, and the poor shall not give less than half a shekel, when they give an offering unto the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And thou shalt take the atonement money of the children of Israel, and shalt appoint it for the service of the tabernacle of the congregation; that it may be a memorial unto the children of Israel before the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thou shalt also make a laver of brass, and his foot also of brass, to wash withal: and thou shalt put it between the tabernacle of the congregation and the altar, and thou shalt put water therein. 
For Aaron and his sons shal
495,ory among the heathen, and all the heathen shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them. 
So the house of Israel shall know that I am the LORD their God from that day and forward. 
And the heathen shall know that the house of Israel went into captivity for their iniquity: because they trespassed against me, therefore hid I my face from them, and gave them into the hand of their enemies: so fell they all by the sword. 
According to their uncleanness and 
515,linen clothes, even the holy garments: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy sanctuary, and he shall make an atonement for the tabernacle of the congregation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for the priests, and for all the people of the congregation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. And he did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, and unt
535,y wherein I walked have they privily laid a snare for me. 
I looked on my right hand, and beheld, but there was no man that would know me: refuge failed me; no man cared for my soul. 
I cried unto thee, O LORD: I said, Thou art my refuge and my portion in the land of the living. 
Attend unto my cry; for I am brought very low: deliver me from my persecutors; for they are stronger than I. 
Bring my soul out of prison, that I may praise thy name: the righteous shall compass me about; for thou shalt deal bountifully with me. 
Hear my
691,: for ye shall burn no leaven, nor any honey, in any offering of the LORD made by fire. 
As for the oblation of the firstfruits, ye shall offer them unto the LORD: but they shall not be burnt on the altar for a sweet savour. 
And every oblation of thy meat offering shalt thou season with salt; neither shalt thou suffer the salt of the covenant of thy God to be lacking from thy meat offering: with all thine offerings thou shalt offer salt. 
And if thou offer a meat offering of thy firstfruits unto the LORD, thou shalt offer for the meat offering of thy firstfruits green ears of corn dried by the fire, even corn beaten out of full ears. 
And thou shalt put oil upon it, and lay frankin
548,m; seeing all the people were in ignorance. 
And if any soul sin through ignorance, then he shall bring a she goat of the first year for a sin offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for the soul that sinneth ignorantly, when he sinneth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an atonement for him; and it shall be forgiven him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuous
597,srael took Amaziah king of Judah, the son of Joash, the son of Jehoahaz, at Bethshemesh, and brought him to Jerusalem, and brake down the wall of Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim to the corner gate, four hundred cubits. 
And he took all the gold and the silver, and all the vessels that were found in the house of God with Obededom, and the treasures of the king's house, the hostages also, and returned to Samaria. 
And Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah lived after the death of Joash son of Jehoahaz king of Israel fifteen years. 
Now the rest of the acts of Amaziah, first and last, beho
707,m his wicked way, by promising him life: 
Therefore ye shall see no more vanity, nor divine divinations: for I will deliver my people out of your hand: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Then came certain of the elders of Israel unto me, and sat before me. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, these men have set up their idols in their heart, and put the stumblingblock of their iniquity before their face: should I be enquired of at all by them? 
Therefore speak unto them, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Every man of the house of Israel that setteth up his idols in his heart, and putteth the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and cometh to the prop
556,hole assembly took counsel to keep other seven days: and they kept other seven days with gladness. 
For Hezekiah king of Judah did give to the congregation a thousand bullocks and seven thousand sheep; and the princes gave to the congregation a thousand bullocks and ten thousand sheep: and a great number of priests sanctified themselves. 
And all the congregation of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the congregation that came out of Israel, and the strangers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced. 
So th
659,e remainder of the flesh of the sacrifice on the third day shall be burnt with fire. 
And if any of the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings be eaten at all on the third day, it shall not be accepted, neither shall it be imputed unto him that offereth it: it shall be an abomination, and the soul that eateth of it shall bear his iniquity. 
And the flesh that toucheth any unclean thing shall not be eaten; it shall be burnt with fire: and as for the flesh, all that be clean shall eat thereof. 
But the soul that eateth of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, that pertain unto the LORD, having his uncleanness upon him, even that soul sha
650, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Elishama the son of Ammihud. 
On the eighth day offered Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur, prince of the children of Manasseh: 
His offering was one silver
608, thereof, and of the upper chambers thereof, and of the inner parlours thereof, and of the place of the mercy seat, 
And the pattern of all that he had by the spirit, of the courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the chambers round about, of the treasuries of the house of God, and of the treasuries of the dedicated things: 
Also for the courses of the priests and the Levites, and for all the work of the service of the house of the LORD, and for all the vessels of service in the house of the LORD. 
He gave of gold by weight for things of gold, for all instruments of all manner of service; silver a
569,reak of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; 
And his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; 
And the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith; and the fifth, Shephatiah the son of Abital; 
And the sixth, Ithream, by Eglah David's wife. These w
491,y, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and
617,be consumed by the sword and by the famine: they shall die, from the least even unto the greatest, by the sword and by the famine: and they shall be an execration, and an astonishment, and a curse, and a reproach. 
For I will punish them that dwell in the land of Egypt, as I have punished Jerusalem, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence: 
So that none of the remnant of Judah, which are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall escape or remain, that they should return into the land of Judah, to the which they have a desire to return to dwell there: for none shall return but such as shall
543,hey shall build the old wastes, they shall raise up the former desolations, and they shall repair the waste cities, the desolations of many generations. 
And strangers shall stand and feed your flocks, and the sons of the alien shall be your plowmen and your vinedressers. 
But ye shall be named the Priests of the LORD: men shall call you the Ministers of our God: ye shall eat the riches of the Gentiles, and in their glory shall ye boast yourselves. 
For your shame ye shall have double; and for confusion they shall rejoice in their portio
592,re, Nehemiah, the Tirshatha, the son of Hachaliah, and Zidkijah, 
Seraiah, Azariah, Jeremiah, 
Pashur, Amariah, Malchijah, 
Hattush, Shebaniah, Malluch, 
Harim, Meremoth, Obadiah, 
Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch, 
Meshullam, Abijah, Mijamin, 
Maaziah, Bilgai, Shemaiah: these were the priests. 
And the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the sons of Henadad, Kadmiel; 
And their brethren, Shebaniah, Hodijah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan, 
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 
Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah, 
Hodijah, Bani, Beninu. 
The chief of the people; Parosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani, 

621,f the people that are on the wall. 
But Rabshakeh said, Hath my master sent me to thy master and to thee to speak these words? hath he not sent me to the men that sit upon the wall, that they may eat their own dung, and drink their own piss with you? 
Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and said, Hear ye the words of the great king, the king of Assyria. 
Thus saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall not be able to deliver you. 
Neither let Hezekiah make you trust in the LORD, saying, The LORD will surely deliver us: this city shall not be delivered into the ha
582,children, and live many years, so that the days of his years be many, and his soul be not filled with good, and also that he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better than he. 
For he cometh in with vanity, and departeth in darkness, and his name shall be covered with darkness. 
Moreover he hath not seen the sun, nor known any thing: this hath more rest than the other. 
Yea, though he live a thousand years twice told, yet hath he seen no good: do not all go to one place? 
All the labour of man is for his mouth, and yet the appetite is not filled. 
For what hath 
661,e years old and upward they shall go in to wait upon the service of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And from the age of fifty years they shall cease waiting upon the service thereof, and shall serve no more: 
But shall minister with their brethren in the tabernacle of the congregation, to keep the charge, and shall do no service. Thus shalt thou do unto the Levites touching their charge. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the first month of the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying, 
Let the children of Israel also keep the passover at his appointed season. 
In the fourteenth day of this month,
713,t into their mothers' bosom. 
What thing shall I take to witness for thee? what thing shall I liken to thee, O daughter of Jerusalem? what shall I equal to thee, that I may comfort thee, O virgin daughter of Zion? for thy breach is great like the sea: who can heal thee? 
Thy prophets have seen vain and foolish things for thee: and they have not discovered thine iniquity, to turn away thy captivity; but have seen for thee false burdens and causes of banishment. 
All that pass by clap their hands at thee; they hiss and wag their head at the daughter of Jerusalem, saying, Is this the city that men call The perfection of beauty, The joy of the whole earth? 
All thine enemies have opened their mouth against t
545,e burned. 
But, beloved, we are persuaded better things of you, and things that accompany salvation, though we thus speak. 
For God is not unrighteous to forget your work and labour of love, which ye have shewed toward his name, in that ye have ministered to the saints, and do minister. 
And we desire that every one of you do shew the same diligence to the full assurance of hope unto the end: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because h
648,ed into the house; and putting his hands on him said, Brother Saul, the Lord, even Jesus, that appeared unto thee in the way as thou camest, hath sent me, that thou mightest receive thy sight, and be filled with the Holy Ghost. 
And immediately there fell from his eyes as it had been scales: and he received sight forthwith, and arose, and was baptized. 
And when he had received meat, he was strengthened. Then was Saul certain days with the disciples which were at Damascus. 
And straightway he preached Christ in the synagogues, that he is the Son of God. 
But all that heard him were amazed, and said; Is not this he that destroyed them which 
707,rnacle of the congregation. 
And if they blow but with one trumpet, then the princes, which are heads of the thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves unto thee. 
When ye blow an alarm, then the camps that lie on the east parts shall go forward. 
When ye blow an alarm the second time, then the camps that lie on the south side shall take their journey: they shall blow an alarm for their journeys. 
But when the congregation is to be gathered together, ye shall blow, but ye shall not sound an alarm. 
And the sons of Aaron, the priests, shall blow with the trumpets; and they shall be to you for an ordinance for ever throughout your generations. 
And if ye go to war in your land against the enemy tha
615,y generations. 
Thou shalt also suck the milk of the Gentiles, and shalt suck the breast of kings: and thou shalt know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob. 
For brass I will bring gold, and for iron I will bring silver, and for wood brass, and for stones iron: I will also make thy officers peace, and thine exactors righteousness. 
Violence shall no more be heard in thy land, wasting nor destruction within thy borders; but thou shalt call thy walls Salvation, and thy gates Praise. 
The sun shall be no more thy light by day; neither for brightness shall the moon give light 
573,d the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine eyes have seen how that the LORD had delivered thee to day into mine hand in the cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand against my lord; for he is the LORD's anointed. 
Moreover, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my hand: for in that I cut off the skirt of thy r
636,im curse; for the LORD hath bidden him. 
It may be that the LORD will look on mine affliction, and that the LORD will requite me good for his cursing this day. 
And as David and his men went by the way, Shimei went along on the hill's side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust. 
And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary, and refreshed themselves there. 
And Absalom, and all the people the men of Israel, came to Jerusalem, and Ahithophel with him. 
And it came to pass, when Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come unto Absalom, that Hushai said unto Absalom, God 
588, astonishment. 
Thou hast given a banner to them that fear thee, that it may be displayed because of the truth. Selah. 
That thy beloved may be delivered; save with thy right hand, and hear me. 
God hath spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine, and Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe: Philistia, triumph thou because of me. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O
706,make it go through the fire, and it shall be clean: nevertheless it shall be purified with the water of separation: and all that abideth not the fire ye shall make go through the water. 
And ye shall wash your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall be clean, and afterward ye shall come into the camp. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the sum of the prey that was taken, both of man and of beast, thou, and Eleazar the priest, and the chief fathers of the congregation: 
And divide the prey into two parts; between them that took the war upon them, who went out to battle, and between all the congregation: 
And levy a tribute unto the LORD of the men of war which went out to battle: one so
566,ter that we had suffered before, and were shamefully entreated, as ye know, at Philippi, we were bold in our God to speak unto you the gospel of God with much contention. 
For our exhortation was not of deceit, nor of uncleanness, nor in guile: 
But as we were allowed of God to be put in trust with the gospel, even so we speak; not as pleasing men, but God, which trieth our hearts. 
For neither at any time used we flattering words, as ye know, nor a cloke of covetousness; God is witness: 
Nor of men sought we glory, neither of you, nor yet of others, when we m
603, thee in thy ways: behold, thou art wroth; for we have sinned: in those is continuance, and we shall be saved. 
But we are all as an unclean thing, and all our righteousnesses are as filthy rags; and we all do fade as a leaf; and our iniquities, like the wind, have taken us away. 
And there is none that calleth upon thy name, that stirreth up himself to take hold of thee: for thou hast hid thy face from us, and hast consumed us, because of our iniquities. 
But now, O LORD, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou our potter; and we all are the work of thy hand. 
Be not wroth very sore, O LO
603, extortioner catch all that he hath; and let the strangers spoil his labour. 
Let there be none to extend mercy unto him: neither let there be any to favour his fatherless children. 
Let his posterity be cut off; and in the generation following let their name be blotted out. 
Let the iniquity of his fathers be remembered with the LORD; and let not the sin of his mother be blotted out. 
Let them be before the LORD continually, that he may cut off the memory of them from the earth. 
Because that he remembered not to shew mercy, but persecuted the poor and needy man, that he might even slay the brok
581,n unto thee, then it shall be, that all the people that is found therein shall be tributaries unto thee, and they shall serve thee. 
And if it will make no peace with thee, but will make war against thee, then thou shalt besiege it: 
And when the LORD thy God hath delivered it into thine hands, thou shalt smite every male thereof with the edge of the sword: 
But the women, and the little ones, and the cattle, and all that is in the city, even all the spoil thereof, shalt thou take unto thyself; and thou shalt eat the spoil of thine enemies, which the LORD thy God hath given 
607,e LORD, and I cannot go back. 
And she said unto him, My father, if thou hast opened thy mouth unto the LORD, do to me according to that which hath proceeded out of thy mouth; forasmuch as the LORD hath taken vengeance for thee of thine enemies, even of the children of Ammon. 
And she said unto her father, Let this thing be done for me: let me alone two months, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my fellows. 
And he said, Go. And he sent her away for two months: and she went with her companions, and bewailed her virginity upon the mountains. 
And it came to pa
686, unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born again, he cannot see the kingdom of God. 
Nicodemus saith unto him, How can a man be born when he is old? can he enter the second time into his mother's womb, and be born? 
Jesus answered, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born of water and of the Spirit, he cannot enter into the kingdom of God. 
That which is born of the flesh is flesh; and that which is born of the Spirit is spirit. 
Marvel not that I said unto thee, Ye must be born again. 
The wind bloweth where it listeth, and thou hearest the sound thereof, but canst not tell whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so is every one that is born 
514,s on this side, and five cubits on that side: and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and three cubits on that side. 
The length of the porch was twenty cubits, and the breadth eleven cubits, and he brought me by the steps whereby they went up to it: and there were pillars by the posts, one on this side, and another on that side. 
Afterward he brought me to the temple, and measured the posts, six cubits broad on the one side, and six cubits broad on the other side, which was the breadth of 
555,t. 
Behold, I stand at the door, and knock: if any man hear my voice, and open the door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me. 
To him that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
After this I looked, and, behold, a door was opened in heaven: and the first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with me; which said, Come up hither, and I will shew thee
531,n himself cometh to the grave. It was a cave, and a stone lay upon it. 
Jesus said, Take ye away the stone. Martha, the sister of him that was dead, saith unto him, Lord, by this time he stinketh: for he hath been dead four days. 
Jesus saith unto her, Said I not unto thee, that, if thou wouldest believe, thou shouldest see the glory of God? 
Then they took away the stone from the place where the dead was laid. And Jesus lifted up his eyes, and said, Father, I thank thee that thou hast heard me. 
And I knew that thou hearest 
630,ars. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard all the words, they were afraid both one and other, and said unto Baruch, We will surely tell the king of all these words. 
And they asked Baruch, saying, Tell us now, How didst thou write all these words at his mouth? 
Then Baruch answered them, He pronounced all these words unto me with his mouth, and I wrote them with ink in the book. 
Then said the princes unto Baruch, Go, hide thee, thou and Jeremiah; and let no man know where ye be. 
And they went in to the king into the court, but they laid up the roll in the chamber of Elishama the scribe, and told all the words in the
584,essed return ashamed: let the poor and needy praise thy name. 
Arise, O God, plead thine own cause: remember how the foolish man reproacheth thee daily. 
Forget not the voice of thine enemies: the tumult of those that rise up against thee increaseth continually. 
Unto thee, O God, do we give thanks, unto thee do we give thanks: for that thy name is near thy wondrous works declare. 
When I shall receive the congregation I will judge uprightly. 
The earth and all the inhabitants thereof are dissolved: I bear up the pillars of it. Selah. 
I said unto the fools, Deal not foolishly:
555,ing sown by the brooks, shall wither, be driven away, and be no more. 
The fishers also shall mourn, and all they that cast angle into the brooks shall lament, and they that spread nets upon the waters shall languish. 
Moreover they that work in fine flax, and they that weave networks, shall be confounded. 
And they shall be broken in the purposes thereof, all that make sluices and ponds for fish. 
Surely the princes of Zoan are fools, the counsel of the wise counsellors of Pharaoh is become brutish: how say ye unto Pharaoh, I am the son of the wise
573,nd devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and make your ways and your doings good. 
And they said, There is no hope: but we will walk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come from another place be forsaken? 
Because my people hath f
657,ne: 
Nor by the earth; for it is his footstool: neither by Jerusalem; for it is the city of the great King. 
Neither shalt thou swear by thy head, because thou canst not make one hair white or black. 
But let your communication be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth: 
But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go wi
587,ce, he saw James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, who also were in the ship mending their nets. 
And straightway he called them: and they left their father Zebedee in the ship with the hired servants, and went after him. 
And they went into Capernaum; and straightway on the sabbath day he entered into the synagogue, and taught. 
And they were astonished at his doctrine: for he taught them as one that had authority, and not as the scribes. 
And there was in their synagogue a man with an unclean spirit; and he cried out, 
Saying, Let us alone; what have we to do with thee, 
674,ss? So whomsoever the LORD our God shall drive out from before us, them will we possess. 
And now art thou any thing better than Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab? did he ever strive against Israel, or did he ever fight against them, 
While Israel dwelt in Heshbon and her towns, and in Aroer and her towns, and in all the cities that be along by the coasts of Arnon, three hundred years? why therefore did ye not recover them within that time? 
Wherefore I have not sinned against thee, but thou doest me wrong to war against me: the LORD the Judge be judge this day between the children of Israel and the children of Ammon. 
Howbeit the king of the children of Ammon h
509,bs of the city shall be toward the north two hundred and fifty, and toward the south two hundred and fifty, and toward the east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred and fifty. 
And the residue in length over against the oblation of the holy portion shall be ten thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward: and it shall be over against the oblation of the holy portion; and the increase thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city. 
And they that serve the city shall serve it o
696,ms of Hazor, which Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon shall smite, thus saith the LORD; Arise ye, go up to Kedar, and spoil the men of the east. 
Their tents and their flocks shall they take away: they shall take to themselves their curtains, and all their vessels, and their camels; and they shall cry unto them, Fear is on every side. 
Flee, get you far off, dwell deep, O ye inhabitants of Hazor, saith the LORD; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath taken counsel against you, and hath conceived a purpose against you. 
Arise, get you up unto the wealthy nation, that dwelleth without care, saith the LORD, which have neither gates nor bars, which dwell alone. 
And their camels shall be a boot
535,g sacrifice. 
Set a watch, O LORD, before my mouth; keep the door of my lips. 
Incline not my heart to any evil thing, to practise wicked works with men that work iniquity: and let me not eat of their dainties. 
Let the righteous smite me; it shall be a kindness: and let him reprove me; it shall be an excellent oil, which shall not break my head: for yet my prayer also shall be in their calamities. 
When their judges are overthrown in stony places, they shall hear my words; for they are sweet. 
Our bones are scattered at the grav
641, your fathers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearkened unto me. 
Because the sons of Jonadab the son of Rechab have performed the commandment of their father, which he commanded them; but this people hath not hearkened unto me: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon Judah and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem all the evil that I have pronounced against them: because I have spoken unto them, but they have not heard; and I have called unto them, but they have not answered. 
And Jeremiah said unto the house of the Rechabites, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel;
631,elly: 
And the haft also went in after the blade; and the fat closed upon the blade, so that he could not draw the dagger out of his belly; and the dirt came out. 
Then Ehud went forth through the porch, and shut the doors of the parlour upon him, and locked them. 
When he was gone out, his servants came; and when they saw that, behold, the doors of the parlour were locked, they said, Surely he covereth his feet in his summer chamber. 
And they tarried till they were ashamed: and, behold, he opened not the doors of the parlour; therefore they took a key, and opened them: and, behold, their lord was fallen down dead on the e
488,roat is an open sepulchre; they flatter with their tongue. 
Destroy thou them, O God; let them fall by their own counsels; cast them out in the multitude of their transgressions; for they have rebelled against thee. 
But let all those that put their trust in thee rejoice: let them ever shout for joy, because thou defendest them: let them also that love thy name be joyful in thee. 
For thou, LORD, wilt bless the righteous; with favour wilt thou compass him as with a shield. 
O LORD, r
548,her, and lay with her. 
Then Amnon hated her exceedingly; so that the hatred wherewith he hated her was greater than the love wherewith he had loved her. And Amnon said unto her, Arise, be gone. 
And she said unto him, There is no cause: this evil in sending me away is greater than the other that thou didst unto me. But he would not hearken unto her. 
Then he called his servant that ministered unto him, and said, Put now this woman out from me, and bolt the door after her. 
And she had a garment of divers colours upon her: for with such robes
637, there is neither male nor female: for ye are all one in Christ Jesus. 
And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise. 
Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all; 
But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye
664, bear thee a son indeed; and thou shalt call his name Isaac: and I will establish my covenant with him for an everlasting covenant, and with his seed after him. 
And as for Ishmael, I have heard thee: Behold, I have blessed him, and will make him fruitful, and will multiply him exceedingly; twelve princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation. 
But my covenant will I establish with Isaac, which Sarah shall bear unto thee at this set time in the next year. 
And he left off talking with him, and God went up from Abraham. 
And Abraham took Ishmael his son, and all that were born in his house, and all that were bought with his money, every male am
509,dst of Samaria and Galilee. 
And as he entered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were lepers, which stood afar off: 
And they lifted up their voices, and said, Jesus, Master, have mercy on us. 
And when he saw them, he said unto them, Go shew yourselves unto the priests. And it came to pass, that, as they went, they were cleansed. 
And one of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back, and with a loud voice glorified God, 
And fell down on his face at his feet, giving him thanks: 
576,
He sent from above, he took me, he drew me out of many waters. 
He delivered me from my strong enemy, and from them which hated me: for they were too strong for me. 
They prevented me in the day of my calamity: but the LORD was my stay. 
He brought me forth also into a large place; he delivered me, because he delighted in me. 
The LORD rewarded me according to my righteousness; according to the cleanness of my hands hath he recompensed me. 
For I have kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me, and I did
596, cease: for the virgin daughter of my people is broken with a great breach, with a very grievous blow. 
If I go forth into the field, then behold the slain with the sword! and if I enter into the city, then behold them that are sick with famine! yea, both the prophet and the priest go about into a land that they know not. 
Hast thou utterly rejected Judah? hath thy soul lothed Zion? why hast thou smitten us, and there is no healing for us? we looked for peace, and there is no good; and for the time of healing, and behold trouble! 
We acknowledge, O LORD, our wickedness, and the iniquity of
687,, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in thee by the putting on of my hands. 
For God hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of love, and of a sound mind. 
Be not thou therefore ashamed of the testimony of our Lord, nor of me his prisoner: but be thou partaker of the afflictions of the gospel according to the power of God; 
Who hath saved us, and called us with an holy calling, not according to our works, but according to his own purpose and grace, which was given us in Christ Jesus before the world began, 
But is now made manifest by the appearing of our Sa
502,w long dost thou make us to doubt? If thou be the Christ, tell us plainly. 
Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works that I do in my Father's name, they bear witness of me. 
But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said unto you. 
My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me: 
And I give unto them eternal life; and they shall never perish, neither shall any man pluck them out of my hand. 
My Father, which gave them me, is greater than all; and 
679, prisoner of Jesus Christ, and Timothy our brother, unto Philemon our dearly beloved, and fellowlabourer, 
And to our beloved Apphia, and Archippus our fellowsoldier, and to the church in thy house: 
Grace to you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
I thank my God, making mention of thee always in my prayers, 
Hearing of thy love and faith, which thou hast toward the Lord Jesus, and toward all saints; 
That the communication of thy faith may become effectual by the acknowledging of every good thing which is in you in Christ Jesus. 
For we have great joy and consolation in thy love, because the bowels of the saints are refreshed by thee, brother. 
W
492, wisdom and your understanding in the sight of the nations, which shall hear all these statutes, and say, Surely this great nation is a wise and understanding people. 
For what nation is there so great, who hath God so nigh unto them, as the LORD our God is in all things that we call upon him for? 
And what nation is there so great, that hath statutes and judgments so righteous as all this law, which I set before you this day? 
Only take heed to thyself, and keep thy soul diligently, les
516, name. 
And he hath made my mouth like a sharp sword; in the shadow of his hand hath he hid me, and made me a polished shaft; in his quiver hath he hid me; 
And said unto me, Thou art my servant, O Israel, in whom I will be glorified. 
Then I said, I have laboured in vain, I have spent my strength for nought, and in vain: yet surely my judgment is with the LORD, and my work with my God. 
And now, saith the LORD that formed me from the womb to be his servant, to bring Jacob again to him, Though Israel be not gat
605, withstand God? 
When they heard these things, they held their peace, and glorified God, saying, Then hath God also to the Gentiles granted repentance unto life. 
Now they which were scattered abroad upon the persecution that arose about Stephen travelled as far as Phenice, and Cyprus, and Antioch, preaching the word to none but unto the Jews only. 
And some of them were men of Cyprus and Cyrene, which, when they were come to Antioch, spake unto the Grecians, preaching the LORD Jesus. 
And the hand of the Lord was with them: and a great number believed, and turned unto the Lord. 
Then tidings of th
656,hew thyself merciful, and with the upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright. 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself unsavoury. 
And the afflicted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon the haughty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my lamp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my darkness. 
For by thee I have run through a troop: by my God have I leaped over a wall. 
As for God, his way is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried: he is a buckler to all them that trust in him. 
For who is God, save the LORD? and who is a rock, save our God? 
God is my strength and power: and he mak
626,t in the seven streams, and make men go over dryshod. 
And there shall be an highway for the remnant of his people, which shall be left, from Assyria; like as it was to Israel in the day that he came up out of the land of Egypt. 
And in that day thou shalt say, O LORD, I will praise thee: though thou wast angry with me, thine anger is turned away, and thou comfortedst me. 
Behold, God is my salvation; I will trust, and not be afraid: for the LORD JEHOVAH is my strength and my song; he also is become my salvation. 
Therefore with joy shall ye draw water out of the wells of salvation. 
And in that day shall ye say, Prais
637,hou shalt cover thy face, that thou see not the ground: for I have set thee for a sign unto the house of Israel. 
And I did so as I was commanded: I brought forth my stuff by day, as stuff for captivity, and in the even I digged through the wall with mine hand; I brought it forth in the twilight, and I bare it upon my shoulder in their sight. 
And in the morning came the word of the LORD unto me, saying, 
Son of man, hath not the house of Israel, the rebellious house, said unto thee, What doest thou? 
Say thou unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; This burden concerneth the prince in Jerusalem, and all the house of Israel that are 
623,hem, Children, how hard is it for them that trust in riches to enter into the kingdom of God! 
It is easier for a camel to go through the eye of a needle, than for a rich man to enter into the kingdom of God. 
And they were astonished out of measure, saying among themselves, Who then can be saved? 
And Jesus looking upon them saith, With men it is impossible, but not with God: for with God all things are possible. 
Then Peter began to say unto him, Lo, we have left all, and have followed thee. 
And Jesus answered and said, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left house, or brethren, or sisters, or fathe
575,which goeth before you, he shall fight for you, according to all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes; 
And in the wilderness, where thou hast seen how that the LORD thy God bare thee, as a man doth bear his son, in all the way that ye went, until ye came into this place. 
Yet in this thing ye did not believe the LORD your God, 
Who went in the way before you, to search you out a place to pitch your tents in, in fire by night, to shew you by what way ye should go, and in a cloud by day. 
And the LORD heard the voice of your words, and was wroth, and sware, say
697,ty returned again with joy, saying, Lord, even the devils are subject unto us through thy name. 
And he said unto them, I beheld Satan as lightning fall from heaven. 
Behold, I give unto you power to tread on serpents and scorpions, and over all the power of the enemy: and nothing shall by any means hurt you. 
Notwithstanding in this rejoice not, that the spirits are subject unto you; but rather rejoice, because your names are written in heaven. 
In that hour Jesus rejoiced in spirit, and said, I thank thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, that thou hast hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes: even so, Father; for so it seemed good in thy sight. 
591, O ye destroyers of mine heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and bellow as bulls; 
Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that bare you shall be ashamed: behold, the hindermost of the nations shall be a wilderness, a dry land, and a desert. 
Because of the wrath of the LORD it shall not be inhabited, but it shall be wholly desolate: every one that goeth by Babylon shall be astonished, and hiss at all her plagues. 
Put yourselves in array against Babylon round about: all ye that bend the bow, shoot at her, spare no arrows: for she hath sinned against the LORD.
678,him; and he went in unto her. 
And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an handmaid. 
And it came to pass, that in the morning, behold, it was Leah: and he said to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I serve with thee for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me? 
And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the younger before the firstborn. 
Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service which thou shalt serve with me yet seven other years. 
And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel his daughter to wife also. 
And Laban gave to Rachel his daughter Bilhah his handmaid to be h
575,y the two edges was it coupled together. 
And the curious girdle of his ephod, that was upon it, was of the same, according to the work thereof; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they wrought onyx stones inclosed in ouches of gold, graven, as signets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel. 
And he put them on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should be stones for a memorial to the children of Israel; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the breastplate of cunning work, like the work o
507, a bountiful eye shall be blessed; for he giveth of his bread to the poor. 
Cast out the scorner, and contention shall go out; yea, strife and reproach shall cease. 
He that loveth pureness of heart, for the grace of his lips the king shall be his friend. 
The eyes of the LORD preserve knowledge, and he overthroweth the words of the transgressor. 
The slothful man saith, There is a lion without, I shall be slain in the streets. 
The mouth of strange women is a deep pit: he that is abhorred of the LORD 
590,rother. 
Now the men did diligently observe whether any thing would come from him, and did hastily catch it: and they said, Thy brother Benhadad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot. 
And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took from thy father, I will restore; and thou shalt make streets for thee in Damascus, as my father made in Samaria. Then said Ahab, I will send thee away with this covenant. So he made a covenant with him, and sent him away. 
And a certain man of the sons of the prophets 
601,, and she be not defiled: 
Then shall the man bring his wife unto the priest, and he shall bring her offering for her, the tenth part of an ephah of barley meal; he shall pour no oil upon it, nor put frankincense thereon; for it is an offering of jealousy, an offering of memorial, bringing iniquity to remembrance. 
And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before the LORD: 
And the priest shall take holy water in an earthen vessel; and of the dust that is in the floor of the tabernacle the priest shall take, and put it into the water: 
And the priest shall set the woman before the LORD, 
490,al thyself: whatsoever we have heard done in Capernaum, do also here in thy country. 
And he said, Verily I say unto you, No prophet is accepted in his own country. 
But I tell you of a truth, many widows were in Israel in the days of Elias, when the heaven was shut up three years and six months, when great famine was throughout all the land; 
But unto none of them was Elias sent, save unto Sarepta, a city of Sidon, unto a woman that was a widow. 
And many lepers were in Israel in the 
521,ervant: then mayest thou for me defeat the counsel of Ahithophel. 
And hast thou not there with thee Zadok and Abiathar the priests? therefore it shall be, that what thing soever thou shalt hear out of the king's house, thou shalt tell it to Zadok and Abiathar the priests. 
Behold, they have there with them their two sons, Ahimaaz Zadok's son, and Jonathan Abiathar's son; and by them ye shall send unto me every thing that ye can hear. 
So Hushai David's friend came into the city, and Absalom came into Jerusalem. 
An
713,thou mark when the hinds do calve? 
Canst thou number the months that they fulfil? or knowest thou the time when they bring forth? 
They bow themselves, they bring forth their young ones, they cast out their sorrows. 
Their young ones are in good liking, they grow up with corn; they go forth, and return not unto them. 
Who hath sent out the wild ass free? or who hath loosed the bands of the wild ass? 
Whose house I have made the wilderness, and the barren land his dwellings. 
He scorneth the multitude of the city, neither regardeth he the crying of the driver. 
The range of the mountains is his pasture, and he searcheth after every green thing. 
Will the unicorn be willing to serve thee, or abide by thy 
604, judge, I pray you, betwixt me and my vineyard. 
What could have been done more to my vineyard, that I have not done in it? wherefore, when I looked that it should bring forth grapes, brought it forth wild grapes? 
And now go to; I will tell you what I will do to my vineyard: I will take away the hedge thereof, and it shall be eaten up; and break down the wall thereof, and it shall be trodden down: 
And I will lay it waste: it shall not be pruned, nor digged; but there shall come up briers and thorns: I will also command the clouds that they rain no rain upon it. 
For the vineyard of the LORD of h
564, linen, and in crimson; also to grave any manner of graving, and to find out every device which shall be put to him, with thy cunning men, and with the cunning men of my lord David thy father. 
Now therefore the wheat, and the barley, the oil, and the wine, which my lord hath spoken of, let him send unto his servants: 
And we will cut wood out of Lebanon, as much as thou shalt need: and we will bring it to thee in floats by sea to Joppa; and thou shalt carry it up to Jerusalem. 
And Solomon numbered all the strangers that were in the land of Israel, after th
606,s was Aaron. 
So also Christ glorified not himself to be made an high priest; but he that said unto him, Thou art my Son, to day have I begotten thee. 
As he saith also in another place, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec. 
Who in the days of his flesh, when he had offered up prayers and supplications with strong crying and tears unto him that was able to save him from death, and was heard in that he feared; 
Though he were a Son, yet learned he obedience by the things which he suffered; 
And being made perfect, he became the author of eternal salvation unto all them that obey
649,thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God. 
And, behold, thy cousin Elisabeth, she hath also conceived a son in her old age: and this is the sixth month with her, who was called barren. 
For with God nothing shall be impossible. 
And Mary said, Behold the handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me according to thy word. And the angel departed from her. 
And Mary arose in those days, and went into the hill country with haste, into a city of Juda; 
And entered into the house of Zacharias, and saluted Elisabeth. 
And it came to pass, that, when Elisabeth heard the salutation of Mary, the babe leape
577,utterly waste and desolate, from the tower of Syene even unto the border of Ethiopia. 
No foot of man shall pass through it, nor foot of beast shall pass through it, neither shall it be inhabited forty years. 
And I will make the land of Egypt desolate in the midst of the countries that are desolate, and her cities among the cities that are laid waste shall be desolate forty years: and I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries. 
Yet thus saith the Lord GOD; At the end of forty years will I gather the Egyptians from the p
553,r even their sons and their daughters they have burnt in the fire to their gods. 
What thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt not add thereto, nor diminish from it. 
If there arise among you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and giveth thee a sign or a wonder, 
And the sign or the wonder come to pass, whereof he spake unto thee, saying, Let us go after other gods, which thou hast not known, and let us serve them; 
Thou shalt not hearken unto the words of that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams: for the LORD your God proveth you,
655,ame upon him with the elders, 
And spake unto him, saying, Tell us, by what authority doest thou these things? or who is he that gave thee this authority? 
And he answered and said unto them, I will also ask you one thing; and answer me: 
The baptism of John, was it from heaven, or of men? 
And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; he will say, Why then believed ye him not? 
But and if we say, Of men; all the people will stone us: for they be persuaded that John was a prophet. 
And they answered, that they could not tell whence it was. 
And Jesus said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things.
658,s spirit. 
Marvel not that I said unto thee, Ye must be born again. 
The wind bloweth where it listeth, and thou hearest the sound thereof, but canst not tell whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so is every one that is born of the Spirit. 
Nicodemus answered and said unto him, How can these things be? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel, and knowest not these things? 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen; and ye receive not our witness. 
If I have told you earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall ye believe, if I tell you of heavenly things? 
And no man hath ascen
630,ah of Kirjathjearim, who prophesied against this city and against this land according to all the words of Jeremiah. 
And when Jehoiakim the king, with all his mighty men, and all the princes, heard his words, the king sought to put him to death: but when Urijah heard it, he was afraid, and fled, and went into Egypt; 
And Jehoiakim the king sent men into Egypt, namely, Elnathan the son of Achbor, and certain men with him into Egypt. 
And they fetched forth Urijah out of Egypt, and brought him unto Jehoiakim the king; who slew him with the sword, and cast his dead body into the graves of the common people. 
Nevertheless the 
558, 
And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick. 
And it came to pass the day after, that he went into a city called Nain; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people. 
Now when he came nigh to the gate of the city, behold, there was a dead man carried out, the only son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much people of the city was with her. 
And when the Lord saw her, he had compassion on her, and said unto her, Weep not. 
And he came and touched the bier: and they that bare him stood sti
559,he LORD thundered from heaven, and the most High uttered his voice. 
And he sent out arrows, and scattered them; lightning, and discomfited them. 
And the channels of the sea appeared, the foundations of the world were discovered, at the rebuking of the LORD, at the blast of the breath of his nostrils. 
He sent from above, he took me; he drew me out of many waters; 
He delivered me from my strong enemy, and from them that hated me: for they were too strong for me. 
They prevented me in the day of my calamity: but the LORD was my stay. 
He brought me for
564,I am a Pharisee, the son of a Pharisee: of the hope and resurrection of the dead I am called in question. 
And when he had so said, there arose a dissension between the Pharisees and the Sadducees: and the multitude was divided. 
For the Sadducees say that there is no resurrection, neither angel, nor spirit: but the Pharisees confess both. 
And there arose a great cry: and the scribes that were of the Pharisees' part arose, and strove, saying, We find no evil in this man: but if a spirit or an angel hath spoken to him, let us not fight against God. 
And when
482,ney, and did as they were taught: and this saying is commonly reported among the Jews until this day. 
Then the eleven disciples went away into Galilee, into a mountain where Jesus had appointed them. 
And when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted. 
And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. 
Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 
557,t spices with pure frankincense: of each shall there be a like weight: 
And thou shalt make it a perfume, a confection after the art of the apothecary, tempered together, pure and holy: 
And thou shalt beat some of it very small, and put of it before the testimony in the tabernacle of the congregation, where I will meet with thee: it shall be unto you most holy. 
And as for the perfume which thou shalt make, ye shall not make to yourselves according to the composition thereof: it shall be unto thee holy for the LORD. 
Whosoever shall make like unto th
607,up in the judgment with the men of this generation, and condemn them: for she came from the utmost parts of the earth to hear the wisdom of Solomon; and, behold, a greater than Solomon is here. 
The men of Nineve shall rise up in the judgment with this generation, and shall condemn it: for they repented at the preaching of Jonas; and, behold, a greater than Jonas is here. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The light of the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is single, th
675,nd, and cannot see afar off, and hath forgotten that he was purged from his old sins. 
Wherefore the rather, brethren, give diligence to make your calling and election sure: for if ye do these things, ye shall never fall: 
For so an entrance shall be ministered unto you abundantly into the everlasting kingdom of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore I will not be negligent to put you always in remembrance of these things, though ye know them, and be established in the present truth. 
Yea, I think it meet, as long as I am in this tabernacle, to stir you up by putting you in remembrance; 
Knowing that shortly I must put off this my tabernacle, even as our Lord 
589,hey do gender strifes. 
And the servant of the Lord must not strive; but be gentle unto all men, apt to teach, patient, 
In meekness instructing those that oppose themselves; if God peradventure will give them repentance to the acknowledging of the truth; 
And that they may recover themselves out of the snare of the devil, who are taken captive by him at his will. 
This know also, that in the last days perilous times shall come. 
For men shall be lovers of their own selves, covetous, boasters, proud, blasphemers, disobedient to parents, unthankful, unholy, 
Without natural affection
519,n which shall be spoken against; 
(Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an husband seven years from her virginity; 
And she was a widow of about fourscore and four years, which departed not from the temple, but served God with fastings and prayers night and day. 
And she coming in that instant gave thanks likewise unto th
631,lambs out of the flock, and the calves out of the midst of the stall; 
That chant to the sound of the viol, and invent to themselves instruments of musick, like David; 
That drink wine in bowls, and anoint themselves with the chief ointments: but they are not grieved for the affliction of Joseph. 
Therefore now shall they go captive with the first that go captive, and the banquet of them that stretched themselves shall be removed. 
The Lord GOD hath sworn by himself, saith the LORD the God of hosts, I abhor the excellency of Jacob, and hate his palaces: therefore will I deliver up the city with all that is therein. 
And it 
601,of the LORD; for very great are his mercies: but let me not fall into the hand of man. 
So the LORD sent pestilence upon Israel: and there fell of Israel seventy thousand men. 
And God sent an angel unto Jerusalem to destroy it: and as he was destroying, the LORD beheld, and he repented him of the evil, and said to the angel that destroyed, It is enough, stay now thine hand. And the angel of the LORD stood by the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite. 
And David lifted up his eyes, and saw the angel of the LORD stand between the earth and the heaven, having a drawn sword in his hand stretched ou
585,d a flagon of wine. So all the people departed every one to his house. 
Then David returned to bless his household. And Michal the daughter of Saul came out to meet David, and said, How glorious was the king of Israel to day, who uncovered himself to day in the eyes of the handmaids of his servants, as one of the vain fellows shamelessly uncovereth himself! 
And David said unto Michal, It was before the LORD, which chose me before thy father, and before all his house, to appoint me ruler over the people of the LORD, over Israel: therefore will I play before the LORD. 
And I will
546,ngs have been, saith the LORD: but to this man will I look, even to him that is poor and of a contrite spirit, and trembleth at my word. 
He that killeth an ox is as if he slew a man; he that sacrificeth a lamb, as if he cut off a dog's neck; he that offereth an oblation, as if he offered swine's blood; he that burneth incense, as if he blessed an idol. Yea, they have chosen their own ways, and their soul delighteth in their abominations. 
I also will choose their delusions, and will bring their fears upon them; because when I called, none 
489,and he made a mourning for his father seven days. 
And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning to the Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim, which is beyond Jordan. 
And his sons did unto him according as he commanded them: 
For his sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him in the cave of the field of Machpelah, which Abraham bought with the field for a possessio
652,er the cherubims. 
And the cherubims lifted up their wings, and mounted up from the earth in my sight: when they went out, the wheels also were beside them, and every one stood at the door of the east gate of the LORD's house; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above. 
This is the living creature that I saw under the God of Israel by the river of Chebar; and I knew that they were the cherubims. 
Every one had four faces apiece, and every one four wings; and the likeness of the hands of a man was under their wings. 
And the likeness of their faces was the same faces which I saw by the river of Chebar, their appearances and themselv
629,king, and make known to him the interpretation. 
O thou king, the most high God gave Nebuchadnezzar thy father a kingdom, and majesty, and glory, and honour: 
And for the majesty that he gave him, all people, nations, and languages, trembled and feared before him: whom he would he slew; and whom he would he kept alive; and whom he would he set up; and whom he would he put down. 
But when his heart was lifted up, and his mind hardened in pride, he was deposed from his kingly throne, and they took his glory from him: 
And he was driven from the sons of men; and his heart was made like the beasts, and his dwelling was with t
560,se, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt bind them for a sign upon thine hand, and they shall be as frontlets between thine eyes. 
And thou shalt write them upon the posts of thy house, and on thy gates. 
And it shall be, when the LORD thy God shall have brought thee into the land which he sware unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give thee great and goodly cities, which thou buildedst not, 
And houses full of all good things, which thou filledst not, and wells digged, w
536,s sackcloth of hair, and the moon became as blood; 
And the stars of heaven fell unto the earth, even as a fig tree casteth her untimely figs, when she is shaken of a mighty wind. 
And the heaven departed as a scroll when it is rolled together; and every mountain and island were moved out of their places. 
And the kings of the earth, and the great men, and the rich men, and the chief captains, and the mighty men, and every bondman, and every free man, hid themselves in the dens and in the rocks of the mountains; 
And said to the m
653,n him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word of the LORD, and hath broken his commandment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity shall be upon him. 
And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they found a man that gathered sticks upon the sabbath day. 
And they that found him gatheri
612,out them fled at the cry of them: for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up also. 
And there came out a fire from the LORD, and consumed the two hundred and fifty men that offered incense. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, that he take up the censers out of the burning, and scatter thou the fire yonder; for they are hallowed. 
The censers of these sinners against their own souls, let them make them broad plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered them before the LORD, therefore they are hallowed: and they shall be a sign unto the children 
566,er shall he guide them. 
And I will make all my mountains a way, and my highways shall be exalted. 
Behold, these shall come from far: and, lo, these from the north and from the west; and these from the land of Sinim. 
Sing, O heavens; and be joyful, O earth; and break forth into singing, O mountains: for the LORD hath comforted his people, and will have mercy upon his afflicted. 
But Zion said, The LORD hath forsaken me, and my Lord hath forgotten me. 
Can a woman forget her sucking child, that she should not have compassion on the son of her womb? yea, they 
672,carcases of every beast which divideth the hoof, and is not clovenfooted, nor cheweth the cud, are unclean unto you: every one that toucheth them shall be unclean. 
And whatsoever goeth upon his paws, among all manner of beasts that go on all four, those are unclean unto you: whoso toucheth their carcase shall be unclean until the even. 
And he that beareth the carcase of them shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: they are unclean unto you. 
These also shall be unclean unto you among the creeping things that creep upon the earth; the weasel, and the mouse, and the tortoise after his kind, 
And the ferret, and the chameleon, and the lizard, and the
621,k unto Esau, when ye find him. 
And say ye moreover, Behold, thy servant Jacob is behind us. For he said, I will appease him with the present that goeth before me, and afterward I will see his face; peradventure he will accept of me. 
So went the present over before him: and himself lodged that night in the company. 
And he rose up that night, and took his two wives, and his two womenservants, and his eleven sons, and passed over the ford Jabbok. 
And he took them, and sent them over the brook, and sent over that he had. 
And Jacob was left alone; and there wrestled a man with him until the breaking of the day. 
A
671,soul? is it to bow down his head as a bulrush, and to spread sackcloth and ashes under him? wilt thou call this a fast, and an acceptable day to the LORD? 
Is not this the fast that I have chosen? to loose the bands of wickedness, to undo the heavy burdens, and to let the oppressed go free, and that ye break every yoke? 
Is it not to deal thy bread to the hungry, and that thou bring the poor that are cast out to thy house? when thou seest the naked, that thou cover him; and that thou hide not thyself from thine own flesh? 
Then shall thy light break forth as the morning, and thine health shall spring forth speedily: and thy righteousness shall go before thee; the
633, a man, and the fourth beast was like a flying eagle. 
And the four beasts had each of them six wings about him; and they were full of eyes within: and they rest not day and night, saying, Holy, holy, holy, LORD God Almighty, which was, and is, and is to come. 
And when those beasts give glory and honour and thanks to him that sat on the throne, who liveth for ever and ever, 
The four and twenty elders fall down before him that sat on the throne, and worship him that liveth for ever and ever, and cast their crowns before the throne, saying, 
Thou art worthy, O Lord, to receive glory and honour and power: for thou hast created
500,part of an hin unto a lamb: this is the burnt offering of every month throughout the months of the year. 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall be offered, beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And in the fourteenth day of the first month is the passover of the LORD. 
And in the fifteenth day of this month is the feast: seven days shall unleavened bread be eaten. 
In the first day shall be an holy convocation; ye shall do no manner of servile wor
702,the son of Paseah, and Meshullam the son of Besodeiah; they laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, and the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
And next unto them repaired Melatiah the Gibeonite, and Jadon the Meronothite, the men of Gibeon, and of Mizpah, unto the throne of the governor on this side the river. 
Next unto him repaired Uzziel the son of Harhaiah, of the goldsmiths. Next unto him also repaired Hananiah the son of one of the apothecaries, and they fortified Jerusalem unto the broad wall. 
And next unto them repaired Rephaiah the son of Hur, the ruler of the half part of Jerusalem. 
And next unto them repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, even over against his hous
579, 
And the angel of the LORD appeared unto him, and said unto him, The LORD is with thee, thou mighty man of valour. 
And Gideon said unto him, Oh my Lord, if the LORD be with us, why then is all this befallen us? and where be all his miracles which our fathers told us of, saying, Did not the LORD bring us up from Egypt? but now the LORD hath forsaken us, and delivered us into the hands of the Midianites. 
And the LORD looked upon him, and said, Go in this thy might, and thou shalt save Israel from the hand of the Midianites: have not I sent thee? 
And he said unto him, Oh 
517,worn unto the house of Eli, that the iniquity of Eli's house shall not be purged with sacrifice nor offering for ever. 
And Samuel lay until the morning, and opened the doors of the house of the LORD. And Samuel feared to shew Eli the vision. 
Then Eli called Samuel, and said, Samuel, my son. And he answered, Here am I. 
And he said, What is the thing that the LORD hath said unto thee? I pray thee hide it not from me: God do so to thee, and more also, if thou hide any thing from me of all the things that he said
644,t into an house. 
And the multitude cometh together again, so that they could not so much as eat bread. 
And when his friends heard of it, they went out to lay hold on him: for they said, He is beside himself. 
And the scribes which came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and by the prince of the devils casteth he out devils. 
And he called them unto him, and said unto them in parables, How can Satan cast out Satan? 
And if a kingdom be divided against itself, that kingdom cannot stand. 
And if a house be divided against itself, that house cannot stand. 
And if Satan rise up against himself, and be divided, he cannot stand, bu
491,For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 
And the king said unto his servants, Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel? 
And I am this day weak, though anointed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah be too hard for me: the LORD shall reward the doer of evil according to his wickedness. 
And when Saul's son heard that Abner was dead in Hebron, his hands were feeble, and all the I
556, sin, and commit any of these things which are forbidden to be done by the commandments of the LORD; though he wist it not, yet is he guilty, and shall bear his iniquity. 
And he shall bring a ram without blemish out of the flock, with thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him concerning his ignorance wherein he erred and wist it not, and it shall be forgiven him. 
It is a trespass offering: he hath certainly trespassed against the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
If a soul 
652,ere liers in ambush against him behind the city. 
And Joshua and all Israel made as if they were beaten before them, and fled by the way of the wilderness. 
And all the people that were in Ai were called together to pursue after them: and they pursued after Joshua, and were drawn away from the city. 
And there was not a man left in Ai or Bethel, that went not out after Israel: and they left the city open, and pursued after Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Stretch out the spear that is in thy hand toward Ai; for I will give it into thine hand. And Joshua stretched out the spear that he had in his hand toward the city. 
And the ambush aros
480,they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.) 
Then laid they their hands on them, and they received the Holy Ghost. 
And when Simon saw that through laying on of the apostles' hands the Holy Ghost was given, he offered them money, 
Saying, Give me also this power, that on whomsoever I lay hands, he may receive the Holy Ghost. 
But Peter said unto him, Thy money perish with thee, because thou hast thought that the gift of God may be purchased with money. 
Thou hast neith
542,s of her gods he hath broken unto the ground. 
O my threshing, and the corn of my floor: that which I have heard of the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared unto you. 
The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Watchman, what of the night? Watchman, what of the night? 
The watchman said, The morning cometh, and also the night: if ye will enquire, enquire ye: return, come. 
The burden upon Arabia. In the forest in Arabia shall ye lodge, O ye travelling companies of Dedanim. 
The inhabitants of the land of Tema brough
579,ight grace reign through righteousness unto eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For if we have been planted together in the likeness of his death, w
502, went up from me. 
Then I spake unto them of the captivity all the things that the LORD had shewed me. 
The word of the LORD also came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, thou dwellest in the midst of a rebellious house, which have eyes to see, and see not; they have ears to hear, and hear not: for they are a rebellious house. 
Therefore, thou son of man, prepare thee stuff for removing, and remove by day in their sight; and thou shalt remove from thy place to another place in their sight: it may be the
654,s, and another wall without, and repaired Millo in the city of David, and made darts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him: for there be more with us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah. 
After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria sen
575, the earth; and I will have mercy upon her that had not obtained mercy; and I will say to them which were not my people, Thou art my people; and they shall say, Thou art my God. 
Then said the LORD unto me, Go yet, love a woman beloved of her friend, yet an adulteress, according to the love of the LORD toward the children of Israel, who look to other gods, and love flagons of wine. 
So I bought her to me for fifteen pieces of silver, and for an homer of barley, and an half homer of barley: 
And I said unto her, Thou shalt abide for me many days; thou shalt not play the
696,
And he had forty sons and thirty nephews, that rode on threescore and ten ass colts: and he judged Israel eight years. 
And Abdon the son of Hillel the Pirathonite died, and was buried in Pirathon in the land of Ephraim, in the mount of the Amalekites. 
And the children of Israel did evil again in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD delivered them into the hand of the Philistines forty years. 
And there was a certain man of Zorah, of the family of the Danites, whose name was Manoah; and his wife was barren, and bare not. 
And the angel of the LORD appeared unto the woman, and said unto her, Behold now, thou art barren, and bearest not: but thou shalt conceive, and bear a son. 
Now there
691,niquity is accomplished, O daughter of Zion; he will no more carry thee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us. 
Our necks are under persecution: we labour, and have no rest. 
We have given the hand to the Egyptians, and to the Assyrians, to be satisfied with bread. 
Our fathers have sinned, and are not; and we have borne their iniquities. 
Servants have ruled over us:
633,house at Jerusalem, which is in Judah. 
Who is there among you of all his people? his God be with him, and let him go up to Jerusalem, which is in Judah, and build the house of the LORD God of Israel, (he is the God,) which is in Jerusalem. 
And whosoever remaineth in any place where he sojourneth, let the men of his place help him with silver, and with gold, and with goods, and with beasts, beside the freewill offering for the house of God that is in Jerusalem. 
Then rose up the chief of the fathers of Judah and Benjamin, and the priests, and the Levites, with all them whose spirit God had raised, to go up to build the house
586,ourselves also know: 
Him, being delivered by the determinate counsel and foreknowledge of God, ye have taken, and by wicked hands have crucified and slain: 
Whom God hath raised up, having loosed the pains of death: because it was not possible that he should be holden of it. 
For David speaketh concerning him, I foresaw the Lord always before my face, for he is on my right hand, that I should not be moved: 
Therefore did my heart rejoice, and my tongue was glad; moreover also my flesh shall rest in hope: 
Because thou wilt not leave my soul in hell, neither wilt thou suffer thin
592,le, Be not ye afraid of them: remember the LORD, which is great and terrible, and fight for your brethren, your sons, and your daughters, your wives, and your houses. 
And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known unto us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
Th
584,f the law, it is no more of promise: but God gave it to Abraham by promise. 
Wherefore then serveth the law? It was added because of transgressions, till the seed should come to whom the promise was made; and it was ordained by angels in the hand of a mediator. 
Now a mediator is not a mediator of one, but God is one. 
Is the law then against the promises of God? God forbid: for if there had been a law given which could have given life, verily righteousness should have been by the law. 
But the scripture hath concluded all under sin, that the promise by faith of Jesus Christ mi
576,thee shall flee from thee, and say, Nineveh is laid waste: who will bemoan her? whence shall I seek comforters for thee? 
Art thou better than populous No, that was situate among the rivers, that had the waters round about it, whose rampart was the sea, and her wall was from the sea? 
Ethiopia and Egypt were her strength, and it was infinite; Put and Lubim were thy helpers. 
Yet was she carried away, she went into captivity: her young children also were dashed in pieces at the top of all the streets: and they cast lots for her honourable men, and all her great men were 
700,ve: and in the seventh he shall go out free for nothing. 
If he came in by himself, he shall go out by himself: if he were married, then his wife shall go out with him. 
If his master have given him a wife, and she have born him sons or daughters; the wife and her children shall be her master's, and he shall go out by himself. 
And if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and my children; I will not go out free: 
Then his master shall bring him unto the judges; he shall also bring him to the door, or unto the door post; and his master shall bore his ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever. 
And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not
559, alive. 
And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi. 
And the woman conceived, and bare a son: and when she saw him that he was a goodly child, she hid him three months. 
And when she could not longer hide him, she took for him an ark of bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child therein; and she laid it in the flags by the river's brink. 
And his sister stood afar off, to wit what would be done to him. 
And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the river; and her maidens walk
657,e beyond thee; go thy way: for the LORD hath sent thee away. 
And as touching the matter which thou and I have spoken of, behold, the LORD be between thee and me for ever. 
So David hid himself in the field: and when the new moon was come, the king sat him down to eat meat. 
And the king sat upon his seat, as at other times, even upon a seat by the wall: and Jonathan arose, and Abner sat by Saul's side, and David's place was empty. 
Nevertheless Saul spake not any thing that day: for he thought, Something hath befallen him, he is not clean; surely he is not clean. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, which was the second day of the month, that David'
593,y have of the Jews: 
Who both killed the Lord Jesus, and their own prophets, and have persecuted us; and they please not God, and are contrary to all men: 
Forbidding us to speak to the Gentiles that they might be saved, to fill up their sins alway: for the wrath is come upon them to the uttermost. 
But we, brethren, being taken from you for a short time in presence, not in heart, endeavoured the more abundantly to see your face with great desire. 
Wherefore we would have come unto you, even I Paul, once and again; but Satan hindered us. 
For what is our hope, or joy, or crown of rejoic
564,the land of Egypt: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying; Ye and your wives have both spoken with your mouths, and fulfilled with your hand, saying, We will surely perform our vows that we have vowed, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her: ye will surely accomplish your vows, and surely perform your vows. 
Therefore hear ye the word of the LORD, all Judah that dwell in the land of Egypt; Behold, I have sworn by my great name, saith the LORD, that my name shall no more be named in the mouth of any 
500,nto the inner court of the LORD's house, and, behold, at the door of the temple of the LORD, between the porch and the altar, were about five and twenty men, with their backs toward the temple of the LORD, and their faces toward the east; and they worshipped the sun toward the east. 
Then he said unto me, Hast thou seen this, O son of man? Is it a light thing to the house of Judah that they commit the abominations which they commit here? for they have filled the land with violence, and have retu
614,ot to know it. 
Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away wrath. 
If a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, whether he rage or laugh, there is no rest. 
The bloodthirsty hate the upright: but the just seek his soul. 
A fool uttereth all his mind: but a wise man keepeth it in till afterwards. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be established for ever. 
The rod and reproof give wisdom: but a child left to himself bringet
622,And within were hooks, an hand broad, fastened round about: and upon the tables was the flesh of the offering. 
And without the inner gate were the chambers of the singers in the inner court, which was at the side of the north gate; and their prospect was toward the south: one at the side of the east gate having the prospect toward the north. 
And he said unto me, This chamber, whose prospect is toward the south, is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house. 
And the chamber whose prospect is toward the north is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the altar: these are the sons of Zadok among
543,the LORD shall call. 
For, behold, in those days, and in that time, when I shall bring again the captivity of Judah and Jerusalem, 
I will also gather all nations, and will bring them down into the valley of Jehoshaphat, and will plead with them there for my people and for my heritage Israel, whom they have scattered among the nations, and parted my land. 
And they have cast lots for my people; and have given a boy for an harlot, and sold a girl for wine, that they might drink. 
Yea, and what have ye to do with me, O Tyre, and Zidon, and
589,tool in the day of his anger! 
The LORD hath swallowed up all the habitations of Jacob, and hath not pitied: he hath thrown down in his wrath the strong holds of the daughter of Judah; he hath brought them down to the ground: he hath polluted the kingdom and the princes thereof. 
He hath cut off in his fierce anger all the horn of Israel: he hath drawn back his right hand from before the enemy, and he burned against Jacob like a flaming fire, which devoureth round about. 
He hath bent his bow like an enemy: he stood with his right hand as an adversary, and slew all that were pleasan
577,rty nights. 
In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three wives of his sons with them, into the ark; 
They, and every beast after his kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind, and every fowl after his kind, every bird of every sort. 
And they went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh, wherein is the breath of life. 
And they that went in, went in male and female of all flesh, as God had commanded him: and the LORD shu
706,th. 
And he saith unto them, Is it lawful to do good on the sabbath days, or to do evil? to save life, or to kill? But they held their peace. 
And when he had looked round about on them with anger, being grieved for the hardness of their hearts, he saith unto the man, Stretch forth thine hand. And he stretched it out: and his hand was restored whole as the other. 
And the Pharisees went forth, and straightway took counsel with the Herodians against him, how they might destroy him. 
But Jesus withdrew himself with his disciples to the sea: and a great multitude from Galilee followed him, and from Judaea, 
And from Jerusalem, and from Idumaea, and from beyond Jordan; and they about Tyre and Sidon, a
626, and he overlaid it within with pure gold. 
And the greater house he cieled with fir tree, which he overlaid with fine gold, and set thereon palm trees and chains. 
And he garnished the house with precious stones for beauty: and the gold was gold of Parvaim. 
He overlaid also the house, the beams, the posts, and the walls thereof, and the doors thereof, with gold; and graved cherubims on the walls. 
And he made the most holy house, the length whereof was according to the breadth of the house, twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits: and he overlaid it with fine gold, amounting to six hundred talents. 
And 
570,echerathite, Ahijah the Pelonite, 
Hezro the Carmelite, Naarai the son of Ezbai, 
Joel the brother of Nathan, Mibhar the son of Haggeri, 
Zelek the Ammonite, Naharai the Berothite, the armourbearer of Joab the son of Zeruiah, 
Ira the Ithrite, Gareb the Ithrite, 
Uriah the Hittite, Zabad the son of Ahlai, 
Adina the son of Shiza the Reubenite, a captain of the Reubenites, and thirty with him, 
Hanan the son of Maachah, and Joshaphat the Mithnite, 
Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jehiel the sons of Hothan the Aroerite, 
Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his bro
597,and had wrought great provocations; 
Yet thou in thy manifold mercies forsookest them not in the wilderness: the pillar of the cloud departed not from them by day, to lead them in the way; neither the pillar of fire by night, to shew them light, and the way wherein they should go. 
Thou gavest also thy good spirit to instruct them, and withheldest not thy manna from their mouth, and gavest them water for their thirst. 
Yea, forty years didst thou sustain them in the wilderness, so that they lacked nothing; their clothes waxed not old, and their feet swelled not. 
Moreover thou gavest them k
718,et: for I have appeared unto thee for this purpose, to make thee a minister and a witness both of these things which thou hast seen, and of those things in the which I will appear unto thee; 
Delivering thee from the people, and from the Gentiles, unto whom now I send thee, 
To open their eyes, and to turn them from darkness to light, and from the power of Satan unto God, that they may receive forgiveness of sins, and inheritance among them which are sanctified by faith that is in me. 
Whereupon, O king Agrippa, I was not disobedient unto the heavenly vision: 
But shewed first unto them of Damascus, and at Jerusalem, and throughout all the coasts of Judaea, and then to the Gentiles, that they should repent an
712,enty servants. 
Then said Ziba unto the king, According to all that my lord the king hath commanded his servant, so shall thy servant do. As for Mephibosheth, said the king, he shall eat at my table, as one of the king's sons. 
And Mephibosheth had a young son, whose name was Micha. And all that dwelt in the house of Ziba were servants unto Mephibosheth. 
So Mephibosheth dwelt in Jerusalem: for he did eat continually at the king's table; and was lame on both his feet. 
And it came to pass after this, that the king of the children of Ammon died, and Hanun his son reigned in his stead. 
Then said David, I will shew kindness unto Hanun the son of Nahash, as his father shewed kindness unto me. And David sen
585, Hodijah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan, 
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 
Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah, 
Hodijah, Bani, Beninu. 
The chief of the people; Parosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani, 
Bunni, Azgad, Bebai, 
Adonijah, Bigvai, Adin, 
Ater, Hizkijah, Azzur, 
Hodijah, Hashum, Bezai, 
Hariph, Anathoth, Nebai, 
Magpiash, Meshullam, Hezir, 
Meshezabeel, Zadok, Jaddua, 
Pelatiah, Hanan, Anaiah, 
Hoshea, Hananiah, Hashub, 
Hallohesh, Pileha, Shobek, 
Rehum, Hashabnah, Maaseiah, 
And Ahijah, Hanan, Anan, 
Malluch, Harim, Baanah. 
And the rest of the people, the priests, the Levites, the port
635,issolved: for there shall come from the north a smoke, and none shall be alone in his appointed times. 
What shall one then answer the messengers of the nation? That the LORD hath founded Zion, and the poor of his people shall trust in it. 
The burden of Moab. Because in the night Ar of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; because in the night Kir of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackclot
519,before the LORD: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of Israel upon his heart before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt make the robe of the ephod all of blue. 
And there shall be an hole in the top of it, in the midst thereof: it shall have a binding of woven work round about the hole of it, as it were the hole of an habergeon, that it be not rent. 
And beneath upon the hem of it thou shalt make pomegranates of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the hem thereof; and bells of gold be
541,e another; 
Not slothful in business; fervent in spirit; serving the Lord; 
Rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation; continuing instant in prayer; 
Distributing to the necessity of saints; given to hospitality. 
Bless them which persecute you: bless, and curse not. 
Rejoice with them that do rejoice, and weep with them that weep. 
Be of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate. Be not wise in your own conceits. 
Recompense to no man evil for evil. Provide things honest in the sight o
698,ations which thine eyes have seen, the signs, and those great miracles: 
Yet the LORD hath not given you an heart to perceive, and eyes to see, and ears to hear, unto this day. 
And I have led you forty years in the wilderness: your clothes are not waxen old upon you, and thy shoe is not waxen old upon thy foot. 
Ye have not eaten bread, neither have ye drunk wine or strong drink: that ye might know that I am the LORD your God. 
And when ye came unto this place, Sihon the king of Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, came out against us unto battle, and we smote them: 
And we took their land, and gave it for an inheritance unto the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to the half tribe of Man
719,s righteousness endureth for ever. 
Unto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is gracious, and full of compassion, and righteous. 
A good man sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his affairs with discretion. 
Surely he shall not be moved for ever: the righteous shall be in everlasting remembrance. 
He shall not be afraid of evil tidings: his heart is fixed, trusting in the LORD. 
His heart is established, he shall not be afraid, until he see his desire upon his enemies. 
He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire o
663,it any more. 
But against any of the children of Israel shall not a dog move his tongue, against man or beast: that ye may know how that the LORD doth put a difference between the Egyptians and Israel. 
And all these thy servants shall come down unto me, and bow down themselves unto me, saying, Get thee out, and all the people that follow thee: and after that I will go out. And he went out from Pharaoh in a great anger. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you; that my wonders may be multiplied in the land of Egypt. 
And Moses and Aaron did all these wonders before Pharaoh: and the LORD hardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would n
701,drei. 
And the LORD said unto me, Fear him not: for I will deliver him, and all his people, and his land, into thy hand; and thou shalt do unto him as thou didst unto Sihon king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon. 
So the LORD our God delivered into our hands Og also, the king of Bashan, and all his people: and we smote him until none was left to him remaining. 
And we took all his cities at that time, there was not a city which we took not from them, threescore cities, all the region of Argob, the kingdom of Og in Bashan. 
All these cities were fenced with high walls, gates, and bars; beside unwalled towns a great many. 
And we utterly destroyed them, as we did unto Sihon king of Heshbo
575,f darkness. 
Therefore let us not sleep, as do others; but let us watch and be sober. 
For they that sleep sleep in the night; and they that be drunken are drunken in the night. 
But let us, who are of the day, be sober, putting on the breastplate of faith and love; and for an helmet, the hope of salvation. 
For God hath not appointed us to wrath, but to obtain salvation by our Lord Jesus Christ, 
Who died for us, that, whether we wake or sleep, we should live together with him. 
Wherefore comfort yourselves together, and edify one another, even as also ye do. 
And we 
666,door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And Aaron shall cast lots upon the two goats; one lot for the LORD, and the other lot for the scapegoat. 
And Aaron shall bring the goat upon which the LORD's lot fell, and offer him for a sin offering. 
But the goat, on which the lot fell to be the scapegoat, shall be presented alive before the LORD, to make an atonement with him, and to let him go for a scapegoat into the wilderness. 
And Aaron shall bring the bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and shall make an atonement for himself, and for his house, and shall kill the bullock of the sin offering which is for himself: 
And he shall take a cens
618,her beside the Ammonites, came against Jehoshaphat to battle. 
Then there came some that told Jehoshaphat, saying, There cometh a great multitude against thee from beyond the sea on this side Syria; and, behold, they be in Hazazontamar, which is Engedi. 
And Jehoshaphat feared, and set himself to seek the LORD, and proclaimed a fast throughout all Judah. 
And Judah gathered themselves together, to ask help of the LORD: even out of all the cities of Judah they came to seek the LORD. 
And Jehoshaphat stood in the congregation of Judah and Jerusalem, in the house of the LORD, before the new court, 
And said, O LOR
515,w it, neither awaked: for they were all asleep; because a deep sleep from the LORD was fallen upon them. 
Then David went over to the other side, and stood on the top of an hill afar off; a great space being between them: 
And David cried to the people, and to Abner the son of Ner, saying, Answerest thou not, Abner? Then Abner answered and said, Who art thou that criest to the king? 
And David said to Abner, Art not thou a valiant man? and who is like to thee in Israel? wherefore then hast thou not kept thy lo
693,rayer. 
O ye sons of men, how long will ye turn my glory into shame? how long will ye love vanity, and seek after leasing? Selah. 
But know that the LORD hath set apart him that is godly for himself: the LORD will hear when I call unto him. 
Stand in awe, and sin not: commune with your own heart upon your bed, and be still. Selah. 
Offer the sacrifices of righteousness, and put your trust in the LORD. 
There be many that say, Who will shew us any good? LORD, lift thou up the light of thy countenance upon us. 
Thou hast put gladness in my heart, more than in the time that their corn and their wine increased. 
I will both lay me down in peace, and sleep: for thou, LORD, only makest me d
526,ht him, and kissed him, and with an impudent face said unto him, 
I have peace offerings with me; this day have I payed my vows. 
Therefore came I forth to meet thee, diligently to seek thy face, and I have found thee. 
I have decked my bed with coverings of tapestry, with carved works, with fine linen of Egypt. 
I have perfumed my bed with myrrh, aloes, and cinnamon. 
Come, let us take our fill of love until the morning: let us solace ourselves with loves. 
For the goodman is not at home, he is gone a long journey: 
He 
714, inheritance of the children of Manasseh, all the cities with their villages. 
And they drave not out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer: but the Canaanites dwell among the Ephraimites unto this day, and serve under tribute. 
There was also a lot for the tribe of Manasseh; for he was the firstborn of Joseph; to wit, for Machir the firstborn of Manasseh, the father of Gilead: because he was a man of war, therefore he had Gilead and Bashan. 
There was also a lot for the rest of the children of Manasseh by their families; for the children of Abiezer, and for the children of Helek, and for the children of Asriel, and for the children of Shechem, and for the children of Hepher, and for the children of Shemida:
638, with meats, which have not profited them that have been occupied therein. 
We have an altar, whereof they have no right to eat which serve the tabernacle. 
For the bodies of those beasts, whose blood is brought into the sanctuary by the high priest for sin, are burned without the camp. 
Wherefore Jesus also, that he might sanctify the people with his own blood, suffered without the gate. 
Let us go forth therefore unto him without the camp, bearing his reproach. 
For here have we no continuing city, but we seek one to come. 
By him therefore let us offer the sacrifice of praise to God continually, that is, the fruit of our lips g
558,shall be in the latter days. Thy dream, and the visions of thy head upon thy bed, are these; 
As for thee, O king, thy thoughts came into thy mind upon thy bed, what should come to pass hereafter: and he that revealeth secrets maketh known to thee what shall come to pass. 
But as for me, this secret is not revealed to me for any wisdom that I have more than any living, but for their sakes that shall make known the interpretation to the king, and that thou mightest know the thoughts of thy heart. 
Thou, O king, sawest, and behold a great image. This gre
540,ngog. 
And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land. 
And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh, and drink blood. 
Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the earth, of rams, of lambs, and of goats, of bullocks, al
536,e abroad, the children of Israel brought in abundance the firstfruits of corn, wine, and oil, and honey, and of all the increase of the field; and the tithe of all things brought they in abundantly. 
And concerning the children of Israel and Judah, that dwelt in the cities of Judah, they also brought in the tithe of oxen and sheep, and the tithe of holy things which were consecrated unto the LORD their God, and laid them by heaps. 
In the third month they began to lay the foundation of the heaps, and finished them in the seventh m
642,or of the tabernacle of the congregation. So they made an end of dividing the country. 
The LORD also spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Speak to the children of Israel, saying, Appoint out for you cities of refuge, whereof I spake unto you by the hand of Moses: 
That the slayer that killeth any person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and they shall be your refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city, they shall take him into the city unto them, and give him a place, that
555,ether, the floods stood upright as an heap, and the depths were congealed in the heart of the sea. 
The enemy said, I will pursue, I will overtake, I will divide the spoil; my lust shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them. 
Thou didst blow with thy wind, the sea covered them: they sank as lead in the mighty waters. 
Who is like unto thee, O LORD, among the gods? who is like thee, glorious in holiness, fearful in praises, doing wonders? 
Thou stretchedst out thy right hand, the earth swallowed them. 
Thou in thy 
617,uth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of old: 
Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us. 
We will not hide them from their children, shewing to the generation to come the praises of the LORD, and his strength, and his wonderful works that he hath done. 
For he established a testimony in Jacob, and appointed a law in Israel, which he commanded our fathers, that they should make them known to their children: 
That the generation to come might know them, even the children which should be born; who should arise and declare them to their children: 
That they might set their hope in God, and
573,ther, which was in Bethlehem. And Joab and his men went all night, and they came to Hebron at break of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; 
And his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; 
And the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith; and the f
662,he land which he promised them, and because he hated them, he hath brought them out to slay them in the wilderness. 
Yet they are thy people and thine inheritance, which thou broughtest out by thy mighty power and by thy stretched out arm. 
At that time the LORD said unto me, Hew thee two tables of stone like unto the first, and come up unto me into the mount, and make thee an ark of wood. 
And I will write on the tables the words that were in the first tables which thou brakest, and thou shalt put them in the ark. 
And I made an ark of shittim wood, and hewed two tables of stone like unto the first, and went up into the mount, having the two tables in m
660,arth. 
My mercy will I keep for him for evermore, and my covenant shall stand fast with him. 
His seed also will I make to endure for ever, and his throne as the days of heaven. 
If his children forsake my law, and walk not in my judgments; 
If they break my statutes, and keep not my commandments; 
Then will I visit their transgression with the rod, and their iniquity with stripes. 
Nevertheless my lovingkindness will I not utterly take from him, nor suffer my faithfulness to fail. 
My covenant will I not break, nor alter the thing that is gone out of my lips. 
Once have I sworn by my holiness that I will not lie unto David. 
His seed shall endure for 
494,elf, saying, I will be king: and he prepared him chariots and horsemen, and fifty men to run before him. 
And his father had not displeased him at any time in saying, Why hast thou done so? and he also was a very goodly man; and his mother bare him after Absalom. 
And he conferred with Joab the son of Zeruiah, and with Abiathar the priest: and they following Adonijah helped him. 
But Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and Nathan the prophet, and Shimei, and Rei, and the mig
698,t the portions of the Levites had not been given them: for the Levites and the singers, that did the work, were fled every one to his field. 
Then contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of God forsaken? And I gathered them together, and set them in their place. 
Then brought all Judah the tithe of the corn and the new wine and the oil unto the treasuries. 
And I made treasurers over the treasuries, Shelemiah the priest, and Zadok the scribe, and of the Levites, Pedaiah: and next to them was Hanan the son of Zaccur, the son of Mattaniah: for they were counted faithful, and their office was to distribute unto their brethren. 
Remember me, O my God, concerning this, and wipe 
657,dest neither princes nor servants: for this day I perceive, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably unto thy servants: for I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will not tarry one with thee this night: and that will be worse unto thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the king arose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all the people, saying, Behold, the king doth sit in the gate. And all the people came before the king: for Israel had fled every man to his tent. 
And all the people were at strife thro
554,? arise, and eat bread, and let thine heart be merry: I will give thee the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite. 
So she wrote letters in Ahab's name, and sealed them with his seal, and sent the letters unto the elders and to the nobles that were in his city, dwelling with Naboth. 
And she wrote in the letters, saying, Proclaim a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people: 
And set two men, sons of Belial, before him, to bear witness against him, saying, Thou didst blaspheme God and the king. And then carry him out, and stone him, that he may die. 
625,b, my servant; and thou, Jesurun, whom I have chosen. 
For I will pour water upon him that is thirsty, and floods upon the dry ground: I will pour my spirit upon thy seed, and my blessing upon thine offspring: 
And they shall spring up as among the grass, as willows by the water courses. 
One shall say, I am the LORD's; and another shall call himself by the name of Jacob; and another shall subscribe with his hand unto the LORD, and surname himself by the name of Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD the King of Israel, and his redeemer the LORD of hosts; I am the first, and I am the last; and beside me there is no God. 
And wh
485,ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with the windows: and light was against light in three ranks. 
And he made a porch of pillars; the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was before them: and the other pillars and the thick beam were before them. 
Then he made a porch for the throne where he might judge, even the porch of judgment: and it was covered with cedar from one side of the floor to the other. 
And his house wh
631, 
All go unto one place; all are of the dust, and all turn to dust again. 
Who knoweth the spirit of man that goeth upward, and the spirit of the beast that goeth downward to the earth? 
Wherefore I perceive that there is nothing better, than that a man should rejoice in his own works; for that is his portion: for who shall bring him to see what shall be after him? 
So I returned, and considered all the oppressions that are done under the sun: and behold the tears of such as were oppressed, and they had no comforter; and on the side of their oppressors there was power; but they had no comforter. 
Wherefore I praised the dea
488,sts, and to the Levites: Hilkiah and Zechariah and Jehiel, rulers of the house of God, gave unto the priests for the passover offerings two thousand and six hundred small cattle and three hundred oxen. 
Conaniah also, and Shemaiah and Nethaneel, his brethren, and Hashabiah and Jeiel and Jozabad, chief of the Levites, gave unto the Levites for passover offerings five thousand small cattle, and five hundred oxen. 
So the service was prepared, and the priests stood in their place, and t
666,ember the word unto thy servant, upon which thou hast caused me to hope. 
This is my comfort in my affliction: for thy word hath quickened me. 
The proud have had me greatly in derision: yet have I not declined from thy law. 
I remembered thy judgments of old, O LORD; and have comforted myself. 
Horror hath taken hold upon me because of the wicked that forsake thy law. 
Thy statutes have been my songs in the house of my pilgrimage. 
I have remembered thy name, O LORD, in the night, and have kept thy law. 
This I had, because I kept thy precepts. 
Thou art my portion, O LORD: I have said that I would keep thy words. 
I intreated thy favour with my whole heart
572,man saith unto him, Sir, I perceive that thou art a prophet. 
Our fathers worshipped in this mountain; and ye say, that in Jerusalem is the place where men ought to worship. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, believe me, the hour cometh, when ye shall neither in this mountain, nor yet at Jerusalem, worship the Father. 
Ye worship ye know not what: we know what we worship: for salvation is of the Jews. 
But the hour cometh, and now is, when the true worshippers shall worship the Father in spirit and in truth: for the Father seeketh such to worship him. 
God is a Spirit: a
691,bai, Shashai, Sharai, 
Azareel, and Shelemiah, Shemariah, 
Shallum, Amariah, and Joseph. 
Of the sons of Nebo; Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Jadau, and Joel, Benaiah. 
All these had taken strange wives: and some of them had wives by whom they had children. 
The words of Nehemiah the son of Hachaliah. And it came to pass in the month Chisleu, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the palace, 
That Hanani, one of my brethren, came, he and certain men of Judah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, which were left of the captivity, and concerning Jerusalem. 
And they said unto me, The remnant that are left of the captivity there in the province are in great af
619,er have I gone back from the commandment of his lips; I have esteemed the words of his mouth more than my necessary food. 
But he is in one mind, and who can turn him? and what his soul desireth, even that he doeth. 
For he performeth the thing that is appointed for me: and many such things are with him. 
Therefore am I troubled at his presence: when I consider, I am afraid of him. 
For God maketh my heart soft, and the Almighty troubleth me: 
Because I was not cut off before the darkness, neither hath he covered the darkness from my face. 
Why, seeing times are not hidden from the Almighty, do they that know hi
538, 
And the LORD appointed a set time, saying, To morrow the LORD shall do this thing in the land. 
And the LORD did that thing on the morrow, and all the cattle of Egypt died: but of the cattle of the children of Israel died not one. 
And Pharaoh sent, and, behold, there was not one of the cattle of the Israelites dead. And the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, and he did not let the people go. 
And the LORD said unto Moses and unto Aaron, Take to you handfuls of ashes of the furnace, and let Moses sprinkle it toward the heaven in the s
690,ned Eglon the king of Moab against Israel, because they had done evil in the sight of the LORD. 
And he gathered unto him the children of Ammon and Amalek, and went and smote Israel, and possessed the city of palm trees. 
So the children of Israel served Eglon the king of Moab eighteen years. 
But when the children of Israel cried unto the LORD, the LORD raised them up a deliverer, Ehud the son of Gera, a Benjamite, a man lefthanded: and by him the children of Israel sent a present unto Eglon the king of Moab. 
But Ehud made him a dagger which had two edges, of a cubit length; and he did gird it under his raiment upon his right thigh. 
And he brought the present unto Eglon king of 
532, covered on this side, and every one had two, which covered on that side, their bodies. 
And when they went, I heard the noise of their wings, like the noise of great waters, as the voice of the Almighty, the voice of speech, as the noise of an host: when they stood, they let down their wings. 
And there was a voice from the firmament that was over their heads, when they stood, and had let down their wings. 
And above the firmament that was over their heads was the likeness of a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone: a
607,ordan to go in to possess the land which the LORD your God giveth you, and ye shall possess it, and dwell therein. 
And ye shall observe to do all the statutes and judgments which I set before you this day. 
These are the statutes and judgments, which ye shall observe to do in the land, which the LORD God of thy fathers giveth thee to possess it, all the days that ye live upon the earth. 
Ye shall utterly destroy all the places, wherein the nations which ye shall possess served their gods, upon the high mountains, and upon the hills, and under every green tree: 
And ye shall overthrow their altars, a
578,, even as others. 
But God, who is rich in mercy, for his great love wherewith he loved us, 
Even when we were dead in sins, hath quickened us together with Christ, (by grace ye are saved;) 
And hath raised us up together, and made us sit together in heavenly places in Christ Jesus: 
That in the ages to come he might shew the exceeding riches of his grace in his kindness toward us through Christ Jesus. 
For by grace are ye saved through faith; and that not of yourselves: it is the gift of God: 
Not of works, lest any man should boast. 
For we are his workmanship, created 
709, said David, Will the men of Keilah deliver me and my men into the hand of Saul? And the LORD said, They will deliver thee up. 
Then David and his men, which were about six hundred, arose and departed out of Keilah, and went whithersoever they could go. And it was told Saul that David was escaped from Keilah; and he forbare to go forth. 
And David abode in the wilderness in strong holds, and remained in a mountain in the wilderness of Ziph. And Saul sought him every day, but God delivered him not into his hand. 
And David saw that Saul was come out to seek his life: and David was in the wilderness of Ziph in a wood. 
And Jonathan Saul's son arose, and went to David into the wood, and strengthened his
519, not against us former iniquities: let thy tender mercies speedily prevent us: for we are brought very low. 
Help us, O God of our salvation, for the glory of thy name: and deliver us, and purge away our sins, for thy name's sake. 
Wherefore should the heathen say, Where is their God? let him be known among the heathen in our sight by the revenging of the blood of thy servants which is shed. 
Let the sighing of the prisoner come before thee; according to the greatness of thy power preserve thou those that are appo
482,r of the wardrobe; (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the college:) and they spake to her to that effect. 
And she answered them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Tell ye the man that sent you to me, 
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all the curses that are written in the book which they have read before the king of Judah: 
Because they have forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other gods, that they might 
482, the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they give unto the Levites of the inheritance of their possession cities to dwell in; and ye shall give also unto the Levites suburbs for the cities round about them. 
And the cities shall they have to dwell in; and the suburbs of them shall be for their cattle, and for their goods, and for all their beasts. 
And the suburbs of the cities, which ye shall give unto the Levites, shall reach 
487,nto the end: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by no greater, he sware by himself, 
Saying, Surely blessing I will bless thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee. 
And so, after he had patiently endured, he obtained the promise. 
For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation is to them an end of all strife. 
Wherein God, willing more 
556,s, as long as she is put apart for her uncleanness. 
Moreover thou shalt not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife, to defile thyself with her. 
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to Molech, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination. 
Neither shalt thou lie with any beast to defile thyself therewith: neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: fo
718,may kill him, for the life of his brother whom he slew; and we will destroy the heir also: and so they shall quench my coal which is left, and shall not leave to my husband neither name nor remainder upon the earth. 
And the king said unto the woman, Go to thine house, and I will give charge concerning thee. 
And the woman of Tekoah said unto the king, My lord, O king, the iniquity be on me, and on my father's house: and the king and his throne be guiltless. 
And the king said, Whoever saith ought unto thee, bring him to me, and he shall not touch thee any more. 
Then said she, I pray thee, let the king remember the LORD thy God, that thou wouldest not suffer the revengers of blood to destroy any more, lest t
672,th. 
It is joy to the just to do judgment: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall remain in the congregation of the dead. 
He that loveth pleasure shall be a poor man: he that loveth wine and oil shall not be rich. 
The wicked shall be a ransom for the righteous, and the transgressor for the upright. 
It is better to dwell in the wilderness, than with a contentious and an angry woman. 
There is treasure to be desired and oil in the dwelling of the wise; but a foolish man spendeth it up. 
He that followeth after righteousness and mercy findeth life, righteousness, and honour. 
A wise man sc
480,the walls of Tyrus, and break down her towers: I will also scrape her dust from her, and make her like the top of a rock. 
It shall be a place for the spreading of nets in the midst of the sea: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD: and it shall become a spoil to the nations. 
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slain by the sword; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring upon Tyrus Nebuchadrezzar king of Baby
609, and slay every man his brother, and every man his companion, and every man his neighbour. 
And the children of Levi did according to the word of Moses: and there fell of the people that day about three thousand men. 
For Moses had said, Consecrate yourselves today to the LORD, even every man upon his son, and upon his brother; that he may bestow upon you a blessing this day. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses said unto the people, Ye have sinned a great sin: and now I will go up unto the LORD; peradventure I shall make an atonement for your sin. 
And Moses returned unto the LORD, and said,
622,the LORD thy God, to keep all his commandments which I command thee this day, to do that which is right in the eyes of the LORD thy God. 
Ye are the children of the LORD your God: ye shall not cut yourselves, nor make any baldness between your eyes for the dead. 
For thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God, and the LORD hath chosen thee to be a peculiar people unto himself, above all the nations that are upon the earth. 
Thou shalt not eat any abominable thing. 
These are the beasts which ye shall eat: the ox, the sheep, and the goat, 
The hart, and the roebuck, and the fallow deer, and the wild goat, and the
596,all come with speed swiftly: 
None shall be weary nor stumble among them; none shall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of their loins be loosed, nor the latchet of their shoes be broken: 
Whose arrows are sharp, and all their bows bent, their horses' hoofs shall be counted like flint, and their wheels like a whirlwind: 
Their roaring shall be like a lion, they shall roar like young lions: yea, they shall roar, and lay hold of the prey, and shall carry it away safe, and none shall deliver it. 
And in that day they shall roar against them like the roaring of the sea: and if one loo
539,riests the Levites that be of the seed of Zadok, which approach unto me, to minister unto me, saith the Lord GOD, a young bullock for a sin offering. 
And thou shalt take of the blood thereof, and put it on the four horns of it, and on the four corners of the settle, and upon the border round about: thus shalt thou cleanse and purge it. 
Thou shalt take the bullock also of the sin offering, and he shall burn it in the appointed place of the house, without the sanctuary. 
And on the second day thou shalt offer a kid of the goats witho
612,ause he hath dealt bountifully with me. 
The fool hath said in his heart, There is no God. They are corrupt, they have done abominable works, there is none that doeth good. 
The LORD looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, and seek God. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed t
700,ereof: and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit. 
Be not hasty in thy spirit to be angry: for anger resteth in the bosom of fools. 
Say not thou, What is the cause that the former days were better than these? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this. 
Wisdom is good with an inheritance: and by it there is profit to them that see the sun. 
For wisdom is a defence, and money is a defence: but the excellency of knowledge is, that wisdom giveth life to them that have it. 
Consider the work of God: for who can make that straight, which he hath made crooked? 
In the day of prosperity be joyful, but in the day of adversity consider: God also hath set the one over against
642,of my trouble I will call upon thee: for thou wilt answer me. 
Among the gods there is none like unto thee, O Lord; neither are there any works like unto thy works. 
All nations whom thou hast made shall come and worship before thee, O Lord; and shall glorify thy name. 
For thou art great, and doest wondrous things: thou art God alone. 
Teach me thy way, O LORD; I will walk in thy truth: unite my heart to fear thy name. 
I will praise thee, O Lord my God, with all my heart: and I will glorify thy name for evermore. 
For great is thy mercy toward me: and thou hast delivered my soul from the lowest hell. 
O God, the proud are risen agai
488,s. Amen. 
The elder unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in the truth; and not I only, but also all they that have known the truth; 
For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be with us for ever. 
Grace be with you, mercy, and peace, from God the Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love. 
I rejoiced greatly that I found of thy children walking in truth, as we have received a commandment from the Father. 
And now I besee
622,ns; and his meat was locusts and wild honey. 
Then went out to him Jerusalem, and all Judaea, and all the region round about Jordan, 
And were baptized of him in Jordan, confessing their sins. 
But when he saw many of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his baptism, he said unto them, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance: 
And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of th
611,
The children of Bazluth, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha, 
The children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Thamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Peruda, 
The children of Jaalah, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 
The children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth of Zebaim, the children of Ami. 
All the Nethinims, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two. 
And these were they whi
484, said unto him, All this power will I give thee, and the glory of them: for that is delivered unto me; and to whomsoever I will I give it. 
If thou therefore wilt worship me, all shall be thine. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, Get thee behind me, Satan: for it is written, Thou shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve. 
And he brought him to Jerusalem, and set him on a pinnacle of the temple, and said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself do
651,ments, and who followed me with all his heart, to do that only which was right in mine eyes; 
But hast done evil above all that were before thee: for thou hast gone and made thee other gods, and molten images, to provoke me to anger, and hast cast me behind thy back: 
Therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the house of Jeroboam, and will cut off from Jeroboam him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Israel, and will take away the remnant of the house of Jeroboam, as a man taketh away dung, till it be all gone. 
Him that dieth of Jeroboam in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth in the field shall the 
618,ying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a soul shall sin through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and shall do against any of them: 
If the priest that is anointed do sin according to the sin of the people; then let him bring for his sin, which he hath sinned, a young bullock without blemish unto the LORD for a sin offering. 
And he shall bring the bullock unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD; and shall lay his hand upon the bullock's head, and kill the bullock before the LORD. 
And the priest that is 
582,ly upon the fleece, and upon all the ground let there be dew. 
And God did so that night: for it was dry upon the fleece only, and there was dew on all the ground. 
Then Jerubbaal, who is Gideon, and all the people that were with him, rose up early, and pitched beside the well of Harod: so that the host of the Midianites were on the north side of them, by the hill of Moreh, in the valley. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people that are with thee are too many for me to give the Midianites into their hands, lest Israel vaunt themselves against me, saying, Mine own hand hath
481,y him, saying, I have not seen thee. 
Behold, this is the joy of his way, and out of the earth shall others grow. 
Behold, God will not cast away a perfect man, neither will he help the evil doers: 
Till he fill thy mouth with laughing, and thy lips with rejoicing. 
They that hate thee shall be clothed with shame; and the dwelling place of the wicked shall come to nought. 
Then Job answered and said, 
I know it is so of a truth: but how should man be just with God? 
If he will
491,hus, men of Macedonia, Paul's companions in travel, they rushed with one accord into the theatre. 
And when Paul would have entered in unto the people, the disciples suffered him not. 
And certain of the chief of Asia, which were his friends, sent unto him, desiring him that he would not adventure himself into the theatre. 
Some therefore cried one thing, and some another: for the assembly was confused: and the more part knew not wherefore they were come together. 
And they drew Alexand
707,siphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring unto us ministers for the house of our God. 
And by the good hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of understanding, of the sons of Mahli, the son of Levi, the son of Israel; and Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, eighteen; 
And Hashabiah, and with him Jeshaiah of the sons of Merari, his brethren and their sons, twenty; 
Also of the Nethinims, whom David and the princes had appointed for the service of the Levites, two hundred and twenty Nethinims: all of them were expressed by name. 
Then I proclaimed a fast there, at the river of Ahava, that we m
542, nations that are round about you; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, am against thee, and will execute judgments in the midst of thee in the sight of the nations. 
And I will do in thee that which I have not done, and whereunto I will not do any more the like, because of all thine abominations. 
Therefore the fathers shall eat the sons in the midst of thee, and the sons shall eat their fathers; and I will execute judgments in thee, and the whole remnant of thee will I scatter into all the winds. 
Wherefore, as I liv
616,at have not known a man by lying with him, keep alive for yourselves. 
And do ye abide without the camp seven days: whosoever hath killed any person, and whosoever hath touched any slain, purify both yourselves and your captives on the third day, and on the seventh day. 
And purify all your raiment, and all that is made of skins, and all work of goats' hair, and all things made of wood. 
And Eleazar the priest said unto the men of war which went to the battle, This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD commanded Moses; 
Only the gold, and the silver, the brass, the iron, the tin, and the lead, 
Every thi
494,, This man began to build, and was not able to finish. 
Or what king, going to make war against another king, sitteth not down first, and consulteth whether he be able with ten thousand to meet him that cometh against him with twenty thousand? 
Or else, while the other is yet a great way off, he sendeth an ambassage, and desireth conditions of peace. 
So likewise, whosoever he be of you that forsaketh not all that he hath, he cannot be my disciple. 
Salt is good: but if the salt have lost 
659, down, to build, and to plant. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, Jeremiah, what seest thou? And I said, I see a rod of an almond tree. 
Then said the LORD unto me, Thou hast well seen: for I will hasten my word to perform it. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me the second time, saying, What seest thou? And I said, I see a seething pot; and the face thereof is toward the north. 
Then the LORD said unto me, Out of the north an evil shall break forth upon all the inhabitants of the land. 
For, lo, I will call all the families of the kingdoms of the north, saith the LORD; and they shall come, and they shall set every one his throne a
594,h the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the prince give a gift unto any of his sons, the inheritance thereof shall be his sons'; it shall be their possession by inheritance. 
But if he give a gift of his inheritance to one of his servants, then it shall be his to the year of liberty; after it shall return to the prince: but his inheritance shall be his sons' for them. 
Moreover the prince shall not 
553,the Jews unto him, Now we know that thou hast a devil. Abraham is dead, and the prophets; and thou sayest, If a man keep my saying, he shall never taste of death. 
Art thou greater than our father Abraham, which is dead? and the prophets are dead: whom makest thou thyself? 
Jesus answered, If I honour myself, my honour is nothing: it is my Father that honoureth me; of whom ye say, that he is your God: 
Yet ye have not known him; but I know him: and if I should say, I know him not, I shall be a liar like unto you: but I know him, and keep his sayin
527,with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
Woe unto him that giveth his neighbour drink, that puttest thy bottle to him, and makest him drunken also, that thou mayest look on their nakedness! 
Thou art filled with shame for glory: drink thou also, and let thy foreskin be uncovered: the cup of the LORD's right hand shall be turned unto thee, and shameful spewing shall be on thy glory. 
For the violence of Lebanon shall cover thee, and the spoil of beasts, which made them afraid, because of m
598,him. 
And when the disciples heard it, they fell on their face, and were sore afraid. 
And Jesus came and touched them, and said, Arise, and be not afraid. 
And when they had lifted up their eyes, they saw no man, save Jesus only. 
And as they came down from the mountain, Jesus charged them, saying, Tell the vision to no man, until the Son of man be risen again from the dead. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Elias truly shall first come, and restore all things. 
But I say unto you, That Elias is
713,ruth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 
Whose are the fathers, and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ came, who is over all, God blessed for ever. Amen. 
Not as though the word of God hath taken none effect. For they are not all Israel, which are of Israel: 
Neither, because they are the seed of Abraham, are they all children: but, In
540,, when Joshua had spoken unto the people, that the seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns passed on before the LORD, and blew with the trumpets: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD followed them. 
And the armed men went before the priests that blew with the trumpets, and the rereward came after the ark, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And Joshua had commanded the people, saying, Ye shall not shout, nor make any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the
555,d: 
Therefore did my heart rejoice, and my tongue was glad; moreover also my flesh shall rest in hope: 
Because thou wilt not leave my soul in hell, neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou hast made known to me the ways of life; thou shalt make me full of joy with thy countenance. 
Men and brethren, let me freely speak unto you of the patriarch David, that he is both dead and buried, and his sepulchre is with us unto this day. 
Therefore being a prophet, and knowing that God had sworn with an oath to him, that of the fruit o
555, man put on a woman's garment: for all that do so are abomination unto the LORD thy God. 
If a bird's nest chance to be before thee in the way in any tree, or on the ground, whether they be young ones, or eggs, and the dam sitting upon the young, or upon the eggs, thou shalt not take the dam with the young: 
But thou shalt in any wise let the dam go, and take the young to thee; that it may be well with thee, and that thou mayest prolong thy days. 
When thou buildest a new house, then thou shalt make a battlement for thy roof, that thou bring not blo
526,Ruth the Moabitess, the wife of Mahlon, have I purchased to be my wife, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance, that the name of the dead be not cut off from among his brethren, and from the gate of his place: ye are witnesses this day. 
And all the people that were in the gate, and the elders, said, We are witnesses. The LORD make the woman that is come into thine house like Rachel and like Leah, which two did build the house of Israel: and do thou worthily in Ephratah, and be famous in Bethlehem: 
And le
631, the earth: and Joseph opened all the storehouses, and sold unto the Egyptians; and the famine waxed sore in the land of Egypt. 
And all countries came into Egypt to Joseph for to buy corn; because that the famine was so sore in all lands. 
Now when Jacob saw that there was corn in Egypt, Jacob said unto his sons, Why do ye look one upon another? 
And he said, Behold, I have heard that there is corn in Egypt: get you down thither, and buy for us from thence; that we may live, and not die. 
And Joseph's ten brethren went down to buy corn in Egypt. 
But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob sent not with his brethren; for he said
672,xalt thee. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Blessed are the undefiled in the way, who walk in the law of the LORD. 
Blessed are they that keep his testimonies, and that seek him with the whole heart. 
They also do no iniquity: they walk in his ways. 
Thou hast commanded us to keep thy precepts diligently. 
O that my ways were directed to keep thy statutes! 
Then shall I not be ashamed, when I have respect unto all thy commandments. 
I will praise thee with uprightness of heart, when I shall have learned thy righteous judgments. 
I will keep thy statutes: O forsake me not utterly. 
Wherewithal shall a young man cleanse
562,s Son, that he might be the firstborn among many brethren. 
Moreover whom he did predestinate, them he also called: and whom he called, them he also justified: and whom he justified, them he also glorified. 
What shall we then say to these things? If God be for us, who can be against us? 
He that spared not his own Son, but delivered him up for us all, how shall he not with him also freely give us all things? 
Who shall lay any thing to the charge of God's elect? It is God that justifieth. 
Who is he that condemneth? It is Christ that died, yea rather, tha
704,o that the people could not discern the noise of the shout of joy from the noise of the weeping of the people: for the people shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was heard afar off. 
Now when the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity builded the temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an h
487,al. 
And it came to pass, when Jabin king of Hazor had heard those things, that he sent to Jobab king of Madon, and to the king of Shimron, and to the king of Achshaph, 
And to the kings that were on the north of the mountains, and of the plains south of Chinneroth, and in the valley, and in the borders of Dor on the west, 
And to the Canaanite on the east and on the west, and to the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Jebusite in the mountains, and to the Hivite un
582,. 
The sons of Merari by Jaaziah; Beno, and Shoham, and Zaccur, and Ibri. 
Of Mahli came Eleazar, who had no sons. 
Concerning Kish: the son of Kish was Jerahmeel. 
The sons also of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jerimoth. These were the sons of the Levites after the house of their fathers. 
These likewise cast lots over against their brethren the sons of Aaron in the presence of David the king, and Zadok, and Ahimelech, and the chief of the fathers of the priests and Levites, even the principal fathers over against their younger brethren. 
Moreover David and the captains of the
712, let it please thee to bless the house of thy servant, that it may continue for ever before thee: for thou, O Lord GOD, hast spoken it: and with thy blessing let the house of thy servant be blessed for ever. 
And after this it came to pass that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them: and David took Methegammah out of the hand of the Philistines. 
And he smote Moab, and measured them with a line, casting them down to the ground; even with two lines measured he to put to death, and with one full line to keep alive. And so the Moabites became David's servants, and brought gifts. 
David smote also Hadadezer, the son of Rehob, king of Zobah, as he went to recover his border at the river Euphrates. 
An
512,ake our children cease from fearing the LORD. 
Therefore we said, Let us now prepare to build us an altar, not for burnt offering, nor for sacrifice: 
But that it may be a witness between us, and you, and our generations after us, that we might do the service of the LORD before him with our burnt offerings, and with our sacrifices, and with our peace offerings; that your children may not say to our children in time to come, Ye have no part in the LORD. 
Therefore said we, that it shall be, when they should 
691,er's near kinswoman. 
Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy father's brother, thou shalt not approach to his wife: she is thine aunt. 
Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy daughter in law: she is thy son's wife; thou shalt not uncover her nakedness. 
Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy brother's wife: it is thy brother's nakedness. 
Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of a woman and her daughter, neither shalt thou take her son's daughter, or her daughter's daughter, to uncover her nakedness; for they are her near kinswomen: it is wickedness. 
Neither shalt thou take a wife to her sister, to vex her, to uncover her nakedness, beside the other in her life time. 
633,areth fruit, and bringeth forth, some an hundredfold, some sixty, some thirty. 
Another parable put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom of heaven is likened unto a man which sowed good seed in his field: 
But while men slept, his enemy came and sowed tares among the wheat, and went his way. 
But when the blade was sprung up, and brought forth fruit, then appeared the tares also. 
So the servants of the householder came and said unto him, Sir, didst not thou sow good seed in thy field? from whence then hath it tares? 
He said unto them, An enemy hath done this. The servants said unto him, Wilt thou then that we go and gath
481,g, 
Thus hath the Lord dealt with me in the days wherein he looked on me, to take away my reproach among men. 
And in the sixth month the angel Gabriel was sent from God unto a city of Galilee, named Nazareth, 
To a virgin espoused to a man whose name was Joseph, of the house of David; and the virgin's name was Mary. 
And the angel came in unto her, and said, Hail, thou that art highly favoured, the Lord is with thee: blessed art thou among women. 
And when she saw him, she wa
563,ook me out of my mother's bowels: my praise shall be continually of thee. 
I am as a wonder unto many; but thou art my strong refuge. 
Let my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all the day. 
Cast me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my strength faileth. 
For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my soul take counsel together, 
Saying, God hath forsaken him: persecute and take him; for there is none to deliver him. 
O God, be not far from me: O my God, make haste for my help. 
Let them be confounded and 
660,he figure of a man, according to the beauty of a man; that it may remain in the house. 
He heweth him down cedars, and taketh the cypress and the oak, which he strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest: he planteth an ash, and the rain doth nourish it. 
Then shall it be for a man to burn: for he will take thereof, and warm himself; yea, he kindleth it, and baketh bread; yea, he maketh a god, and worshippeth it; he maketh it a graven image, and falleth down thereto. 
He burneth part thereof in the fire; with part thereof he eateth flesh; he roasteth roast, and is satisfied: yea, he warmeth himself, and saith, Aha, I am warm, I have seen th
498,he law shall perish from the priest, and counsel from the ancients. 
The king shall mourn, and the prince shall be clothed with desolation, and the hands of the people of the land shall be troubled: I will do unto them after their way, and according to their deserts will I judge them; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the sixth year, in the sixth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I sat in mine house, and the elders of Judah sat before me, that the hand of t
687, Lord, and spake of him to all them that looked for redemption in Jerusalem. 
And when they had performed all things according to the law of the Lord, they returned into Galilee, to their own city Nazareth. 
And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, filled with wisdom: and the grace of God was upon him. 
Now his parents went to Jerusalem every year at the feast of the passover. 
And when he was twelve years old, they went up to Jerusalem after the custom of the feast. 
And when they had fulfilled the days, as they returned, the child Jesus tarried behind in Jerusalem; and Joseph and his mother knew not of it. 
But they, supposing him to have been in the company, went a day
555, with thee, neither let any man be seen throughout all the mount; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before that mount. 
And he hewed two tables of stone like unto the first; and Moses rose up early in the morning, and went up unto mount Sinai, as the LORD had commanded him, and took in his hand the two tables of stone. 
And the LORD descended in the cloud, and stood with him there, and proclaimed the name of the LORD. 
And the LORD passed by before him, and proclaimed, The LORD, The LORD God, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in
587, and Nathan, and Adaiah, 
Machnadebai, Shashai, Sharai, 
Azareel, and Shelemiah, Shemariah, 
Shallum, Amariah, and Joseph. 
Of the sons of Nebo; Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Jadau, and Joel, Benaiah. 
All these had taken strange wives: and some of them had wives by whom they had children. 
The words of Nehemiah the son of Hachaliah. And it came to pass in the month Chisleu, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the palace, 
That Hanani, one of my brethren, came, he and certain men of Judah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, which were left of the cap
720,nt said, so it is. 
And it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of speaking, that, behold, the king's sons came, and lifted up their voice and wept: and the king also and all his servants wept very sore. 
But Absalom fled, and went to Talmai, the son of Ammihud, king of Geshur. And David mourned for his son every day. 
So Absalom fled, and went to Geshur, and was there three years. 
And the soul of king David longed to go forth unto Absalom: for he was comforted concerning Amnon, seeing he was dead. 
Now Joab the son of Zeruiah perceived that the king's heart was toward Absalom. 
And Joab sent to Tekoah, and fetched thence a wise woman, and said unto her, I pray thee, feign thyself to be a mourner, and p
506, gold that was occupied for the work in all the work of the holy place, even the gold of the offering, was twenty and nine talents, and seven hundred and thirty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary. 
And the silver of them that were numbered of the congregation was an hundred talents, and a thousand seven hundred and threescore and fifteen shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
A bekah for every man, that is, half a shekel, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for every one that went to be n
632,day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing the words of the LORD: 
And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro to seek the word of the LORD, and shall not find it. 
In that day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for thirst. 
They that swear by the sin of Samaria, and say, Thy god, O Dan, liveth; and, The manner of Beersheba liveth; even they shall fall, and never rise up again. 
I saw the LORD standing upon the altar: and he said, Smite the lintel of the 
573, should be son in law to the king? 
But it came to pass at the time when Merab Saul's daughter should have been given to David, that she was given unto Adriel the Meholathite to wife. 
And Michal Saul's daughter loved David: and they told Saul, and the thing pleased him. 
And Saul said, I will give him her, that she may be a snare to him, and that the hand of the Philistines may be against him. Wherefore Saul said to David, Thou shalt this day be my son in law in the one of the twain. 
And Saul commanded his servants, saying, Commune with David secretly, and say, Beh
685, me. 
And Jesus stood still, and commanded him to be called. And they call the blind man, saying unto him, Be of good comfort, rise; he calleth thee. 
And he, casting away his garment, rose, and came to Jesus. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, What wilt thou that I should do unto thee? The blind man said unto him, Lord, that I might receive my sight. 
And Jesus said unto him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee whole. And immediately he received his sight, and followed Jesus in the way. 
And when they came nigh to Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 
And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over a
582,e that was in their possession, in the midst of all Israel: 
But your eyes have seen all the great acts of the LORD which he did. 
Therefore shall ye keep all the commandments which I command you this day, that ye may be strong, and go in and possess the land, whither ye go to possess it; 
And that ye may prolong your days in the land, which the LORD sware unto your fathers to give unto them and to their seed, a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
For the land, whither thou goest in to possess it, is not as the land of Egypt, from whence ye came out, where thou sowedst th
615,nd Moses stretched forth his rod over the land of Egypt, and the LORD brought an east wind upon the land all that day, and all that night; and when it was morning, the east wind brought the locusts. 
And the locust went up over all the land of Egypt, and rested in all the coasts of Egypt: very grievous were they; before them there were no such locusts as they, neither after them shall be such. 
For they covered the face of the whole earth, so that the land was darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the fruit of the trees which the hail had left: and there remained not any green thing in t
668,alt prepare it every morning. 
And thou shalt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of an hin of oil, to temper with the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the prince give a gift unto any of his sons, the inheritance thereof shall be his sons'; it shall be their possession by inheritance. 
But if he give a gift of his inheritance to one of his servants, then it shall be his to the year of liberty; after it shall return
512,e not the works of thine own hands. 
O lord, thou hast searched me, and known me. 
Thou knowest my downsitting and mine uprising, thou understandest my thought afar off. 
Thou compassest my path and my lying down, and art acquainted with all my ways. 
For there is not a word in my tongue, but, lo, O LORD, thou knowest it altogether. 
Thou hast beset me behind and before, and laid thine hand upon me. 
Such knowledge is too wonderful for me; it is high, I cannot attain unto it. 
Whither shall I go from thy sp
672,o the other end of the earth; 
Thou shalt not consent unto him, nor hearken unto him; neither shall thine eye pity him, neither shalt thou spare, neither shalt thou conceal him: 
But thou shalt surely kill him; thine hand shall be first upon him to put him to death, and afterwards the hand of all the people. 
And thou shalt stone him with stones, that he die; because he hath sought to thrust thee away from the LORD thy God, which brought thee out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage. 
And all Israel shall hear, and fear, and shall do no more any such wickedness as this is among you. 
If thou shalt hear say in one of thy cities, which the LORD thy God ha
602,nd Barnabas, and expelled them out of their coasts. 
But they shook off the dust of their feet against them, and came unto Iconium. 
And the disciples were filled with joy, and with the Holy Ghost. 
And it came to pass in Iconium, that they went both together into the synagogue of the Jews, and so spake, that a great multitude both of the Jews and also of the Greeks believed. 
But the unbelieving Jews stirred up the Gentiles, and made their minds evil affected against the brethren. 
Long time therefore abode they speaking boldly in the Lord, which gave testimony unto the word of his grace, and g
512,working days; but on the sabbath it shall be opened, and in the day of the new moon it shall be opened. 
And the prince shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate without, and shall stand by the post of the gate, and the priests shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, and he shall worship at the threshold of the gate: then he shall go forth; but the gate shall not be shut until the evening. 
Likewise the people of the land shall worship at the door of this gate before the LORD in the
610, the elders of your tribes, and your officers, that I may speak these words in their ears, and call heaven and earth to record against them. 
For I know that after my death ye will utterly corrupt yourselves, and turn aside from the way which I have commanded you; and evil will befall you in the latter days; because ye will do evil in the sight of the LORD, to provoke him to anger through the work of your hands. 
And Moses spake in the ears of all the congregation of Israel the words of this song, until they were ended. 
Give ear, O ye heavens, and I will speak; and hear, O earth, the words of my mouth.
670,hall yet praise him, who is the health of my countenance, and my God. 
Judge me, O God, and plead my cause against an ungodly nation: O deliver me from the deceitful and unjust man. 
For thou art the God of my strength: why dost thou cast me off? why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy? 
O send out thy light and thy truth: let them lead me; let them bring me unto thy holy hill, and to thy tabernacles. 
Then will I go unto the altar of God, unto God my exceeding joy: yea, upon the harp will I praise thee, O God my God. 
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted within me? hope in God: for I shall yet praise him, who is the he
581,ht with the field of Ephron the Hittite for a possession of a buryingplace. 
There they buried Abraham and Sarah his wife; there they buried Isaac and Rebekah his wife; and there I buried Leah. 
The purchase of the field and of the cave that is therein was from the children of Heth. 
And when Jacob had made an end of commanding his sons, he gathered up his feet into the bed, and yielded up the ghost, and was gathered unto his people. 
And Joseph fell upon his father's face, and wept upon him, and kissed him. 
And Joseph commanded his servants the physicians to embalm his fat
584, 
And when Joshua and all Israel saw that the ambush had taken the city, and that the smoke of the city ascended, then they turned again, and slew the men of Ai. 
And the other issued out of the city against them; so they were in the midst of Israel, some on this side, and some on that side: and they smote them, so that they let none of them remain or escape. 
And the king of Ai they took alive, and brought him to Joshua. 
And it came to pass, when Israel had made an end of slaying all the inhabitants of Ai in the field, in the wilderness wherein they chased them, and when they
710,s old: for by the mounting up of Luhith with weeping shall they go it up; for in the way of Horonaim they shall raise up a cry of destruction. 
For the waters of Nimrim shall be desolate: for the hay is withered away, the grass faileth, there is no green thing. 
Therefore the abundance they have gotten, and that which they have laid up, shall they carry away to the brook of the willows. 
For the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; the howling thereof unto Eglaim, and the howling thereof unto Beerelim. 
For the waters of Dimon shall be full of blood: for I will bring more upon Dimon, lions upon him that escapeth of Moab, and upon the remnant of the land. 
Send ye the lamb to the ruler of the l
547,e Israel, but is come from a far country for thy great name's sake, and thy mighty hand, and thy stretched out arm; if they come and pray in this house; 
Then hear thou from the heavens, even from thy dwelling place, and do according to all that the stranger calleth to thee for; that all people of the earth may know thy name, and fear thee, as doth thy people Israel, and may know that this house which I have built is called by thy name. 
If thy people go out to war against their enemies by the way that thou shalt send them, and they pray unt
629,en Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come unto Absalom, that Hushai said unto Absalom, God save the king, God save the king. 
And Absalom said to Hushai, Is this thy kindness to thy friend? why wentest thou not with thy friend? 
And Hushai said unto Absalom, Nay; but whom the LORD, and this people, and all the men of Israel, choose, his will I be, and with him will I abide. 
And again, whom should I serve? should I not serve in the presence of his son? as I have served in thy father's presence, so will I be in thy presence. 
Then said Absalom to Ahithophel, Give counsel among you what we shall do. 
And Ahithophel sa
620,tains of war in all the fenced cities of Judah. 
And he took away the strange gods, and the idol out of the house of the LORD, and all the altars that he had built in the mount of the house of the LORD, and in Jerusalem, and cast them out of the city. 
And he repaired the altar of the LORD, and sacrificed thereon peace offerings and thank offerings, and commanded Judah to serve the LORD God of Israel. 
Nevertheless the people did sacrifice still in the high places, yet unto the LORD their God only. 
Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and his prayer unto his God, and the words of the seers that spake to him in 
598,ered, Hast thou appealed unto Caesar? unto Caesar shalt thou go. 
And after certain days king Agrippa and Bernice came unto Caesarea to salute Festus. 
And when they had been there many days, Festus declared Paul's cause unto the king, saying, There is a certain man left in bonds by Felix: 
About whom, when I was at Jerusalem, the chief priests and the elders of the Jews informed me, desiring to have judgment against him. 
To whom I answered, It is not the manner of the Romans to deliver any man to die, before that he which is accused have the accusers face to face, and have licence to answe
703, of thy servant: for unto thee, O Lord, do I lift up my soul. 
For thou, Lord, art good, and ready to forgive; and plenteous in mercy unto all them that call upon thee. 
Give ear, O LORD, unto my prayer; and attend to the voice of my supplications. 
In the day of my trouble I will call upon thee: for thou wilt answer me. 
Among the gods there is none like unto thee, O Lord; neither are there any works like unto thy works. 
All nations whom thou hast made shall come and worship before thee, O Lord; and shall glorify thy name. 
For thou art great, and doest wondrous things: thou art God alone. 
Teach me thy way, O LORD; I will walk in thy truth: unite my heart to fear thy name. 
I will praise the
553,e from her; but the sinner shall be taken by her. 
Behold, this have I found, saith the preacher, counting one by one, to find out the account: 
Which yet my soul seeketh, but I find not: one man among a thousand have I found; but a woman among all those have I not found. 
Lo, this only have I found, that God hath made man upright; but they have sought out many inventions. 
Who is as the wise man? and who knoweth the interpretation of a thing? a man's wisdom maketh his face to shine, and the boldness of his face shall be changed. 
I counsel thee t
652,and whosoever is defiled by the dead: 
Both male and female shall ye put out, without the camp shall ye put them; that they defile not their camps, in the midst whereof I dwell. 
And the children of Israel did so, and put them out without the camp: as the LORD spake unto Moses, so did the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, When a man or woman shall commit any sin that men commit, to do a trespass against the LORD, and that person be guilty; 
Then they shall confess their sin which they have done: and he shall recompense his trespass with the principal thereof, and add unto it the fift
584,hers Abraham and Isaac did walk, the God which fed me all my life long unto this day, 
The Angel which redeemed me from all evil, bless the lads; and let my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers Abraham and Isaac; and let them grow into a multitude in the midst of the earth. 
And when Joseph saw that his father laid his right hand upon the head of Ephraim, it displeased him: and he held up his father's hand, to remove it from Ephraim's head unto Manasseh's head. 
And Joseph said unto his father, Not so, my father: for this is the firstborn; put thy right hand upon h
573,es. 
And he said unto them, This is that which the LORD hath said, To morrow is the rest of the holy sabbath unto the LORD: bake that which ye will bake to day, and seethe that ye will seethe; and that which remaineth over lay up for you to be kept until the morning. 
And they laid it up till the morning, as Moses bade: and it did not stink, neither was there any worm therein. 
And Moses said, Eat that to day; for to day is a sabbath unto the LORD: to day ye shall not find it in the field. 
Six days ye shall gather it; but on the seventh day, which is the sabbath, in
606, my people are bent to backsliding from me: though they called them to the most High, none at all would exalt him. 
How shall I give thee up, Ephraim? how shall I deliver thee, Israel? how shall I make thee as Admah? how shall I set thee as Zeboim? mine heart is turned within me, my repentings are kindled together. 
I will not execute the fierceness of mine anger, I will not return to destroy Ephraim: for I am God, and not man; the Holy One in the midst of thee: and I will not enter into the city. 
They shall walk after the LORD: he shall roar like a lion: when he shall roar, then the children shall
591,And the Lord said, Whereunto then shall I liken the men of this generation? and to what are they like? 
They are like unto children sitting in the marketplace, and calling one to another, and saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have mourned to you, and ye have not wept. 
For John the Baptist came neither eating bread nor drinking wine; and ye say, He hath a devil. 
The Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a gluttonous man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners! 
But wisdom is justified of all her children. 
And one of the Phar
589,ing joy. 
If ye be reproached for the name of Christ, happy are ye; for the spirit of glory and of God resteth upon you: on their part he is evil spoken of, but on your part he is glorified. 
But let none of you suffer as a murderer, or as a thief, or as an evildoer, or as a busybody in other men's matters. 
Yet if any man suffer as a Christian, let him not be ashamed; but let him glorify God on this behalf. 
For the time is come that judgment must begin at the house of God: and if it first begin at us, what shall the end be of them that obey not the gospel of God? 
And if the right
572,nd her king as thou didst unto Jericho and her king: only the spoil thereof, and the cattle thereof, shall ye take for a prey unto yourselves: lay thee an ambush for the city behind it. 
So Joshua arose, and all the people of war, to go up against Ai: and Joshua chose out thirty thousand mighty men of valour, and sent them away by night. 
And he commanded them, saying, Behold, ye shall lie in wait against the city, even behind the city: go not very far from the city, but be ye all ready: 
And I, and all the people that are with me, will approach unto the city: and i
581,that speaketh like the piercings of a sword: but the tongue of the wise is health. 
The lip of truth shall be established for ever: but a lying tongue is but for a moment. 
Deceit is in the heart of them that imagine evil: but to the counsellors of peace is joy. 
There shall no evil happen to the just: but the wicked shall be filled with mischief. 
Lying lips are abomination to the LORD: but they that deal truly are his delight. 
A prudent man concealeth knowledge: but the heart of fools proclaimeth foolishness. 
The hand of the diligent shall bear rule: but the slothful sha
534,d none other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many. 
Of the sons of Izhar; Shelomith the chief. 
Of the sons of Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, and Jekameam the fourth. 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Micah the first and Jesiah the second. 
The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. The sons of Mahli; Eleazar, and Kish. 
And Eleazar died, and had no sons, but daughters: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them. 
The sons of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three. 
These were the sons of Lev
551,oah the son of Joahaz the recorder, to repair the house of the LORD his God. 
And when they came to Hilkiah the high priest, they delivered the money that was brought into the house of God, which the Levites that kept the doors had gathered of the hand of Manasseh and Ephraim, and of all the remnant of Israel, and of all Judah and Benjamin; and they returned to Jerusalem. 
And they put it in the hand of the workmen that had the oversight of the house of the LORD, and they gave it to the workmen that wrought in the house of the LORD, to repair an
584,ed not from the commandment of the king unto the priests and Levites concerning any matter, or concerning the treasures. 
Now all the work of Solomon was prepared unto the day of the foundation of the house of the LORD, and until it was finished. So the house of the LORD was perfected. 
Then went Solomon to Eziongeber, and to Eloth, at the sea side in the land of Edom. 
And Huram sent him by the hands of his servants ships, and servants that had knowledge of the sea; and they went with the servants of Solomon to Ophir, and took thence four hundred and fifty talents of gold, and
521,iling: for I will pass through thee, saith the LORD. 
Woe unto you that desire the day of the LORD! to what end is it for you? the day of the LORD is darkness, and not light. 
As if a man did flee from a lion, and a bear met him; or went into the house, and leaned his hand on the wall, and a serpent bit him. 
Shall not the day of the LORD be darkness, and not light? even very dark, and no brightness in it? 
I hate, I despise your feast days, and I will not smell in your solemn assemblies. 
Though ye offer me burnt o
686,thout blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullock, for the ram, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
These things ye shall do unto the LORD in your set feasts, beside your vows, and your freewill offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings. 
And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses spake unto the heads of the tribes concerning the children of Israel, saying, This 
484,nnot, until all the flocks be gathered together, and till they roll the stone from the well's mouth; then we water the sheep. 
And while he yet spake with them, Rachel came with her father's sheep; for she kept them. 
And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the flock of Laban his mother's brother. 
And Jacob kiss
636, that was born after the flesh persecuted him that was born after the Spirit, even so it is now. 
Nevertheless what saith the scripture? Cast out the bondwoman and her son: for the son of the bondwoman shall not be heir with the son of the freewoman. 
So then, brethren, we are not children of the bondwoman, but of the free. 
Stand fast therefore in the liberty wherewith Christ hath made us free, and be not entangled again with the yoke of bondage. 
Behold, I Paul say unto you, that if ye be circumcised, Christ shall profit you nothing. 
For I testify again to every man that is circumcised, that he is a debtor to do the whole law
582,cked of the land; that I may cut off all wicked doers from the city of the LORD. 
Hear my prayer, O LORD, and let my cry come unto thee. 
Hide not thy face from me in the day when I am in trouble; incline thine ear unto me: in the day when I call answer me speedily. 
For my days are consumed like smoke, and my bones are burned as an hearth. 
My heart is smitten, and withered like grass; so that I forget to eat my bread. 
By reason of the voice of my groaning my bones cleave to my skin. 
I am like a pelican of the wilderness: I am like an owl of the desert. 
I watch, and am as
647,eth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. 
If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed: 
For he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds. 
Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with paper and ink: but I trust to come unto you, and speak face to face, that our joy may be full. 
The children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen. 
The elder unto the wellbeloved Gaius, whom I love in the truth. 
Beloved, I wish above all things that thou mayest prosper and be in health, even as thy soul prospereth. 
For I rejoiced
562,favoured and leanfleshed; and stood by the other kine upon the brink of the river. 
And the ill favoured and leanfleshed kine did eat up the seven well favoured and fat kine. So Pharaoh awoke. 
And he slept and dreamed the second time: and, behold, seven ears of corn came up upon one stalk, rank and good. 
And, behold, seven thin ears and blasted with the east wind sprung up after them. 
And the seven thin ears devoured the seven rank and full ears. And Pharaoh awoke, and, behold, it was a dream. 
And it came to pass in the morning that his spirit was trou
544,eir seats, and exalted them of low degree. 
He hath filled the hungry with good things; and the rich he hath sent empty away. 
He hath holpen his servant Israel, in remembrance of his mercy; 
As he spake to our fathers, to Abraham, and to his seed for ever. 
And Mary abode with her about three months, and returned to her own house. 
Now Elisabeth's full time came that she should be delivered; and she brought forth a son. 
And her neighbours and her cousins heard how the Lord had shewed great mercy upon her; and they rejoiced with her. 
An
497, them that are round about us. 
How long, LORD? wilt thou be angry for ever? shall thy jealousy burn like fire? 
Pour out thy wrath upon the heathen that have not known thee, and upon the kingdoms that have not called upon thy name. 
For they have devoured Jacob, and laid waste his dwelling place. 
O remember not against us former iniquities: let thy tender mercies speedily prevent us: for we are brought very low. 
Help us, O God of our salvation, for the glory of thy name: and deliver us, an
575,hope is lost: we are cut off for our parts. 
Therefore prophesy and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O my people, I will open your graves, and cause you to come up out of your graves, and bring you into the land of Israel. 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I have opened your graves, O my people, and brought you up out of your graves, 
And shall put my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you in your own land: then shall ye know that I the LORD have spoken it, and performed it, saith the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto
587, mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
As saith the proverb of the ancients, Wickedness proceedeth from the wicked: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
After whom is the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou pursue? after a dead dog, after a flea. 
The LORD therefore be judge, and judge between me and thee, and see, and plead my cause, and deliver me out of thine hand. 
And it came to pass, when David had made an end of speaking these words unto Saul, that Saul said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And Saul lifted up his voice, and wept. 
And he said to David, Thou art mo
688,s' sakes, I will now say, Peace be within thee. 
Because of the house of the LORD our God I will seek thy good. 
Unto thee lift I up mine eyes, O thou that dwellest in the heavens. 
Behold, as the eyes of servants look unto the hand of their masters, and as the eyes of a maiden unto the hand of her mistress; so our eyes wait upon the LORD our God, until that he have mercy upon us. 
Have mercy upon us, O LORD, have mercy upon us: for we are exceedingly filled with contempt. 
Our soul is exceedingly filled with the scorning of those that are at ease, and with the contempt of the proud. 
If it had not been the LORD who was on our side, now may Israel say; 
If it had not been the LOR
609,s from Mesha, as thou goest unto Sephar a mount of the east. 
These are the sons of Shem, after their families, after their tongues, in their lands, after their nations. 
These are the families of the sons of Noah, after their generations, in their nations: and by these were the nations divided in the earth after the flood. 
And the whole earth was of one language, and of one speech. 
And it came to pass, as they journeyed from the east, that they found a plain in the land of Shinar; and they dwelt there. 
And they said one to another, Go to, let us make brick, and burn them thoroughly. And they had br
650,t the present unto Eglon king of Moab: and Eglon was a very fat man. 
And when he had made an end to offer the present, he sent away the people that bare the present. 
But he himself turned again from the quarries that were by Gilgal, and said, I have a secret errand unto thee, O king: who said, Keep silence. And all that stood by him went out from him. 
And Ehud came unto him; and he was sitting in a summer parlour, which he had for himself alone. And Ehud said, I have a message from God unto thee. And he arose out of his seat. 
And Ehud put forth his left hand, and took the dagger from his right thigh, and thrust it into his belly: 
And the
494, to God from idols to serve the living and true God; 
And to wait for his Son from heaven, whom he raised from the dead, even Jesus, which delivered us from the wrath to come. 
For yourselves, brethren, know our entrance in unto you, that it was not in vain: 
But even after that we had suffered before, and were shamefully entreated, as ye know, at Philippi, we were bold in our God to speak unto you the gospel of God with much contention. 
For our exhortation was not of deceit, nor of uncle
532,come nigh unto him for the press, they uncovered the roof where he was: and when they had broken it up, they let down the bed wherein the sick of the palsy lay. 
When Jesus saw their faith, he said unto the sick of the palsy, Son, thy sins be forgiven thee. 
But there was certain of the scribes sitting there, and reasoning in their hearts, 
Why doth this man thus speak blasphemies? who can forgive sins but God only? 
And immediately when Jesus perceived in his spirit that they so reasoned within themselves, he said unto them, 
629,ore double. 
If a man shall cause a field or vineyard to be eaten, and shall put in his beast, and shall feed in another man's field; of the best of his own field, and of the best of his own vineyard, shall he make restitution. 
If fire break out, and catch in thorns, so that the stacks of corn, or the standing corn, or the field, be consumed therewith; he that kindled the fire shall surely make restitution. 
If a man shall deliver unto his neighbour money or stuff to keep, and it be stolen out of the man's house; if the thief be found, let him pay double. 
If the thief be not found, then the master of the house shall be 
680,m my father's house, and from the land of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware unto me, saying, Unto thy seed will I give this land; he shall send his angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from thence. 
And if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou shalt be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again. 
And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master, and sware to him concerning that matter. 
And the servant took ten camels of the camels of his master, and departed; for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he arose, and went to Mesopotamia, unto the city of Nahor. 
And he m
670,e are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told us your earnest desire, your mourning, your fervent mind toward me; so that I rejoiced the more. 
For though I made you sorry with a letter
695,an. 
And the sons of Shimei were, Jahath, Zina, and Jeush, and Beriah. These four were the sons of Shimei. 
And Jahath was the chief, and Zizah the second: but Jeush and Beriah had not many sons; therefore they were in one reckoning, according to their father's house. 
The sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel, four. 
The sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separated, that he should sanctify the most holy things, he and his sons for ever, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to bless in his name for ever. 
Now concerning Moses the man of God, his sons were named of the tribe of Levi. 
The sons of Moses were, Gershom, and Eliezer. 
Of the sons o
683,ill ordain a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, and they shall dwell in their place, and shall be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness waste them any more, as at the beginning, 
And since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel. Moreover I will subdue all thine enemies. Furthermore I tell thee that the LORD will build thee an house. 
And it shall come to pass, when thy days be expired that thou must go to be with thy fathers, that I will raise up thy seed after thee, which shall be of thy sons; and I will establish his kingdom. 
He shall build me an house, and I will stablish his throne for ever. 
I will be his father, an
497,ieces man and woman; and with thee will I break in pieces old and young; and with thee will I break in pieces the young man and the maid; 
I will also break in pieces with thee the shepherd and his flock; and with thee will I break in pieces the husbandman and his yoke of oxen; and with thee will I break in pieces captains and rulers. 
And I will render unto Babylon and to all the inhabitants of Chaldea all their evil that they have done in Zion in your sight, saith the LORD. 
Behold, I am ag
641,, O ye children of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I also have given you cleanness of teeth in all your cities, and want of bread in all your places: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
And also I have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet three months to the harvest: and I caused it to rain upon one city, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered. 
So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have smitten you with blasting and mild
605, from the great sea ye shall point out for you mount Hor: 
From mount Hor ye shall point out your border unto the entrance of Hamath; and the goings forth of the border shall be to Zedad: 
And the border shall go on to Ziphron, and the goings out of it shall be at Hazarenan: this shall be your north border. 
And ye shall point out your east border from Hazarenan to Shepham: 
And the coast shall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on the east side of Ain; and the border shall descend, and shall reach unto the side of the sea of Chinnereth eastward: 
And the border shall go down to Jordan, and the goings
608,me: speak, for I desire to justify thee. 
If not, hearken unto me: hold thy peace, and I shall teach thee wisdom. 
Furthermore Elihu answered and said, 
Hear my words, O ye wise men; and give ear unto me, ye that have knowledge. 
For the ear trieth words, as the mouth tasteth meat. 
Let us choose to us judgment: let us know among ourselves what is good. 
For Job hath said, I am righteous: and God hath taken away my judgment. 
Should I lie against my right? my wound is incurable without transgression. 
What man is like Job, who drinketh up scorning like water? 
Which goeth in company with the workers o
656,thiopian with an host of a thousand thousand, and three hundred chariots; and came unto Mareshah. 
Then Asa went out against him, and they set the battle in array in the valley of Zephathah at Mareshah. 
And Asa cried unto the LORD his God, and said, LORD, it is nothing with thee to help, whether with many, or with them that have no power: help us, O LORD our God; for we rest on thee, and in thy name we go against this multitude. O LORD, thou art our God; let no man prevail against thee. 
So the LORD smote the Ethiopians before Asa, and before Judah; and the Ethiopians fled. 
And Asa and the people that were with him pursued them unto Gerar: and th
505,contended with them, and cursed them, and smote certain of them, and plucked off their hair, and made them swear by God, saying, Ye shall not give your daughters unto their sons, nor take their daughters unto your sons, or for yourselves. 
Did not Solomon king of Israel sin by these things? yet among many nations was there no king like him, who was beloved of his God, and God made him king over all Israel: nevertheless even him did outlandish women cause to sin. 
Shall we then hearken unto you to do 
554,ther. 
And there fell ten portions to Manasseh, beside the land of Gilead and Bashan, which were on the other side Jordan; 
Because the daughters of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons: and the rest of Manasseh's sons had the land of Gilead. 
And the coast of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethah, that lieth before Shechem; and the border went along on the right hand unto the inhabitants of Entappuah. 
Now Manasseh had the land of Tappuah: but Tappuah on the border of Manasseh belonged to the children of Ephraim; 
And the coast descended unt
516,n scarlet, and fine linen. 
All the gold that was occupied for the work in all the work of the holy place, even the gold of the offering, was twenty and nine talents, and seven hundred and thirty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary. 
And the silver of them that were numbered of the congregation was an hundred talents, and a thousand seven hundred and threescore and fifteen shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
A bekah for every man, that is, half a shekel, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for ev
578,r of the housetop, than with a brawling woman and in a wide house. 
As cold waters to a thirsty soul, so is good news from a far country. 
A righteous man falling down before the wicked is as a troubled fountain, and a corrupt spring. 
It is not good to eat much honey: so for men to search their own glory is not glory. 
He that hath no rule over his own spirit is like a city that is broken down, and without walls. 
As snow in summer, and as rain in harvest, so honour is not seemly for a fool. 
As the bird by wandering, as the swallow by flying, so the curse causeless shal
630, of the LORD, and pitched in Rephidim: and there was no water for the people to drink. 
Wherefore the people did chide with Moses, and said, Give us water that we may drink. And Moses said unto them, Why chide ye with me? wherefore do ye tempt the LORD? 
And the people thirsted there for water; and the people murmured against Moses, and said, Wherefore is this that thou hast brought us up out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst? 
And Moses cried unto the LORD, saying, What shall I do unto this people? they be almost ready to stone me. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go on before the people, and 
572,hat gave thanks, whereof one went on the right hand upon the wall toward the dung gate: 
And after them went Hoshaiah, and half of the princes of Judah, 
And Azariah, Ezra, and Meshullam, 
Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah, and Jeremiah, 
And certain of the priests' sons with trumpets; namely, Zechariah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Michaiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph: 
And his brethren, Shemaiah, and Azarael, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai, Nethaneel, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments of David the man of 
519,t to do unto them. 
And at what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to build and to plant it; 
If it do evil in my sight, that it obey not my voice, then I will repent of the good, wherewith I said I would benefit them. 
Now therefore go to, speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I frame evil against you, and devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and make your ways and your doings good. 
564,ords unto the ends of the world. 
But I say, Did not Israel know? First Moses saith, I will provoke you to jealousy by them that are no people, and by a foolish nation I will anger you. 
But Esaias is very bold, and saith, I was found of them that sought me not; I was made manifest unto them that asked not after me. 
But to Israel he saith, All day long I have stretched forth my hands unto a disobedient and gainsaying people. 
I say then, Hath God cast away his people? God forbid. For I also am an Israelite, of the seed of Abraham, of the tribe of Benjamin. 
519,ther understand they his counsel: for he shall gather them as the sheaves into the floor. 
Arise and thresh, O daughter of Zion: for I will make thine horn iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their substance unto the Lord of the whole earth. 
Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, 
633,LORD's vengeance; he will render unto her a recompence. 
Babylon hath been a golden cup in the LORD's hand, that made all the earth drunken: the nations have drunken of her wine; therefore the nations are mad. 
Babylon is suddenly fallen and destroyed: howl for her; take balm for her pain, if so be she may be healed. 
We would have healed Babylon, but she is not healed: forsake her, and let us go every one into his own country: for her judgment reacheth unto heaven, and is lifted up even to the skies. 
The LORD hath brought forth our righteousness: come, and let us declare in Zion the work of the LORD our God. 
Make bright th
552, that thou obeyedst not my voice. 
The wind shall eat up all thy pastors, and thy lovers shall go into captivity: surely then shalt thou be ashamed and confounded for all thy wickedness. 
O inhabitant of Lebanon, that makest thy nest in the cedars, how gracious shalt thou be when pangs come upon thee, the pain as of a woman in travail! 
As I live, saith the LORD, though Coniah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah were the signet upon my right hand, yet would I pluck thee thence; 
And I will give thee into the hand of them that seek thy life, and in
512,her, he began to say unto his disciples first of all, Beware ye of the leaven of the Pharisees, which is hypocrisy. 
For there is nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; neither hid, that shall not be known. 
Therefore whatsoever ye have spoken in darkness shall be heard in the light; and that which ye have spoken in the ear in closets shall be proclaimed upon the housetops. 
And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill the body, and after that have no more that they can do. 
But I wi
603,ead of the goat, and shall send him away by the hand of a fit man into the wilderness: 
And the goat shall bear upon him all their iniquities unto a land not inhabited: and he shall let go the goat in the wilderness. 
And Aaron shall come into the tabernacle of the congregation, and shall put off the linen garments, which he put on when he went into the holy place, and shall leave them there: 
And he shall wash his flesh with water in the holy place, and put on his garments, and come forth, and offer his burnt offering, and the burnt offering of the people, and make an atonement for himself, and 
523, even before God, and lifted up their voices, and wept sore; 
And said, O LORD God of Israel, why is this come to pass in Israel, that there should be to day one tribe lacking in Israel? 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the people rose early, and built there an altar, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings. 
And the children of Israel said, Who is there among all the tribes of Israel that came not up with the congregation unto the LORD? For they had made a great oath concerning him that came not up to
715,go down into the innermost parts of the belly. 
Burning lips and a wicked heart are like a potsherd covered with silver dross. 
He that hateth dissembleth with his lips, and layeth up deceit within him; 
When he speaketh fair, believe him not: for there are seven abominations in his heart. 
Whose hatred is covered by deceit, his wickedness shall be shewed before the whole congregation. 
Whoso diggeth a pit shall fall therein: and he that rolleth a stone, it will return upon him. 
A lying tongue hateth those that are afflicted by it; and a flattering mouth worketh ruin. 
Boast not thyself of to morrow; for thou knowest not what a day may bring forth. 
Let another man praise thee, and not thine own mouth; a 
597,ufferings; that, when his glory shall be revealed, ye may be glad also with exceeding joy. 
If ye be reproached for the name of Christ, happy are ye; for the spirit of glory and of God resteth upon you: on their part he is evil spoken of, but on your part he is glorified. 
But let none of you suffer as a murderer, or as a thief, or as an evildoer, or as a busybody in other men's matters. 
Yet if any man suffer as a Christian, let him not be ashamed; but let him glorify God on this behalf. 
For the time is come that judgment must begin at the house of God: and if it first begin at us, what s
587,Pilate then went out unto them, and said, What accusation bring ye against this man? 
They answered and said unto him, If he were not a malefactor, we would not have delivered him up unto thee. 
Then said Pilate unto them, Take ye him, and judge him according to your law. The Jews therefore said unto him, It is not lawful for us to put any man to death: 
That the saying of Jesus might be fulfilled, which he spake, signifying what death he should die. 
Then Pilate entered into the judgment hall again, and called Jesus, and said unto him, Art thou the King of the Jews? 
Jesus answer
525,nor her people; as Mordecai had charged her: for Esther did the commandment of Mordecai, like as when she was brought up with him. 
In those days, while Mordecai sat in the king's gate, two of the king's chamberlains, Bigthan and Teresh, of those which kept the door, were wroth, and sought to lay hands on the king Ahasuerus. 
And the thing was known to Mordecai, who told it unto Esther the queen; and Esther certified the king thereof in Mordecai's name. 
And when inquisition was made of the matter, it was found out; the
659,t Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard left certain of the poor of the land for vinedressers and for husbandmen. 
Also the pillars of brass that were in the house of the LORD, and the bases, and the brasen sea that was in the house of the LORD, the Chaldeans brake, and carried all the brass of them to Babylon. 
The caldrons also, and the shovels, and the snuffers, and the bowls, and the spoons, and all the vessels of brass wherewith they ministered, took they away. 
And the basons, and the firepans, and the bowls, and the caldrons, and the candlesticks, and the spoons, and the cups; that which was of gold in gold, and that which was of silver in silve
547,ne to another, Behold, this dreamer cometh. 
Come now therefore, and let us slay him, and cast him into some pit, and we will say, Some evil beast hath devoured him: and we shall see what will become of his dreams. 
And Reuben heard it, and he delivered him out of their hands; and said, Let us not kill him. 
And Reuben said unto them, Shed no blood, but cast him into this pit that is in the wilderness, and lay no hand upon him; that he might rid him out of their hands, to deliver him to his father again. 
And it came to pass, when Joseph was
646,sus Christ. 
And these things write we unto you, that your joy may be full. 
This then is the message which we have heard of him, and declare unto you, that God is light, and in him is no darkness at all. 
If we say that we have fellowship with him, and walk in darkness, we lie, and do not the truth: 
But if we walk in the light, as he is in the light, we have fellowship one with another, and the blood of Jesus Christ his Son cleanseth us from all sin. 
If we say that we have no sin, we deceive ourselves, and the truth is not in us. 
If we confess our sins, he is faithful and just to forgive us our sins, and to cleanse us from all unright
499, he may give them the heritage of the heathen. 
The works of his hands are verity and judgment; all his commandments are sure. 
They stand fast for ever and ever, and are done in truth and uprightness. 
He sent redemption unto his people: he hath commanded his covenant for ever: holy and reverend is his name. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: a good understanding have all they that do his commandments: his praise endureth for ever. 
Praise ye the LORD. Blessed is the man that fe
562,near of kin unto us, one of our next kinsmen. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said, He said unto me also, Thou shalt keep fast by my young men, until they have ended all my harvest. 
And Naomi said unto Ruth her daughter in law, It is good, my daughter, that thou go out with his maidens, that they meet thee not in any other field. 
So she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz to glean unto the end of barley harvest and of wheat harvest; and dwelt with her mother in law. 
Then Naomi her mother in law said unto her, My daughter, shall I not seek rest for thee, that it ma
659, the most high God, and kept not his testimonies: 
But turned back, and dealt unfaithfully like their fathers: they were turned aside like a deceitful bow. 
For they provoked him to anger with their high places, and moved him to jealousy with their graven images. 
When God heard this, he was wroth, and greatly abhorred Israel: 
So that he forsook the tabernacle of Shiloh, the tent which he placed among men; 
And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the enemy's hand. 
He gave his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with his inheritance. 
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not given to marriage. 
Th
626, and, behold, there ran out waters on the right side. 
And when the man that had the line in his hand went forth eastward, he measured a thousand cubits, and he brought me through the waters; the waters were to the ankles. 
Again he measured a thousand, and brought me through the waters; the waters were to the knees. Again he measured a thousand, and brought me through; the waters were to the loins. 
Afterward he measured a thousand; and it was a river that I could not pass over: for the waters were risen, waters to swim in, a river that could not be passed over. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen this? T
589,d unto Aaron, This is it that the LORD spake, saying, I will be sanctified in them that come nigh me, and before all the people I will be glorified. And Aaron held his peace. 
And Moses called Mishael and Elzaphan, the sons of Uzziel the uncle of Aaron, and said unto them, Come near, carry your brethren from before the sanctuary out of the camp. 
So they went near, and carried them in their coats out of the camp; as Moses had said. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, and unto Eleazar and unto Ithamar, his sons, Uncover not your heads, neither rend your clothes; lest ye die, and lest wrath c
613,ples fast not? 
And Jesus said unto them, Can the children of the bridechamber mourn, as long as the bridegroom is with them? but the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken from them, and then shall they fast. 
No man putteth a piece of new cloth unto an old garment, for that which is put in to fill it up taketh from the garment, and the rent is made worse. 
Neither do men put new wine into old bottles: else the bottles break, and the wine runneth out, and the bottles perish: but they put new wine into new bottles, and both are preserved. 
While he spake these things unto them, behold, there ca
677, the flock; neither shall the shepherds feed themselves any more; for I will deliver my flock from their mouth, that they may not be meat for them. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, will both search my sheep, and seek them out. 
As a shepherd seeketh out his flock in the day that he is among his sheep that are scattered; so will I seek out my sheep, and will deliver them out of all places where they have been scattered in the cloudy and dark day. 
And I will bring them out from the people, and gather them from the countries, and will bring them to their own land, and feed them upon the mountains of Israel by the rivers, and in all the inhabited places of
650,abominations in the house which is called by my name, to pollute it. 
And they have built the high places of Tophet, which is in the valley of the son of Hinnom, to burn their sons and their daughters in the fire; which I commanded them not, neither came it into my heart. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be called Tophet, nor the valley of the son of Hinnom, but the valley of slaughter: for they shall bury in Tophet, till there be no place. 
And the carcases of this people shall be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall fray them away. 
Then will I cause to cea
618,therein in safety. 
And if ye shall say, What shall we eat the seventh year? behold, we shall not sow, nor gather in our increase: 
Then I will command my blessing upon you in the sixth year, and it shall bring forth fruit for three years. 
And ye shall sow the eighth year, and eat yet of old fruit until the ninth year; until her fruits come in ye shall eat of the old store. 
The land shall not be sold for ever: for the land is mine, for ye are strangers and sojourners with me. 
And in all the land of your possession ye shall grant a redemption for the land. 
If thy brother be waxen poor, and hath sold away som
684, as the truth is in Jesus: 
That ye put off concerning the former conversation the old man, which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts; 
And be renewed in the spirit of your mind; 
And that ye put on the new man, which after God is created in righteousness and true holiness. 
Wherefore putting away lying, speak every man truth with his neighbour: for we are members one of another. 
Be ye angry, and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your wrath: 
Neither give place to the devil. 
Let him that stole steal no more: but rather let him labour, working with his hands the thing which is good, that he may have to give to him that needeth. 
Let no corrupt communication proce
536,for all the words of this letter, and of that which they had seen concerning this matter, and which had come unto them, 
The Jews ordained, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves unto them, so as it should not fail, that they would keep these two days according to their writing, and according to their appointed time every year; 
And that these days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not
542,book. 
For, lo, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will bring again the captivity of my people Israel and Judah, saith the LORD: and I will cause them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers, and they shall possess it. 
And these are the words that the LORD spake concerning Israel and concerning Judah. 
For thus saith the LORD; We have heard a voice of trembling, of fear, and not of peace. 
Ask ye now, and see whether a man doth travail with child? wherefore do I see every man with his hands on his loins, as a woman in tra
567,p; and when thou hast opened his mouth, thou shalt find a piece of money: that take, and give unto them for me and thee. 
At the same time came the disciples unto Jesus, saying, Who is the greatest in the kingdom of heaven? 
And Jesus called a little child unto him, and set him in the midst of them, 
And said, Verily I say unto you, Except ye be converted, and become as little children, ye shall not enter into the kingdom of heaven. 
Whosoever therefore shall humble himself as this little child, the same is greatest in the kingdom of heaven. 
And whoso shall re
711,hide my face in that day for all the evils which they shall have wrought, in that they are turned unto other gods. 
Now therefore write ye this song for you, and teach it the children of Israel: put it in their mouths, that this song may be a witness for me against the children of Israel. 
For when I shall have brought them into the land which I sware unto their fathers, that floweth with milk and honey; and they shall have eaten and filled themselves, and waxen fat; then will they turn unto other gods, and serve them, and provoke me, and break my covenant. 
And it shall come to pass, when many evils and troubles are befallen them, that this song shall testify against them as a witness; for it shall no
554,ere is none to comfort me: all mine enemies have heard of my trouble; they are glad that thou hast done it: thou wilt bring the day that thou hast called, and they shall be like unto me. 
Let all their wickedness come before thee; and do unto them, as thou hast done unto me for all my transgressions: for my sighs are many, and my heart is faint. 
How hath the LORD covered the daughter of Zion with a cloud in his anger, and cast down from heaven unto the earth the beauty of Israel, and remembered not his footstool in the day of his anger! 
The LORD 
537,, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, and the princes of Judah, with the carpenters and smiths, from Jerusalem, and had brought them to Babylon. 
One basket had very good figs, even like the figs that are first ripe: and the other basket had very naughty figs, which could not be eaten, they were so bad. 
Then said the LORD unto me, What seest thou, Jeremiah? And I said, Figs; the good figs,
586,ring and the meat offering upon the altar: and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and he shall be clean. 
And if he be poor, and cannot get so much; then he shall take one lamb for a trespass offering to be waved, to make an atonement for him, and one tenth deal of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering, and a log of oil; 
And two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, such as he is able to get; and the one shall be a sin offering, and the other a burnt offering. 
And he shall bring them on the eighth day for his cleansing unto the priest, unto the door of the taber
661,n his kindness toward us through Christ Jesus. 
For by grace are ye saved through faith; and that not of yourselves: it is the gift of God: 
Not of works, lest any man should boast. 
For we are his workmanship, created in Christ Jesus unto good works, which God hath before ordained that we should walk in them. 
Wherefore remember, that ye being in time past Gentiles in the flesh, who are called Uncircumcision by that which is called the Circumcision in the flesh made by hands; 
That at that time ye were without Christ, being aliens from the commonwealth of Israel, and strangers from the covenants of promise, having no hope, and without God in the world:
485,d to the kings that were on the north of the mountains, and of the plains south of Chinneroth, and in the valley, and in the borders of Dor on the west, 
And to the Canaanite on the east and on the west, and to the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Jebusite in the mountains, and to the Hivite under Hermon in the land of Mizpeh. 
And they went out, they and all their hosts with them, much people, even as the sand that is upon the sea shore in multitude, with hors
488,RD had anointed to cut off the house of Ahab. 
And it came to pass, that, when Jehu was executing judgment upon the house of Ahab, and found the princes of Judah, and the sons of the brethren of Ahaziah, that ministered to Ahaziah, he slew them. 
And he sought Ahaziah: and they caught him, (for he was hid in Samaria,) and brought him to Jehu: and when they had slain him, they buried him: Because, said they, he is the son of Jehoshaphat, who sought the LORD with all his heart. So the 
530,he Spirit: 
By which also he went and preached unto the spirits in prison; 
Which sometime were disobedient, when once the longsuffering of God waited in the days of Noah, while the ark was a preparing, wherein few, that is, eight souls were saved by water. 
The like figure whereunto even baptism doth also now save us (not the putting away of the filth of the flesh, but the answer of a good conscience toward God,) by the resurrection of Jesus Christ: 
Who is gone into heaven, and is on the right hand of God; angels and autho
607, of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinket
622,Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him. 
And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia. 
And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will. 
And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided toward the four winds of heaven; and not to his posterity, nor according to his dominion which
598,d his princes, and the residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this land, and them that dwell in the land of Egypt: 
And I will deliver them to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth for their hurt, to be a reproach and a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in all places whither I shall drive them. 
And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gave unto them and to their fathers. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that was the
687, up one of her whelps: it became a young lion, and it learned to catch the prey; it devoured men. 
The nations also heard of him; he was taken in their pit, and they brought him with chains unto the land of Egypt. 
Now when she saw that she had waited, and her hope was lost, then she took another of her whelps, and made him a young lion. 
And he went up and down among the lions, he became a young lion, and learned to catch the prey, and devoured men. 
And he knew their desolate palaces, and he laid waste their cities; and the land was desolate, and the fulness thereof, by the noise of his roaring. 
Then the nations set against him on every side from the provinces, and spread the
519,ophesy, and forbid not to speak with tongues. 
Let all things be done decently and in order. 
Moreover, brethren, I declare unto you the gospel which I preached unto you, which also ye have received, and wherein ye stand; 
By which also ye are saved, if ye keep in memory what I preached unto you, unless ye have believed in vain. 
For I delivered unto you first of all that which I also received, how that Christ died for our sins according to the scriptures; 
And that he was buried, and that he rose again the third 
505,rth. 
Also I will ordain a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, and they shall dwell in their place, and shall be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness waste them any more, as at the beginning, 
And since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel. Moreover I will subdue all thine enemies. Furthermore I tell thee that the LORD will build thee an house. 
And it shall come to pass, when thy days be expired that thou must go to be with thy fathers, that I 
589,sess their houses: I will also make the pomp of the strong to cease; and their holy places shall be defiled. 
Destruction cometh; and they shall seek peace, and there shall be none. 
Mischief shall come upon mischief, and rumour shall be upon rumour; then shall they seek a vision of the prophet; but the law shall perish from the priest, and counsel from the ancients. 
The king shall mourn, and the prince shall be clothed with desolation, and the hands of the people of the land shall be troubled: I will do unto them after their way, and according to their deserts will I judge them; a
568,h the LORD. 
The LORD shall bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the good of Jerusalem all the days of thy life. 
Yea, thou shalt see thy children's children, and peace upon Israel. 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth, may Israel now say: 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth: yet they have not prevailed against me. 
The plowers plowed upon my back: they made long their furrows. 
The LORD is righteous: he hath cut asunder the cords of the wicked. 
Let them all be confounded and turned back that hate Zion. 
Let them be as the grass
603,st thou not smite him there to the ground? and I would have given thee ten shekels of silver, and a girdle. 
And the man said unto Joab, Though I should receive a thousand shekels of silver in mine hand, yet would I not put forth mine hand against the king's son: for in our hearing the king charged thee and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Beware that none touch the young man Absalom. 
Otherwise I should have wrought falsehood against mine own life: for there is no matter hid from the king, and thou thyself wouldest have set thyself against me. 
Then said Joab, I may not tarry thus with thee. And he to
495,the dukes of Edom were; duke Timnah, duke Aliah, duke Jetheth, 
Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon, 
Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar, 
Duke Magdiel, duke Iram. These are the dukes of Edom. 
These are the sons of Israel; Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, Issachar, and Zebulun, 
Dan, Joseph, and Benjamin, Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
The sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and Shelah: which three were born unto him of the daughter of Shua the Canaanitess. And Er, the firstborn of Judah, was evi
480,r from my father's house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother. 
And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and womenservants, and gave them unto Abraham, and restored him Sarah his wife. 
And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before thee: dwell where it pleaseth thee. 
And unto Sarah he said, Behold, I have given thy brother a thousand pieces of silver: behold, h
543,sea. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, which murmur against me? I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they murmur against me. 
Say unto them, As truly as I live, saith the LORD, as ye have spoken in mine ears, so will I do to you: 
Your carcases shall fall in this wilderness; and all that were numbered of you, according to your whole number, from twenty years old and upward which have murmured against me. 
Doubtless ye shall not come into the 
518,layed the harlot: she that conceived them hath done shamefully: for she said, I will go after my lovers, that give me my bread and my water, my wool and my flax, mine oil and my drink. 
Therefore, behold, I will hedge up thy way with thorns, and make a wall, that she shall not find her paths. 
And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now
492,ael shall not abide with us: for his hand is sore upon us, and upon Dagon our god. 
They sent therefore and gathered all the lords of the Philistines unto them, and said, What shall we do with the ark of the God of Israel? And they answered, Let the ark of the God of Israel be carried about unto Gath. And they carried the ark of the God of Israel about thither. 
And it was so, that, after they had carried it about, the hand of the LORD was against the city with a very great destruction: 
663,ll of water at the time of the evening, even the time that women go out to draw water. 
And he said O LORD God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send me good speed this day, and shew kindness unto my master Abraham. 
Behold, I stand here by the well of water; and the daughters of the men of the city come out to draw water: 
And let it come to pass, that the damsel to whom I shall say, Let down thy pitcher, I pray thee, that I may drink; and she shall say, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: let the same be she that thou hast appointed for thy servant Isaac; and thereby shall I know that thou hast shewed kindness unto my master. 
And it came to 
654,draw you before the judgment seats? 
Do not they blaspheme that worthy name by the which ye are called? 
If ye fulfil the royal law according to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself, ye do well: 
But if ye have respect to persons, ye commit sin, and are convinced of the law as transgressors. 
For whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all. 
For he that said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou commit no adultery, yet if thou kill, thou art become a transgressor of the law. 
So speak ye, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law of liberty. 
For he shall 
548,herefore reign in your mortal body, that ye should obey it in the lusts thereof. 
Neither yield ye your members as instruments of unrighteousness unto sin: but yield yourselves unto God, as those that are alive from the dead, and your members as instruments of righteousness unto God. 
For sin shall not have dominion over you: for ye are not under the law, but under grace. 
What then? shall we sin, because we are not under the law, but under grace? God forbid. 
Know ye not, that to whom ye yield yourselves servants to obey, his servants ye are
592,h joined together, let not man put asunder. 
And in the house his disciples asked him again of the same matter. 
And he saith unto them, Whosoever shall put away his wife, and marry another, committeth adultery against her. 
And if a woman shall put away her husband, and be married to another, she committeth adultery. 
And they brought young children to him, that he should touch them: and his disciples rebuked those that brought them. 
But when Jesus saw it, he was much displeased, and said unto them, Suffer the little children to come unto me, and forbid them not: for of such is the k
708, own conceit; but the poor that hath understanding searcheth him out. 
When righteous men do rejoice, there is great glory: but when the wicked rise, a man is hidden. 
He that covereth his sins shall not prosper: but whoso confesseth and forsaketh them shall have mercy. 
Happy is the man that feareth alway: but he that hardeneth his heart shall fall into mischief. 
As a roaring lion, and a ranging bear; so is a wicked ruler over the poor people. 
The prince that wanteth understanding is also a great oppressor: but he that hateth covetousness shall prolong his days. 
A man that doeth violence to the blood of any person shall flee to the pit; let no man stay him. 
Whoso walketh uprightly shall be save
493,he blood round about upon the altar that is by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall flay the burnt offering, and cut it into his pieces. 
And the sons of Aaron the priest shall put fire upon the altar, and lay the wood in order upon the fire: 
And the priests, Aaron's sons, shall lay the parts, the head, and the fat, in order upon the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar: 
But his inwards and his legs shall he wash in water: and the priest shall burn a
693,, and said, Tell me, I pray thee, where the seer's house is. 
And Samuel answered Saul, and said, I am the seer: go up before me unto the high place; for ye shall eat with me to day, and to morrow I will let thee go, and will tell thee all that is in thine heart. 
And as for thine asses that were lost three days ago, set not thy mind on them; for they are found. And on whom is all the desire of Israel? Is it not on thee, and on all thy father's house? 
And Saul answered and said, Am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul and his servan
707,erpretation. 
Then Arioch brought in Daniel before the king in haste, and said thus unto him, I have found a man of the captives of Judah, that will make known unto the king the interpretation. 
The king answered and said to Daniel, whose name was Belteshazzar, Art thou able to make known unto me the dream which I have seen, and the interpretation thereof? 
Daniel answered in the presence of the king, and said, The secret which the king hath demanded cannot the wise men, the astrologers, the magicians, the soothsayers, shew unto the king; 
But there is a God in heaven that revealeth secrets, and maketh known to the king Nebuchadnezzar what shall be in the latter days. Thy dream, and the visions of 
502,vid. And David built round about from Millo and inward. 
And David went on, and grew great, and the LORD God of hosts was with him. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar trees, and carpenters, and masons: and they built David an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had established him king over Israel, and that he had exalted his kingdom for his people Israel's sake. 
And David took him more concubines and wives out of Jerusalem, after he was come from Hebron: and there 
661,r are against me. 
Wherefore then hast thou brought me forth out of the womb? Oh that I had given up the ghost, and no eye had seen me! 
I should have been as though I had not been; I should have been carried from the womb to the grave. 
Are not my days few? cease then, and let me alone, that I may take comfort a little, 
Before I go whence I shall not return, even to the land of darkness and the shadow of death; 
A land of darkness, as darkness itself; and of the shadow of death, without any order, and where the light is as darkness. 
Then answered Zophar the Naamathite, and said, 
Should not the multitude of words be answered? and should a man full of
701,ophesy unto my people Israel. 
Now therefore hear thou the word of the LORD: Thou sayest, Prophesy not against Israel, and drop not thy word against the house of Isaac. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Thy wife shall be an harlot in the city, and thy sons and thy daughters shall fall by the sword, and thy land shall be divided by line; and thou shalt die in a polluted land: and Israel shall surely go into captivity forth of his land. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD shewed unto me: and behold a basket of summer fruit. 
And he said, Amos, what seest thou? And I said, A basket of summer fruit. Then said the LORD unto me, The end is come upon my people of Israel; I will not again pass by them any more. 
A
677, cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and men gather them, and cast them into the fire, and they are burned. 
If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done unto you. 
Herein is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall ye be my disciples. 
As the Father hath loved me, so have I loved you: continue ye in my love. 
If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kept my Father's commandments, and abide in his love. 
These things have I spoken unto you, that my joy might remain in you, and that your joy might be full. 
This is my commandment, That ye love one another, as I have loved yo
542,for ever: behold, see, we beseech thee, we are all thy people. 
Thy holy cities are a wilderness, Zion is a wilderness, Jerusalem a desolation. 
Our holy and our beautiful house, where our fathers praised thee, is burned up with fire: and all our pleasant things are laid waste. 
Wilt thou refrain thyself for these things, O LORD? wilt thou hold thy peace, and afflict us very sore? 
I am sought of them that asked not for me; I am found of them that sought me not: I said, Behold me, behold me, unto a nation that was not called by my name.
627, unto Israel in the visions of the night, and said, Jacob, Jacob. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down into Egypt; for I will there make of thee a great nation: 
I will go down with thee into Egypt; and I will also surely bring thee up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes. 
And Jacob rose up from Beersheba: and the sons of Israel carried Jacob their father, and their little ones, and their wives, in the wagons which Pharaoh had sent to carry him. 
And they took their cattle, and their goods, which they had gotten in the land of Canaan, and came into E
681,that he goeth into the sanctuary, unto the inner court, to minister in the sanctuary, he shall offer his sin offering, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it shall be unto them for an inheritance: I am their inheritance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am their possession. 
They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be theirs. 
And the first of all the firstfruits of all things, and every oblation of all, of every sort of your oblations, shall be the priest's: ye shall also give unto the priest the first of your dough, that he may cause the blessing to rest in thine house. 
The priests
484,hand of Moses, every one according to his service, and according to his burden: thus were they numbered of him, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they put out of the camp every leper, and every one that hath an issue, and whosoever is defiled by the dead: 
Both male and female shall ye put out, without the camp shall ye put them; that they defile not their camps, in the midst whereof I dwell. 
And the childr
574, and having stoned Paul, drew him out of the city, supposing he had been dead. 
Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and came into the city: and the next day he departed with Barnabas to Derbe. 
And when they had preached the gospel to that city, and had taught many, they returned again to Lystra, and to Iconium, and Antioch, 
Confirming the souls of the disciples, and exhorting them to continue in the faith, and that we must through much tribulation enter into the kingdom of God. 
And when they had ordained them elders in every church, and had
679,ly Jerusalem, descending out of heaven from God, 
Having the glory of God: and her light was like unto a stone most precious, even like a jasper stone, clear as crystal; 
And had a wall great and high, and had twelve gates, and at the gates twelve angels, and names written thereon, which are the names of the twelve tribes of the children of Israel: 
On the east three gates; on the north three gates; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates. 
And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb. 
And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 

606,sk of me, I will give it thee, unto the half of my kingdom. 
And she went forth, and said unto her mother, What shall I ask? And she said, The head of John the Baptist. 
And she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked, saying, I will that thou give me by and by in a charger the head of John the Baptist. 
And the king was exceeding sorry; yet for his oath's sake, and for their sakes which sat with him, he would not reject her. 
And immediately the king sent an executioner, and commanded his head to be brought: and he went and beheaded him in the prison, 
And brought his head in a char
573, had two wives, Helah and Naarah. 
And Naarah bare him Ahuzam, and Hepher, and Temeni, and Haahashtari. These were the sons of Naarah. 
And the sons of Helah were, Zereth, and Jezoar, and Ethnan. 
And Coz begat Anub, and Zobebah, and the families of Aharhel the son of Harum. 
And Jabez was more honourable than his brethren: and his mother called his name Jabez, saying, Because I bare him with sorrow. 
And Jabez called on the God of Israel, saying, Oh that thou wouldest bless me indeed, and enlarge my coast, and that thine hand might be with me, and that thou wouldest
628, fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the forest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mourneth unto me; the whole land
605,arkened to my voice; 
Surely they shall not see the land which I sware unto their fathers, neither shall any of them that provoked me see it: 
But my servant Caleb, because he had another spirit with him, and hath followed me fully, him will I bring into the land whereinto he went; and his seed shall possess it. 
(Now the Amalekites and the Canaanites dwelt in the valley.) Tomorrow turn you, and get you into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, which murmur against me? I have heard the mu
496,f Israel, and they smote them: so Israel possessed all the land of the Amorites, the inhabitants of that country. 
And they possessed all the coasts of the Amorites, from Arnon even unto Jabbok, and from the wilderness even unto Jordan. 
So now the LORD God of Israel hath dispossessed the Amorites from before his people Israel, and shouldest thou possess it? 
Wilt not thou possess that which Chemosh thy god giveth thee to possess? So whomsoever the LORD our God shall drive out from before us
682, 
It is turned as clay to the seal; and they stand as a garment. 
And from the wicked their light is withholden, and the high arm shall be broken. 
Hast thou entered into the springs of the sea? or hast thou walked in the search of the depth? 
Have the gates of death been opened unto thee? or hast thou seen the doors of the shadow of death? 
Hast thou perceived the breadth of the earth? declare if thou knowest it all. 
Where is the way where light dwelleth? and as for darkness, where is the place thereof, 
That thou shouldest take it to the bound thereof, and that thou shouldest know the paths to the house thereof? 
Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or because t
650,of the LORD. 
Then stood Jeshua with his sons and his brethren, Kadmiel and his sons, the sons of Judah, together, to set forward the workmen in the house of God: the sons of Henadad, with their sons and their brethren the Levites. 
And when the builders laid the foundation of the temple of the LORD, they set the priests in their apparel with trumpets, and the Levites the sons of Asaph with cymbals, to praise the LORD, after the ordinance of David king of Israel. 
And they sang together by course in praising and giving thanks unto the LORD; because he is good, for his mercy endureth for ever toward Israel. And all the people shouted with a gr
648,u choosest, and causest to approach unto thee, that he may dwell in thy courts: we shall be satisfied with the goodness of thy house, even of thy holy temple. 
By terrible things in righteousness wilt thou answer us, O God of our salvation; who art the confidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Th
563,e Midianites sold him into Egypt unto Potiphar, an officer of Pharaoh's, and captain of the guard. 
And it came to pass at that time, that Judah went down from his brethren, and turned in to a certain Adullamite, whose name was Hirah. 
And Judah saw there a daughter of a certain Canaanite, whose name was Shuah; and he took her, and went in unto her. 
And she conceived, and bare a son; and he called his name Er. 
And she conceived again, and bare a son; and she called his name Onan. 
And she yet again conceived, and bare a son; and called his name Shelah: an
483,order compassed from Baalah westward unto mount Seir, and passed along unto the side of mount Jearim, which is Chesalon, on the north side, and went down to Bethshemesh, and passed on to Timnah: 
And the border went out unto the side of Ekron northward: and the border was drawn to Shicron, and passed along to mount Baalah, and went out unto Jabneel; and the goings out of the border were at the sea. 
And the west border was to the great sea, and the coast thereof. This is the coa
609,hman: 
If when he seeth the sword come upon the land, he blow the trumpet, and warn the people; 
Then whosoever heareth the sound of the trumpet, and taketh not warning; if the sword come, and take him away, his blood shall be upon his own head. 
He heard the sound of the trumpet, and took not warning; his blood shall be upon him. But he that taketh warning shall deliver his soul. 
But if the watchman see the sword come, and blow not the trumpet, and the people be not warned; if the sword come, and take any person from among them, he is taken away in his iniquity; but his blood will I require at the wa
583,t. 
All ye that are about him, bemoan him; and all ye that know his name, say, How is the strong staff broken, and the beautiful rod! 
Thou daughter that dost inhabit Dibon, come down from thy glory, and sit in thirst; for the spoiler of Moab shall come upon thee, and he shall destroy thy strong holds. 
O inhabitant of Aroer, stand by the way, and espy; ask him that fleeth, and her that escapeth, and say, What is done? 
Moab is confounded; for it is broken down: howl and cry; tell ye it in Arnon, that Moab is spoiled, 
And judgment is come upon the plain country; upon Holon, a
534,hither, and took the graven image, and the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image: and the priest stood in the entering of the gate with the six hundred men that were appointed with weapons of war. 
And these went into Micah's house, and fetched the carved image, the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image. Then said the priest unto them, What do ye? 
And they said unto him, Hold thy peace, lay thine hand upon thy mouth, and go with us, and be to us a father and a priest: is it better for thee to be a priest unto th
698,a wise man utter vain knowledge, and fill his belly with the east wind? 
Should he reason with unprofitable talk? or with speeches wherewith he can do no good? 
Yea, thou castest off fear, and restrainest prayer before God. 
For thy mouth uttereth thine iniquity, and thou choosest the tongue of the crafty. 
Thine own mouth condemneth thee, and not I: yea, thine own lips testify against thee. 
Art thou the first man that was born? or wast thou made before the hills? 
Hast thou heard the secret of God? and dost thou restrain wisdom to thyself? 
What knowest thou, that we know not? what understandest thou, which is not in us? 
With us are both the grayheaded and very aged men, much elder than
638,g the commandments of the LORD; but they did not so. 
And when the LORD raised them up judges, then the LORD was with the judge, and delivered them out of the hand of their enemies all the days of the judge: for it repented the LORD because of their groanings by reason of them that oppressed them and vexed them. 
And it came to pass, when the judge was dead, that they returned, and corrupted themselves more than their fathers, in following other gods to serve them, and to bow down unto them; they ceased not from their own doings, nor from their stubborn way. 
And the anger of the LORD was hot against Israel; and he said, Because t
534, not hearken unto me: 
Therefore will I cast you out of this land into a land that ye know not, neither ye nor your fathers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I will not shew you favour. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be said, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt; 
But, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel from the land of the north, and from all the lands whither he had driven them: and I will bring th
598,here, nor any ravenous beast shall go up thereon, it shall not be found there; but the redeemed shall walk there: 
And the ransomed of the LORD shall return, and come to Zion with songs and everlasting joy upon their heads: they shall obtain joy and gladness, and sorrow and sighing shall flee away. 
Now it came to pass in the fourteenth year of king Hezekiah, that Sennacherib king of Assyria came up against all the defenced cities of Judah, and took them. 
And the king of Assyria sent Rabshakeh from Lachish to Jerusalem unto king Hezekiah with a great army. And he stood by the conduit of the
621,r reigned in Edom: and the name of his city was Dinhabah. 
And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead. 
And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of Temani reigned in his stead. 
And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And Samlah died, and Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And Saul died, and Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And Baalhanan the son of Achbor died, and Hadar reigned in his ste
719,t your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are ye not much better than they? 
Which of you by taking thought can add one cubit unto his stature? 
And why take ye thought for raiment? Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow; they toil not, neither do they spin: 
And yet I say unto you, That even Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these. 
Wherefore, if God so clothe the grass of the field, which to day is, and to morrow is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe you, O ye of little faith? 
Therefore take no thought, saying, What shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Wherewithal shall we be clothed? 
(For after all these things do the Gentiles seek:) for your heavenly Father kno
498,ren of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land was filled with them. 
Now there arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph. 
And he said unto his people, Behold, the people of the children of Israel are more and mightier than we: 
Come on, let us deal wisely with them; lest they multiply, and it come to pass, that, when there falleth out any war, they join also unto our enemies, and fight against us, and so get them up
489,ow the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he shewed, and how he warred, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? 
And the remnant of the sodomites, which remained in the days of his father Asa, he took out of the land. 
There was then no king in Edom: a deputy was king. 
Jehoshaphat made ships of Tharshish to go to Ophir for gold: but they went not; for the ships were broken at Eziongeber. 
Then said Ahaziah the son of Ahab unto Jehosh
518,nd compassed the corner of the sea southward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter. 
And the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the border went out on the west, and went out to the well of waters of Nephtoah: 
And the border came down to the end of the mountain that lieth before the valley of the son of Hinnom, and which is in the valley of the giants
700,urst thy bonds in sunder. 
And the LORD hath given a commandment concerning thee, that no more of thy name be sown: out of the house of thy gods will I cut off the graven image and the molten image: I will make thy grave; for thou art vile. 
Behold upon the mountains the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace! O Judah, keep thy solemn feasts, perform thy vows: for the wicked shall no more pass through thee; he is utterly cut off. 
He that dasheth in pieces is come up before thy face: keep the munition, watch the way, make thy loins strong, fortify thy power mightily. 
For the LORD hath turned away the excellency of Jacob, as the excellency of Israel: for the emptiers h
683,among the grass, as willows by the water courses. 
One shall say, I am the LORD's; and another shall call himself by the name of Jacob; and another shall subscribe with his hand unto the LORD, and surname himself by the name of Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD the King of Israel, and his redeemer the LORD of hosts; I am the first, and I am the last; and beside me there is no God. 
And who, as I, shall call, and shall declare it, and set it in order for me, since I appointed the ancient people? and the things that are coming, and shall come, let them shew unto them. 
Fear ye not, neither be afraid: have not I told thee from that time, and have declared it? ye are even my witnesse
555,hom thou saidst, Give me a king and princes? 
I gave thee a king in mine anger, and took him away in my wrath. 
The iniquity of Ephraim is bound up; his sin is hid. 
The sorrows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an unwise son; for he should not stay long in the place of the breaking forth of children. 
I will ransom them from the power of the grave; I will redeem them from death: O death, I will be thy plagues; O grave, I will be thy destruction: repentance shall be hid from mine eyes. 
Though he be fruitful among his brethren, an eas
673,crifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an heave offering unto the LORD, and it shall be the priest's that sprinkleth the blood of the peace offerings. 
And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten the same day that it is offered; he shall not leave any of it until the morning. 
But if the sacrifice of his offering be a vow, or a voluntary offering, it shall be eaten the same day that he offereth his sacrifice: and on the morrow also the remainder of it shall be eaten: 
But the remainder of the flesh of the sacrifice on the third day shall be burnt with fire
581,f their holes like worms of the earth: they shall be afraid of the LORD our God, and shall fear because of thee. 
Who is a God like unto thee, that pardoneth iniquity, and passeth by the transgression of the remnant of his heritage? he retaineth not his anger for ever, because he delighteth in mercy. 
He will turn again, he will have compassion upon us; he will subdue our iniquities; and thou wilt cast all their sins into the depths of the sea. 
Thou wilt perform the truth to Jacob, and the mercy to Abraham, which thou hast sworn unto our fathers from the days of old. 
The b
518, hand, in thy glory. 
But Jesus said unto them, Ye know not what ye ask: can ye drink of the cup that I drink of? and be baptized with the baptism that I am baptized with? 
And they said unto him, We can. And Jesus said unto them, Ye shall indeed drink of the cup that I drink of; and with the baptism that I am baptized withal shall ye be baptized: 
But to sit on my right hand and on my left hand is not mine to give; but it shall be given to them for whom it is prepared. 
And when the ten heard it, they began to b
515, inherit in the land that the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it. 
One witness shall not rise up against a man for any iniquity, or for any sin, in any sin that he sinneth: at the mouth of two witnesses, or at the mouth of three witnesses, shall the matter be established. 
If a false witness rise up against any man to testify against him that which is wrong; 
Then both the men, between whom the controversy is, shall stand before the LORD, before the priests and the judges, which shall be in those days; 
An
655,e iniquity, and cleanse me from my sin. 
For I acknowledge my transgressions: and my sin is ever before me. 
Against thee, thee only, have I sinned, and done this evil in thy sight: that thou mightest be justified when thou speakest, and be clear when thou judgest. 
Behold, I was shapen in iniquity; and in sin did my mother conceive me. 
Behold, thou desirest truth in the inward parts: and in the hidden part thou shalt make me to know wisdom. 
Purge me with hyssop, and I shall be clean: wash me, and I shall be whiter than snow. 
Make me to hear joy and gladness; that the bones which thou hast broken may rejoice. 
Hide thy face from my sins, and bl
544, and she bare to Esau Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
These were dukes of the sons of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the firstborn son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz, 
Duke Korah, duke Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes that came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these were the sons of Adah. 
And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons 
588,tore the overplus unto the man to whom he sold it; that he may return unto his possession. 
But if he be not able to restore it to him, then that which is sold shall remain in the hand of him that hath bought it until the year of jubile: and in the jubile it shall go out, and he shall return unto his possession. 
And if a man sell a dwelling house in a walled city, then he may redeem it within a whole year after it is sold; within a full year may he redeem it. 
And if it be not redeemed within the space of a full year, then the house that is in the walled city shall be established 
714,and their horsemen shall come from far; they shall fly as the eagle that hasteth to eat. 
They shall come all for violence: their faces shall sup up as the east wind, and they shall gather the captivity as the sand. 
And they shall scoff at the kings, and the princes shall be a scorn unto them: they shall deride every strong hold; for they shall heap dust, and take it. 
Then shall his mind change, and he shall pass over, and offend, imputing this his power unto his god. 
Art thou not from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Holy One? we shall not die. O LORD, thou hast ordained them for judgment; and, O mighty God, thou hast established them for correction. 
Thou art of purer eyes than to behold evil, and ca
673,n the time of thine anger: the LORD shall swallow them up in his wrath, and the fire shall devour them. 
Their fruit shalt thou destroy from the earth, and their seed from among the children of men. 
For they intended evil against thee: they imagined a mischievous device, which they are not able to perform. 
Therefore shalt thou make them turn their back, when thou shalt make ready thine arrows upon thy strings against the face of them. 
Be thou exalted, LORD, in thine own strength: so will we sing and praise thy power. 
My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me? why art thou so far from helping me, and from the words of my roaring? 
O my God, I cry in the day time
627,nd I will scatter toward every wind all that are about him to help him, and all his bands; and I will draw out the sword after them. 
And they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall scatter them among the nations, and disperse them in the countries. 
But I will leave a few men of them from the sword, from the famine, and from the pestilence; that they may declare all their abominations among the heathen whither they come; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
Son of man, eat thy bread with quaking, and drink thy water with trembling and with carefulness; 
And sa
600,el now say: 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth: yet they have not prevailed against me. 
The plowers plowed upon my back: they made long their furrows. 
The LORD is righteous: he hath cut asunder the cords of the wicked. 
Let them all be confounded and turned back that hate Zion. 
Let them be as the grass upon the housetops, which withereth afore it groweth up: 
Wherewith the mower filleth not his hand; nor he that bindeth sheaves his bosom. 
Neither do they which go by say, The blessing of the LORD be upon you: we bless you in the name of the LORD. 
Out of the depths have I cri
655,s salvation. 
Declare his glory among the heathen; his marvellous works among all nations. 
For great is the LORD, and greatly to be praised: he also is to be feared above all gods. 
For all the gods of the people are idols: but the LORD made the heavens. 
Glory and honour are in his presence; strength and gladness are in his place. 
Give unto the LORD, ye kindreds of the people, give unto the LORD glory and strength. 
Give unto the LORD the glory due unto his name: bring an offering, and come before him: worship the LORD in the beauty of holiness. 
Fear before him, all the earth: the world also shall be stable, that it be not moved. 
Let the heav
561, they pressed upon him for to touch him, as many as had plagues. 
And unclean spirits, when they saw him, fell down before him, and cried, saying, Thou art the Son of God. 
And he straitly charged them that they should not make him known. 
And he goeth up into a mountain, and calleth unto him whom he would: and they came unto him. 
And he ordained twelve, that they should be with him, and that he might send them forth to preach, 
And to have power to heal sicknesses, and to cast out devils: 
And Simon he surnamed Peter; 
And James the son of Zebedee, and 
589,r fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even until fifty years old, all that enter into the host, to do the work in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
This shall be the service of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation, about the most holy things: 
And when the camp setteth forward, Aaron shall come, and his sons, and they shall take down the covering vail, and cover the ark of testimony with it: 
And shall put thereon the covering of badgers' skins, and shall spread over it a cloth wholly of blue, and shall put in the staves thereof. 
And upon the table of 
683, the suburbs thereof for our cattle. 
And the children of Israel gave unto the Levites out of their inheritance, at the commandment of the LORD, these cities and their suburbs. 
And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, 
601,me, and deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvation unto kings: who delivereth David his servant from the hurtful sword. 
Rid me, and deliver me from the hand of strange children, whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood: 
That our sons may be as plants grown up in their youth; that our daughters may be 
485, more in his name. But his word was in mine heart as a burning fire shut up in my bones, and I was weary with forbearing, and I could not stay. 
For I heard the defaming of many, fear on every side. Report, say they, and we will report it. All my familiars watched for my halting, saying, Peradventure he will be enticed, and we shall prevail against him, and we shall take our revenge on him. 
But the LORD is with me as a mighty terrible one: therefore my persecutors shall stumble, 
676,all commit whoredom, and shall not increase: because they have left off to take heed to the LORD. 
Whoredom and wine and new wine take away the heart. 
My people ask counsel at their stocks, and their staff declareth unto them: for the spirit of whoredoms hath caused them to err, and they have gone a whoring from under their God. 
They sacrifice upon the tops of the mountains, and burn incense upon the hills, under oaks and poplars and elms, because the shadow thereof is good: therefore your daughters shall commit whoredom, and your spouses shall commit adultery. 
I will not punish your daughters when they commit whoredom, nor your spouses when they commit adultery: f
488,rt, and shall howl for vexation of spirit. 
And ye shall leave your name for a curse unto my chosen: for the Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 
That he who blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and because they are hid from mine eyes. 
For, behold, I create new heavens and a new earth: and the former shall not be
652, called the name of the place where God spake with him, Bethel. 
And they journeyed from Bethel; and there was but a little way to come to Ephrath: and Rachel travailed, and she had hard labour. 
And it came to pass, when she was in hard labour, that the midwife said unto her, Fear not; thou shalt have this son also. 
And it came to pass, as her soul was in departing, (for she died) that she called his name Benoni: but his father called him Benjamin. 
And Rachel died, and was buried in the way to Ephrath, which is Bethlehem. 
And Jacob set a pillar upon her grave: that is the pillar of Rachel's grave unto this day. 
And Israel journeyed, and sp
535, if the dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for all the people that follow me. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him that girdeth on his harness boast himself as he that putteth it off. 
And it came to pass, when Ben-hadad heard this message, as he was drinking, he and the kings in the pavilions, that he said unto his servants, Set yourselves in array. And they set themselves in array against the city. 
And, behold, there came a prophet unto Ahab king of Israel, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast 
637,rones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to have you, that he may sift you as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto them, When I sent you without purse, and scrip, and shoes, lacked ye any thing? And they said, Nothing. 
Then said he unto them, But now, he that hat
642,m came the chief ruler; but the birthright was Joseph's:) 
The sons, I say, of Reuben the firstborn of Israel were, Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi. 
The sons of Joel; Shemaiah his son, Gog his son, Shimei his son, 
Micah his son, Reaia his son, Baal his son, 
Beerah his son, whom Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria carried away captive: he was prince of the Reubenites. 
And his brethren by their families, when the genealogy of their generations was reckoned, were the chief, Jeiel, and Zechariah, 
And Bela the son of Azaz, the son of Shema, the son of Joel, who dwelt in Aroer, even unto Nebo and Baalmeon: 
And eastward he inhabited u
523,s kindness, because ye have done this thing. 
Therefore now let your hands be strengthened, and be ye valiant: for your master Saul is dead, and also the house of Judah have anointed me king over them. 
But Abner the son of Ner, captain of Saul's host, took Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and brought him over to Mahanaim; 
And made him king over Gilead, and over the Ashurites, and over Jezreel, and over Ephraim, and over Benjamin, and over all Israel. 
Ishbosheth Saul's son was forty years old when he began to reign over 
494,Judah, which he saw concerning Samaria and Jerusalem. 
Hear, all ye people; hearken, O earth, and all that therein is: and let the Lord GOD be witness against you, the LORD from his holy temple. 
For, behold, the LORD cometh forth out of his place, and will come down, and tread upon the high places of the earth. 
And the mountains shall be molten under him, and the valleys shall be cleft, as wax before the fire, and as the waters that are poured down a steep place. 
For the transgression o
677,livered, but the land shall be desolate. 
Or if I bring a sword upon that land, and say, Sword, go through the land; so that I cut off man and beast from it: 
Though these three men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither sons nor daughters, but they only shall be delivered themselves. 
Or if I send a pestilence into that land, and pour out my fury upon it in blood, to cut off from it man and beast: 
Though Noah, Daniel, and Job were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither son nor daughter; they shall but deliver their own souls by their righteousness. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; How much more when I send my four
572,rse; and all the cities thereof shall be perpetual wastes. 
I have heard a rumour from the LORD, and an ambassador is sent unto the heathen, saying, Gather ye together, and come against her, and rise up to the battle. 
For, lo, I will make thee small among the heathen, and despised among men. 
Thy terribleness hath deceived thee, and the pride of thine heart, O thou that dwellest in the clefts of the rock, that holdest the height of the hill: though thou shouldest make thy nest as high as the eagle, I will bring thee down from thence, saith the LORD. 
Also Edom shal
517,ird day. 
And the king answered the people roughly, and forsook the old men's counsel that they gave him; 
And spake to them after the counsel of the young men, saying, My father made your yoke heavy, and I will add to your yoke: my father also chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions. 
Wherefore the king hearkened not unto the people; for the cause was from the LORD, that he might perform his saying, which the LORD spake by Ahijah the Shilonite unto Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
So when al
511,wherewith he can do no good? 
Yea, thou castest off fear, and restrainest prayer before God. 
For thy mouth uttereth thine iniquity, and thou choosest the tongue of the crafty. 
Thine own mouth condemneth thee, and not I: yea, thine own lips testify against thee. 
Art thou the first man that was born? or wast thou made before the hills? 
Hast thou heard the secret of God? and dost thou restrain wisdom to thyself? 
What knowest thou, that we know not? what understandest thou, which is not in us? 
With us ar
568,lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on th
668,n Cain, lest any finding him should kill him. 
And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden. 
And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his son, Enoch. 
And unto Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael begat Methusael: and Methusael begat Lamech. 
And Lamech took unto him two wives: the name of the one was Adah, and the name of the other Zillah. 
And Adah bare Jabal: he was the father of such as dwell in tents, and of such as have cattle. 
And his brother's name was Jubal: he was the father of all s
500,righteousness. 
If we say that we have not sinned, we make him a liar, and his word is not in us. 
My little children, these things write I unto you, that ye sin not. And if any man sin, we have an advocate with the Father, Jesus Christ the righteous: 
And he is the propitiation for our sins: and not for our's only, but also for the sins of the whole world. 
And hereby we do know that we know him, if we keep his commandments. 
He that saith, I know him, and keepeth not his commandments, is a lia
656,alt well with me: forasmuch as when the LORD had delivered me into thine hand, thou killedst me not. 
For if a man find his enemy, will he let him go well away? wherefore the LORD reward thee good for that thou hast done unto me this day. 
And now, behold, I know well that thou shalt surely be king, and that the kingdom of Israel shall be established in thine hand. 
Swear now therefore unto me by the LORD, that thou wilt not cut off my seed after me, and that thou wilt not destroy my name out of my father's house. 
And David sware unto Saul. And Saul went home; but David and his men gat them up unto the hold. 
And Samuel died; and all the Israelite
702,d your peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Wherefore criest thou unto me? speak unto the children of Israel, that they go forward: 
But lift thou up thy rod, and stretch out thine hand over the sea, and divide it: and the children of Israel shall go on dry ground through the midst of the sea. 
And I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they shall follow them: and I will get me honour upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed and went be
671,es. 
And he smote Moab, and measured them with a line, casting them down to the ground; even with two lines measured he to put to death, and with one full line to keep alive. And so the Moabites became David's servants, and brought gifts. 
David smote also Hadadezer, the son of Rehob, king of Zobah, as he went to recover his border at the river Euphrates. 
And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven hundred horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen: and David houghed all the chariot horses, but reserved of them for an hundred chariots. 
And when the Syrians of Damascus came to succour Hadadezer king of Zobah, David slew of the Syrians two and twenty thousa
592,g? for there came one of the people in to destroy the king thy lord. 
This thing is not good that thou hast done. As the LORD liveth, ye are worthy to die, because ye have not kept your master, the LORD's anointed. And now see where the king's spear is, and the cruse of water that was at his bolster. 
And Saul knew David's voice, and said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And David said, It is my voice, my lord, O king. 
And he said, Wherefore doth my lord thus pursue after his servant? for what have I done? or what evil is in mine hand? 
Now therefore, I pray thee, let my lord the kin
613,or, 
Which was the son of Saruch, which was the son of Ragau, which was the son of Phalec, which was the son of Heber, which was the son of Sala, 
Which was the son of Cainan, which was the son of Arphaxad, which was the son of Sem, which was the son of Noe, which was the son of Lamech, 
Which was the son of Mathusala, which was the son of Enoch, which was the son of Jared, which was the son of Maleleel, which was the son of Cainan, 
Which was the son of Enos, which was the son of Seth, which was the son of Adam, which was the son of God. 
And Jesus being full of the Holy Ghost returned from Jordan, and wa
633, it from thee: for it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish, and not that thy whole body should be cast into hell. 
It hath been said, Whosoever shall put away his wife, let him give her a writing of divorcement: 
But I say unto you, That whosoever shall put away his wife, saving for the cause of fornication, causeth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry her that is divorced committeth adultery. 
Again, ye have heard that it hath been said by them of old time, Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto the Lord thine oaths: 
But I say unto you, Swear not at all; neither by heave
643,you, and bring you again unto the land of your fathers. 
Moreover I have given to thee one portion above thy brethren, which I took out of the hand of the Amorite with my sword and with my bow. 
And Jacob called unto his sons, and said, Gather yourselves together, that I may tell you that which shall befall you in the last days. 
Gather yourselves together, and hear, ye sons of Jacob; and hearken unto Israel your father. 
Reuben, thou art my firstborn, my might, and the beginning of my strength, the excellency of dignity, and the excellency of power: 
Unstable as water, thou shalt not excel; because thou wentest up to thy father's bed;
649,which thou hast chosen, a great people, that cannot be numbered nor counted for multitude. 
Give therefore thy servant an understanding heart to judge thy people, that I may discern between good and bad: for who is able to judge this thy so great a people? 
And the speech pleased the LORD, that Solomon had asked this thing. 
And God said unto him, Because thou hast asked this thing, and hast not asked for thyself long life; neither hast asked riches for thyself, nor hast asked the life of thine enemies; but hast asked for thyself understanding to discern judgment; 
Behold, I have done according to thy words: lo, I have given thee a wise and 
484,ing of Israel into the city, and said unto him, Thus saith Benhadad, 
Thy silver and thy gold is mine; thy wives also and thy children, even the goodliest, are mine. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, My lord, O king, according to thy saying, I am thine, and all that I have. 
And the messengers came again, and said, Thus speaketh Benhadad, saying, Although I have sent unto thee, saying, Thou shalt deliver me thy silver, and thy gold, and thy wives, and thy children; 
Yet 
536,e people departed. 
And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people? 
And they spake unto him, saying, If thou be kind to this people, and please them, and speak good words to them, they will be thy servants for ever. 
But he forsook the counsel which the old men gave him, and took counsel with the young men that were brought up with him, that stood before him. 
And he said unto them, What advice give ye tha
610,prophets declare good unto the king with one mouth: let thy word, I pray thee, be like the word of one of them, and speak that which is good. 
And Micaiah said, As the LORD liveth, what the LORD saith unto me, that will I speak. 
So he came to the king. And the king said unto him, Micaiah, shall we go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall we forbear? And he answered him, Go, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the king said unto him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou tell me nothing but that which is true in the name of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw a
621,ion, shall go out in the year of jubile: for the houses of the cities of the Levites are their possession among the children of Israel. 
But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold; for it is their perpetual possession. 
And if thy brother be waxen poor, and fallen in decay with thee; then thou shalt relieve him: yea, though he be a stranger, or a sojourner; that he may live with thee. 
Take thou no usury of him, or increase: but fear thy God; that thy brother may live with thee. 
Thou shalt not give him thy money upon usury, nor lend him thy victuals for increase. 
I am the LORD your God, which b
577,be burnt with fire, he and all that he hath: because he hath transgressed the covenant of the LORD, and because he hath wrought folly in Israel. 
So Joshua rose up early in the morning, and brought Israel by their tribes; and the tribe of Judah was taken: 
And he brought the family of Judah; and he took the family of the Zarhites: and he brought the family of the Zarhites man by man; and Zabdi was taken: 
And he brought his household man by man; and Achan, the son of Carmi, the son of Zabdi, the son of Zerah, of the tribe of Judah, was taken. 
And Joshua said unto Achan,
634,ht hand nor to the left, until we have passed thy borders. 
And Edom said unto him, Thou shalt not pass by me, lest I come out against thee with the sword. 
And the children of Israel said unto him, We will go by the high way: and if I and my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand. 
Thus Edom refused to give Israel passage through his border: wherefore Israel turned away from him. 
And the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, jou
662, when Amnon's heart is merry with wine, and when I say unto you, Smite Amnon; then kill him, fear not: have not I commanded you? be courageous, and be valiant. 
And the servants of Absalom did unto Amnon as Absalom had commanded. Then all the king's sons arose, and every man gat him up upon his mule, and fled. 
And it came to pass, while they were in the way, that tidings came to David, saying, Absalom hath slain all the king's sons, and there is not one of them left. 
Then the king arose, and tare his garments, and lay on the earth; and all his servants stood by with their clothes rent. 
And Jonadab, the son of Shimeah David's brother, answered and said
703,d God, 
And fell down on his face at his feet, giving him thanks: and he was a Samaritan. 
And Jesus answering said, Were there not ten cleansed? but where are the nine? 
There are not found that returned to give glory to God, save this stranger. 
And he said unto him, Arise, go thy way: thy faith hath made thee whole. 
And when he was demanded of the Pharisees, when the kingdom of God should come, he answered them and said, The kingdom of God cometh not with observation: 
Neither shall they say, Lo here! or, lo there! for, behold, the kingdom of God is within you. 
And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye shall desire to see one of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall no
487,d I will beat down his foes before his face, and plague them that hate him. 
But my faithfulness and my mercy shall be with him: and in my name shall his horn be exalted. 
I will set his hand also in the sea, and his right hand in the rivers. 
He shall cry unto me, Thou art my father, my God, and the rock of my salvation. 
Also I will make him my firstborn, higher than the kings of the earth. 
My mercy will I keep for him for evermore, and my covenant shall stand fast with him. 
His
654,nd faith: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Ye blind guides, which strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye make clean the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within they are full of extortion and excess. 
Thou blind Pharisee, cleanse first that which is within the cup and platter, that the outside of them may be clean also. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are like unto whited sepulchres, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are within full of dead men's bones, and of all uncleanness. 
Even so ye also outwardly appear righte
710, bring again the captivity of Moab in the latter days, saith the LORD. Thus far is the judgment of Moab. 
Concerning the Ammonites, thus saith the LORD; Hath Israel no sons? hath he no heir? why then doth their king inherit Gad, and his people dwell in his cities? 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will cause an alarm of war to be heard in Rabbah of the Ammonites; and it shall be a desolate heap, and her daughters shall be burned with fire: then shall Israel be heir unto them that were his heirs, saith the LORD. 
Howl, O Heshbon, for Ai is spoiled: cry, ye daughters of Rabbah, gird you with sackcloth; lament, and run to and fro by the hedges; for their king shall go into captivi
669,fering upon the side of the altar; and the rest of the blood shall be wrung out at the bottom of the altar: it is a sin offering. 
And he shall offer the second for a burnt offering, according to the manner: and the priest shall make an atonement for him for his sin which he hath sinned, and it shall be forgiven him. 
But if he be not able to bring two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, then he that sinned shall bring for his offering the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a sin offering; he shall put no oil upon it, neither shall he put any frankincense thereon: for it is a sin offering. 
Then shall he bring it to the priest, and the priest shall take hi
538, her not go: keep her; for she is thy life. 
Enter not into the path of the wicked, and go not in the way of evil men. 
Avoid it, pass not by it, turn from it, and pass away. 
For they sleep not, except they have done mischief; and their sleep is taken away, unless they cause some to fall. 
For they eat the bread of wickedness, and drink the wine of violence. 
But the path of the just is as the shining light, that shineth more and more unto the perfect day. 
The way of the wicked is as darkness: they know not at what they stumble. 

658,r prayers I shall be given unto you. 
There salute thee Epaphras, my fellowprisoner in Christ Jesus; 
Marcus, Aristarchus, Demas, Lucas, my fellowlabourers. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen. 
God, who at sundry times and in divers manners spake in time past unto the fathers by the prophets, 
Hath in these last days spoken unto us by his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom also he made the worlds; 
Who being the brightness of his glory, and the express image of his person, and upholding all things by the word of his power, when he had by himself purged our sins, sat down on the right hand of the Majesty
522,I may impart unto you some spiritual gift, to the end ye may be established; 
That is, that I may be comforted together with you by the mutual faith both of you and me. 
Now I would not have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have some fruit among you also, even as among other Gentiles. 
I am debtor both to the Greeks, and to the Barbarians; both to the wise, and to the unwise. 
So, as much as in me is, I am ready to preach the gospel to you that 
510,y unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he told him not that he fled. 
So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the river, and set his face toward the mount Gilead. 
And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled. 
And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days' journey; and they overtook him in the mount Gilead. 
And God came to Laban the Syrian in a dream by night, and said unto him, Take heed that thou speak not to Jacob either good or bad. 
Then
584,id thy face from us, and hast consumed us, because of our iniquities. 
But now, O LORD, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou our potter; and we all are the work of thy hand. 
Be not wroth very sore, O LORD, neither remember iniquity for ever: behold, see, we beseech thee, we are all thy people. 
Thy holy cities are a wilderness, Zion is a wilderness, Jerusalem a desolation. 
Our holy and our beautiful house, where our fathers praised thee, is burned up with fire: and all our pleasant things are laid waste. 
Wilt thou refrain thyself for these things, O LORD? wilt thou
494,, I may make the gospel of Christ without charge, that I abuse not my power in the gospel. 
For though I be free from all men, yet have I made myself servant unto all, that I might gain the more. 
And unto the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that
645,aw, saying, 
The LORD our God spake unto us in Horeb, saying, Ye have dwelt long enough in this mount: 
Turn you, and take your journey, and go to the mount of the Amorites, and unto all the places nigh thereunto, in the plain, in the hills, and in the vale, and in the south, and by the sea side, to the land of the Canaanites, and unto Lebanon, unto the great river, the river Euphrates. 
Behold, I have set the land before you: go in and possess the land which the LORD sware unto your fathers, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, to give unto them and to their seed after them. 
And I spake unto you at that time, saying, I am not able to bear you my
506,th a knop and a flower in one branch; and three bowls made like almonds in the other branch, with a knop and a flower: so in the six branches that come out of the candlestick. 
And in the candlesticks shall be four bowls made like unto almonds, with their knops and their flowers. 
And there shall be a knop under two branches of the same, and a knop under two branches of the same, and a knop under two branches of the same, according to the six branches that proceed out of the candlestick. 
Their knops 
608,e countries where ye have been scattered, and I will give you the land of Israel. 
And they shall come thither, and they shall take away all the detestable things thereof and all the abominations thereof from thence. 
And I will give them one heart, and I will put a new spirit within you; and I will take the stony heart out of their flesh, and will give them an heart of flesh: 
That they may walk in my statutes, and keep mine ordinances, and do them: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God. 
But as for them whose heart walketh after the heart of their detestable things and their abominati
659,ey shall not be shut day nor night; that men may bring unto thee the forces of the Gentiles, and that their kings may be brought. 
For the nation and kingdom that will not serve thee shall perish; yea, those nations shall be utterly wasted. 
The glory of Lebanon shall come unto thee, the fir tree, the pine tree, and the box together, to beautify the place of my sanctuary; and I will make the place of my feet glorious. 
The sons also of them that afflicted thee shall come bending unto thee; and all they that despised thee shall bow themselves down at the soles of thy feet; and they shall call thee; The city of the LORD, The Zion of the Holy One of Isra
579,ch said unto Isaac, Go from us; for thou art much mightier than we. 
And Isaac departed thence, and pitched his tent in the valley of Gerar, and dwelt there. 
And Isaac digged again the wells of water, which they had digged in the days of Abraham his father; for the Philistines had stopped them after the death of Abraham: and he called their names after the names by which his father had called them. 
And Isaac's servants digged in the valley, and found there a well of springing water. 
And the herdmen of Gerar did strive with Isaac's herdmen, saying, The water is ours: and
539,, and for four which it cannot bear: 
For a servant when he reigneth; and a fool when he is filled with meat; 
For an odious woman when she is married; and an handmaid that is heir to her mistress. 
There be four things which are little upon the earth, but they are exceeding wise: 
The ants are a people not strong, yet they prepare their meat in the summer; 
The conies are but a feeble folk, yet make they their houses in the rocks; 
The locusts have no king, yet go they forth all of them by bands; 
The spider taketh hold with her han
605,he law as transgressors. 
For whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all. 
For he that said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou commit no adultery, yet if thou kill, thou art become a transgressor of the law. 
So speak ye, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law of liberty. 
For he shall have judgment without mercy, that hath shewed no mercy; and mercy rejoiceth against judgment. 
What doth it profit, my brethren, though a man say he hath faith, and have not works? can faith save him? 
If a brother or sister be naked, and
656,power, and riches, and wisdom, and strength, and honour, and glory, and blessing. 
And every creature which is in heaven, and on the earth, and under the earth, and such as are in the sea, and all that are in them, heard I saying, Blessing, and honour, and glory, and power, be unto him that sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb for ever and ever. 
And the four beasts said, Amen. And the four and twenty elders fell down and worshipped him that liveth for ever and ever. 
And I saw when the Lamb opened one of the seals, and I heard, as it were the noise of thunder, one of the four beasts saying, Come and see. 
And I saw, and behold a white horse:
630,r of barley: 
And I said unto her, Thou shalt abide for me many days; thou shalt not play the harlot, and thou shalt not be for another man: so will I also be for thee. 
For the children of Israel shall abide many days without a king, and without a prince, and without a sacrifice, and without an image, and without an ephod, and without teraphim: 
Afterward shall the children of Israel return, and seek the LORD their God, and David their king; and shall fear the LORD and his goodness in the latter days. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye children of Israel: for the LORD hath a controversy with the inhabitants of the land, becau
590,ed thyself; but in me is thine help. 
I will be thy king: where is any other that may save thee in all thy cities? and thy judges of whom thou saidst, Give me a king and princes? 
I gave thee a king in mine anger, and took him away in my wrath. 
The iniquity of Ephraim is bound up; his sin is hid. 
The sorrows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an unwise son; for he should not stay long in the place of the breaking forth of children. 
I will ransom them from the power of the grave; I will redeem them from death: O death, I will be thy plagues; O grave, I will be thy des
578,ed by you according to our rule abundantly, 
To preach the gospel in the regions beyond you, and not to boast in another man's line of things made ready to our hand. 
But he that glorieth, let him glory in the Lord. 
For not he that commendeth himself is approved, but whom the Lord commendeth. 
Would to God ye could bear with me a little in my folly: and indeed bear with me. 
For I am jealous over you with godly jealousy: for I have espoused you to one husband, that I may present you as a chaste virgin to Christ. 
But I fear, lest by any means, as the serpent beguiled Eve
541,at the spirits are subject unto you; but rather rejoice, because your names are written in heaven. 
In that hour Jesus rejoiced in spirit, and said, I thank thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, that thou hast hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes: even so, Father; for so it seemed good in thy sight. 
All things are delivered to me of my Father: and no man knoweth who the Son is, but the Father; and who the Father is, but the Son, and he to whom the Son will reveal him. 
And he turned him unt
505,thers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearkened unto me. 
Because the sons of Jonadab the son of Rechab have performed the commandment of their father, which he commanded them; but this people hath not hearkened unto me: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon Judah and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem all the evil that I have pronounced against them: because I have spoken unto them, but they have not heard; and I have called unto them, b
539,od or bad: as the priest shall estimate it, so shall it stand. 
And if he that sanctified it will redeem his house, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be his. 
And if a man shall sanctify unto the LORD some part of a field of his possession, then thy estimation shall be according to the seed thereof: an homer of barley seed shall be valued at fifty shekels of silver. 
If he sanctify his field from the year of jubile, according to thy estimation it shall stand. 
But if he sanctify his
643,nd: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by no greater, he sware by himself, 
Saying, Surely blessing I will bless thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee. 
And so, after he had patiently endured, he obtained the promise. 
For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation is to them an end of all strife. 
Wherein God, willing more abundantly to shew unto the heirs of promise the immutability of his counsel, confirmed it by an oath: 
That by two immutable things, in which it was impossible for 
716,eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in thy gates, that he may eat it; or thou mayest sell it unto an alien: for thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
Thou shalt truly tithe all the increase of thy seed, that the field bringeth forth year by year. 
And thou shalt eat before the LORD thy God, in the place which he shall choose to place his name there, the tithe of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the firstlings of thy herds and of thy flocks; that thou mayest learn to fear the LORD thy God always. 
And if the way be too long for thee, so that thou art not able to carry it; 
694, and the thing that is hid bringeth he forth to light. 
But where shall wisdom be found? and where is the place of understanding? 
Man knoweth not the price thereof; neither is it found in the land of the living. 
The depth saith, It is not in me: and the sea saith, It is not with me. 
It cannot be gotten for gold, neither shall silver be weighed for the price thereof. 
It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir, with the precious onyx, or the sapphire. 
The gold and the crystal cannot equal it: and the exchange of it shall not be for jewels of fine gold. 
No mention shall be made of coral, or of pearls: for the price of wisdom is above rubies. 
The topaz of Ethiopia shall not equal it
589,said unto them, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left house, or parents, or brethren, or wife, or children, for the kingdom of God's sake, 
Who shall not receive manifold more in this present time, and in the world to come life everlasting. 
Then he took unto him the twelve, and said unto them, Behold, we go up to Jerusalem, and all things that are written by the prophets concerning the Son of man shall be accomplished. 
For he shall be delivered unto the Gentiles, and shall be mocked, and spitefully entreated, and spitted on: 
And they shall scourge him, and put him
554,re made broad plates for a covering of the altar: 
To be a memorial unto the children of Israel, that no stranger, which is not of the seed of Aaron, come near to offer incense before the LORD; that he be not as Korah, and as his company: as the LORD said to him by the hand of Moses. 
But on the morrow all the congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron, saying, Ye have killed the people of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when the congregation was gathered against Moses and against Aaron, that they looked toward 
636, offering unto the LORD. 
The rich shall not give more, and the poor shall not give less than half a shekel, when they give an offering unto the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And thou shalt take the atonement money of the children of Israel, and shalt appoint it for the service of the tabernacle of the congregation; that it may be a memorial unto the children of Israel before the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thou shalt also make a laver of brass, and his foot also of brass, to wash withal: and thou shalt put it between the tabernacle of the congregation and the
561,e as a fruitful vine by the sides of thine house: thy children like olive plants round about thy table. 
Behold, that thus shall the man be blessed that feareth the LORD. 
The LORD shall bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the good of Jerusalem all the days of thy life. 
Yea, thou shalt see thy children's children, and peace upon Israel. 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth, may Israel now say: 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth: yet they have not prevailed against me. 
The plowers plowed upon my back: they made long the
503, give her to another man: abide with me. 
And Jacob served seven years for Rachel; and they seemed unto him but a few days, for the love he had to her. 
And Jacob said unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are fulfilled, that I may go in unto her. 
And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a feast. 
And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter, and brought her to him; and he went in unto her. 
And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an
560, not; but slay both man and woman, infant and suckling, ox and sheep, camel and ass. 
And Saul gathered the people together, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah. 
And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy you with them: for ye shewed kindness to all the children of Israel, when they came up out of Egypt. So the Kenites departed from among the Amalekites. 
And Saul smote the Amalekit
545,tants of Jerusalem shall be my strength in the LORD of hosts their God. 
In that day will I make the governors of Judah like an hearth of fire among the wood, and like a torch of fire in a sheaf; and they shall devour all the people round about, on the right hand and on the left: and Jerusalem shall be inhabited again in her own place, even in Jerusalem. 
The LORD also shall save the tents of Judah first, that the glory of the house of David and the glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem do not magnify themselves against Judah. 
In that day
548,sin according to the sin of the people; then let him bring for his sin, which he hath sinned, a young bullock without blemish unto the LORD for a sin offering. 
And he shall bring the bullock unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD; and shall lay his hand upon the bullock's head, and kill the bullock before the LORD. 
And the priest that is anointed shall take of the bullock's blood, and bring it to the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall dip his finger in the blood, and sprinkle of the blood seve
550,when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the city was moved about them, and they said, Is this Naomi? 
And she said unto them, Call me not Naomi, call me Mara: for the Almighty hath dealt very bitterly with me. 
I went out full and the LORD hath brought me home again empty: why then call ye me Naomi, seeing the LORD hath testified against me, and the Almighty hath afflicted me? 
So Naomi returned, and Ruth the Moabitess, her daughter in law, with her, which returned out of the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of ba
574,l things; 
Therefore shalt thou serve thine enemies which the LORD shall send against thee, in hunger, and in thirst, and in nakedness, and in want of all things: and he shall put a yoke of iron upon thy neck, until he have destroyed thee. 
The LORD shall bring a nation against thee from far, from the end of the earth, as swift as the eagle flieth; a nation whose tongue thou shalt not understand; 
A nation of fierce countenance, which shall not regard the person of the old, nor shew favour to the young: 
And he shall eat the fruit of thy cattle, and the fruit of thy l
531,sarea, and gone up, and saluted the church, he went down to Antioch. 
And after he had spent some time there, he departed, and went over all the country of Galatia and Phrygia in order, strengthening all the disciples. 
And a certain Jew named Apollos, born at Alexandria, an eloquent man, and mighty in the scriptures, came to Ephesus. 
This man was instructed in the way of the Lord; and being fervent in the spirit, he spake and taught diligently the things of the Lord, knowing only the baptism of John. 
And he began to speak 
688,sed come and thrust me through, and abuse me. But his armourbearer would not; for he was sore afraid. Therefore Saul took a sword, and fell upon it. 
And when his armourbearer saw that Saul was dead, he fell likewise upon his sword, and died with him. 
So Saul died, and his three sons, and his armourbearer, and all his men, that same day together. 
And when the men of Israel that were on the other side of the valley, and they that were on the other side Jordan, saw that the men of Israel fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to strip t
715,ck again, saying, All that was committed to thy servants, they do it. 
And they have gathered together the money that was found in the house of the LORD, and have delivered it into the hand of the overseers, and to the hand of the workmen. 
Then Shaphan the scribe told the king, saying, Hilkiah the priest hath given me a book. And Shaphan read it before the king. 
And it came to pass, when the king had heard the words of the law, that he rent his clothes. 
And the king commanded Hilkiah, and Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Abdon the son of Micah, and Shaphan the scribe, and Asaiah a servant of the king's, saying, 
Go, enquire of the LORD for me, and for them that are left in Israel and in Judah, concerning 
648, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other hand held a weapon. 
For the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and so builded. And he that sounded the trumpet was by me. 
And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large, and we are separated upon the wall, one far from another. 
In what place therefore ye hear the sound of the trumpet, resort ye thither unto us: our God shall fight for us
570,hould build him an house, save only to burn sacrifice before him? 
Send me now therefore a man cunning to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, and in iron, and in purple, and crimson, and blue, and that can skill to grave with the cunning men that are with me in Judah and in Jerusalem, whom David my father did provide. 
Send me also cedar trees, fir trees, and algum trees, out of Lebanon: for I know that thy servants can skill to cut timber in Lebanon; and, behold, my servants shall be with thy servants, 
Even to prepare me timber in abundance: for the house
717, of thy fathers hath promised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. 
And these words, which I command thee this day, shall be in thine heart: 
And thou shalt teach them diligently unto thy children, and shalt talk of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt bind them for a sign upon thine hand, and they shall be as frontlets between thine eyes. 
And thou shalt write them upon the posts of thy house, and on thy gates. 
And it shall be, when the LO
708,t, and hast found them liars: 
And hast borne, and hast patience, and for my name's sake hast laboured, and hast not fainted. 
Nevertheless I have somewhat against thee, because thou hast left thy first love. 
Remember therefore from whence thou art fallen, and repent, and do the first works; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will remove thy candlestick out of his place, except thou repent. 
But this thou hast, that thou hatest the deeds of the Nicolaitanes, which I also hate. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the tree of life, which is in the midst of the paradise of God. 
And unto the angel of the churc
712,e put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD God before David my father, and because thou hast been afflicted in all wherein my father was afflicted. 
So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest unto the LORD; that he might fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning the house of Eli in Shiloh. 
Then tidings came to Joab: for Joab had turned after Adonijah, though he turned not after Absalom. And Joab fled unto the tabernacle of the LORD, and caught hold on the horns of the altar. 
And it was told king Solomon that Joab was fled unto the tabernacle of the LORD; and, behold, he is by the altar. Then Solomon sent Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, saying, Go, fall upon him. 
And 
581,e was numbered with the transgressors. 
And they that passed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and saying, Ah, thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, 
Save thyself, and come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking said among themselves with the scribes, He saved others; himself he cannot save. 
Let Christ the King of Israel descend now from the cross, that we may see and believe. And they that were crucified with him reviled him. 
And when the sixth hour was come, there was darkness over the whole land until the ninth hour.
598,ers of the flood were upon the earth. 
In the six hundredth year of Noah's life, in the second month, the seventeenth day of the month, the same day were all the fountains of the great deep broken up, and the windows of heaven were opened. 
And the rain was upon the earth forty days and forty nights. 
In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three wives of his sons with them, into the ark; 
They, and every beast after his kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after h
503,t shall be inhabited, as in the days of old, saith the LORD. 
But fear not thou, O my servant Jacob, and be not dismayed, O Israel: for, behold, I will save thee from afar off, and thy seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and be in rest and at ease, and none shall make him afraid. 
Fear thou not, O Jacob my servant, saith the LORD: for I am with thee; for I will make a full end of all the nations whither I have driven thee: but I will not make a full end of thee, but corre
549, to Sihon and to Og, kings of the Amorites, and unto the land of them, whom he destroyed. 
And the LORD shall give them up before your face, that ye may do unto them according unto all the commandments which I have commanded you. 
Be strong and of a good courage, fear not, nor be afraid of them: for the LORD thy God, he it is that doth go with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee. 
And Moses called unto Joshua, and said unto him in the sight of all Israel, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou must go with this people unto the lan
541,htly according to the truth of the gospel, I said unto Peter before them all, If thou, being a Jew, livest after the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews, why compellest thou the Gentiles to live as do the Jews? 
We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles, 
Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law, but by the faith of Jesus Christ, even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for by the works of the law shall no flesh 
488,ng you seemeth to be wise in this world, let him become a fool, that he may be wise. 
For the wisdom of this world is foolishness with God. For it is written, He taketh the wise in their own craftiness. 
And again, The Lord knoweth the thoughts of the wise, that they are vain. 
Therefore let no man glory in men. For all things are your's; 
Whether Paul, or Apollos, or Cephas, or the world, or life, or death, or things present, or things to come; all are your's; 
And ye are Christ's; 
528,nd Anah, and Dishon, and Ezar, and Dishan. 
And the sons of Lotan; Hori, and Homam: and Timna was Lotan's sister. 
The sons of Shobal; Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Shephi, and Onam. and the sons of Zibeon; Aiah, and Anah. 
The sons of Anah; Dishon. And the sons of Dishon; Amram, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran. 
The sons of Ezer; Bilhan, and Zavan, and Jakan. The sons of Dishan; Uz, and Aran. 
Now these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom before any king reigned over the children of Israel; Bela the son of 
600, forsake you, and the city that I gave you and your fathers, and cast you out of my presence: 
And I will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten. 
The LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, and the princes of Judah, with the carpenters and smiths, from Jerusalem, and had brought them to Babylon. 
One basket had very good figs, even like the figs that are first ripe: and the other ba
687,iah, saying, Pray now unto the LORD our God for us. 
Now Jeremiah came in and went out among the people: for they had not put him into prison. 
Then Pharaoh's army was come forth out of Egypt: and when the Chaldeans that besieged Jerusalem heard tidings of them, they departed from Jerusalem. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto the prophet Jeremiah saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say to the king of Judah, that sent you unto me to enquire of me; Behold, Pharaoh's army, which is come forth to help you, shall return to Egypt into their own land. 
And the Chaldeans shall come again, and fight against this city, and take it, and burn it with fire. 
Thus
561,aith the LORD. 
They have belied the LORD, and said, It is not he; neither shall evil come upon us; neither shall we see sword nor famine: 
And the prophets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it be done unto them. 
Wherefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, Because ye speak this word, behold, I will make my words in thy mouth fire, and this people wood, and it shall devour them. 
Lo, I will bring a nation upon you from far, O house of Israel, saith the LORD: it is a mighty nation, it is an ancient nation, a nation whose language t
682, meeteth him. 
But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he die, and was not his enemy, neither sought his harm: 
Then the congregation shall judge between the slayer and the revenger of blood according to these judgments: 
And the congregation shall deliver the slayer out of the hand of the revenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to the city of his refuge, whither he was fled: and he shall abide in it unto the death of the high priest, which was anointed with the holy oil. 
But if the slayer shall at any time 
528,d with gold; they fasten it with nails and with hammers, that it move not. 
They are upright as the palm tree, but speak not: they must needs be borne, because they cannot go. Be not afraid of them; for they cannot do evil, neither also is it in them to do good. 
Forasmuch as there is none like unto thee, O LORD; thou art great, and thy name is great in might. 
Who would not fear thee, O King of nations? for to thee doth it appertain: forasmuch as among all the wise men of the nations, and in all their kingdoms, there is n
502,nto another place. 
Now as soon as it was day, there was no small stir among the soldiers, what was become of Peter. 
And when Herod had sought for him, and found him not, he examined the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode. 
And Herod was highly displeased with them of Tyre and Sidon: but they came with one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's chamberlain their friend, desired peace; because their country
717,told Zeresh his wife and all his friends every thing that had befallen him. Then said his wise men and Zeresh his wife unto him, If Mordecai be of the seed of the Jews, before whom thou hast begun to fall, thou shalt not prevail against him, but shalt surely fall before him. 
And while they were yet talking with him, came the king's chamberlains, and hasted to bring Haman unto the banquet that Esther had prepared. 
So the king and Haman came to banquet with Esther the queen. 
And the king said again unto Esther on the second day at the banquet of wine, What is thy petition, queen Esther? and it shall be granted thee: and what is thy request? and it shall be performed, even to the half of the kingdom. 
Then E
693,out his loins; and his meat was locusts and wild honey. 
Then went out to him Jerusalem, and all Judaea, and all the region round about Jordan, 
And were baptized of him in Jordan, confessing their sins. 
But when he saw many of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his baptism, he said unto them, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance: 
And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree which bringeth not forth good 
632,ast thou made us to err from thy ways, and hardened our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of thine inheritance. 
The people of thy holiness have possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary. 
We are thine: thou never barest rule over them; they were not called by thy name. 
Oh that thou wouldest rend the heavens, that thou wouldest come down, that the mountains might flow down at thy presence, 
As when the melting fire burneth, the fire causeth the waters to boil, to make thy name known to thine adversaries, that the nations may tremble at thy presence! 
When t
